_	This has been one of the most reliably Democratic districts in the country, although not to the extent that it was during the 1980s, when more than 90% of the district's residents were black.
_	Following earlier ideas by Nelson (1970, 1974), Milgrom and Roberts (1986) show that even "uninformative" advertising, that is, advertising expenditures that provide no direct information about a product's characteristics, may be informative in equilibrium to the extent that they work as a signal of the advertiser's quality level.
_	During August 2011, Piñera's public approval declined precipitously amidst continuous protests, to the extent that some polls indicated that he was the least popular Chilean leader since Augusto Pinochet.
_	The United States of America "does not accept any obligation under this Convention, in particular under articles 4 and 7, to restrict those [extensive protections of individual freedom of speech, expression and association contained in the Constitution and laws of the United States], through the adoption of legislation or any other measures, to the extent that they are protected by the Constitution and laws of the United States."
_	Moreover, to the extent that signals are involved and are transformed, they are not "representative of any physical object or substance."
_	This increases the density of the intake air and can potentially lead to substantial increases in engine power output, to the extent that such systems are usually "de-tuned" to avoid damaging other parts of the engine.
_	The consequent overcrowding into areas with little supporting infrastructure saw dramatic increases in the rate of infant mortality (to the extent that many Sunday schools for pre-working age children (5 or 6) had funeral clubs to pay for each other's funeral arrangements), crime, and social deprivation.
_	Initially it was specified that goalkeepers' shirts must be either scarlet or royal blue, but when green was added as a third option in 1912 it caught on to the extent that soon almost every goalkeeper was playing in green.
_	Sellers on Flipkart have been facing several challenges while doing their business on its marketplace portal, to the extent that some of them had to quit the portal.
_	The "Oxford American Dictionary" tags "spinster" (meaning "...unmarried woman, typically an older woman beyond the usual age for marriage") as "derogatory" and "a good example of the way in which a word acquires strong connotations to the extent that it can no longer be used in a neutral sense."
_	Although the spire was damaged to the extent that it became "crooked and bent", it was not removed until 1915 when the architects Power and Adam supervised its demolition.
_	While this isolation is said to have been "a reasonably strong and effective instrument of government"; it was highly "centralised to the extent that the defeat of the royal army left the entire land open to the invaders".
_	It is ultimately for this reason that everything that is real and to the extent that it is real refers back to my own and other people's (practical and theoretical) ability by which human existence is realized.
_	There is no truth to the statement that the Holy See has named an Official Papal Private Investigator of Garabandal and affirmations attributed to the anonymous personage to the extent that the verification of the Garabandal apparitions lies completely in the hands of Pope Paul VI and other such expressions that aim at undermining the authority of the decisions of the Bishop of Santander are completely unfounded.
_	He opposed national autonomy to the extent that he replaced the leaders of each republic with ethnic Russian members of the Communist party and regularly removed leaders of ethnic nations from power.
_	His form recovered to the extent that his biographer, John Arlott, described it as the beginning of "his quite phenomenal second lease of cricketing life".
_	It would also have been the place where he retired during the persecutions, which may be true to the extent that the site was at least located outside the walls of the former city.
_	An editorial by "USA Today" said, "to the extent that death panels of a sort do exist, they're composed of state officials who must decide whether each state's version of Medicaid will cover certain expensive, potentially life-saving treatments."
_	To the extent that her or his duties are exclusively focused on the Council and the Office of Financial Research, the Director is in effect the executive director of the Council.
_	"to the extent that the use of any natural or historic resource for recreation or tourism is not inconsistent with its conservation, to foster the use of natural and historic resources for recreation, and to allow their use for tourism"
_	This plan was developed to the extent that in April, Howe's army was seen constructing pontoon bridges; Washington, lodged in his winter quarters at Morristown, New Jersey, thought they were for eventual use on the Delaware River.
_	By the beginning of the Second World War, aircraft technology had increased to the extent that specialised torpedo bombers were no longer necessary.
_	This race is at war with the more human-like "Cyborgs" who retain a human form, but are heavily modified to the extent that they can, too, explore space at will.
_	Again, these did at least as much damage to "Richard" as to "Serapis", but the tactic worked to the extent that, unable to move, and with "Alliance" keeping well out of the line of his own great guns, Captain Pearson of "Serapis" accepted that prolonging the battle could achieve nothing, so he surrendered.
_	One-party states are usually considered to be authoritarian, to the extent that they are politically totalitarian.
_	The reviewer Key Ray Chong said that the English version is "an entirely new book in the sense that less-substantive chapters or parts have been eliminated, to the extent that the original Chinese narratives are rendered more precise and their impact more powerful for non-Chinese readers".
_	However, to the extent that Internet Protocol (IP) addresses or similar identifiers are considered personal information by local law, we also treat these identifiers as personal information."
_	As a municipal head, Valmonte was able to ingratiate himself with Spanish authorities, to the extent that he named the nearby village of Manikling as San Leonardo after Diaz de Cendreras's successor and frequent house guest Leonardo Bal.
_	To the extent that they felt divided, it came mostly from differences in personality, background and managing style.
_	In 1657 Shah Jahan fell seriously ill, to the extent that he was incapacitated.
_	The trade was prolific to the extent that the route between Lhasa and Sichuan came to be known as the Tea-Horse Road.
_	Towards the end of the 19th century, the popularity of the hydrotherapy had declined to the extent that many hotels were already being converted into private boarding schools and rest homes, and education became the basis of Malvern's economy.
_	This technique had developed to the extent that in bar conversation at the end of one season Andrew Buckland observed that the 18s had sailed all season without pulling the spinnaker pole back from the forestay and that all the systems could be simplified by eliminating the pole and setting the spinnaker from a fixed (but often retractable) bowsprit.
_	This means that man becomes immortal only if and to the extent that he acquires knowledge of what he can in principle know, e.g. mathematics and the natural sciences.
_	The family doctor who failed to recognise the signs had already been suspended by the GMC four years before, due to his falling below the minimum standard to the extent that he was exposing patients to risk.
_	It was a left-wing party, to the extent that it was opposed to war in any form and it demanded radical redistribution of income, nationalisation of core industries and influence of workers' on corporations.
_	But it was in favor of Christian Democracy to the extent that it wanted to keep the sabbath.
_	Invoice processing software as a disruptive innovation has produced tremendous labor savings to the extent that many companies have begun to consider it as a commodity much like word processing software.
_	Queensland's shark control program manager Jeff Krause said "I'm surprised and disgusted at the extent that they (protesters in WA) are prepared to threaten and vandalise," referring to the threats that prompted at least one contractor to withdraw from the tender process in WA.
_	Historically, Bumthangkha and its speakers have had close contact with speakers of Kurtöpkha, Mangduepikha and Khengkha, nearby languages of central and eastern Bhutan, to the extent that they may be considered part of a wider collection of "Bumthang languages."
_	When the Guardians traveled back in time to the 20th century of Earth-616, their native timeline was altered – to the extent that Starhawk had lived his entire life over again and was waiting for their arrival.
_	Meanwhile, Thornhill's fortunes were on the rise to the extent that in 1905 they laid claim to being the pre-eminent club in the town and changed their name to Rotherham County
_	The resentment grew to the extent that many, switch sides to support Wan Ahmad.
_	Multiethnolects appear to be less homogeneous than either dialects or sociolects and are assumed to be context-bound and transient, to the extent that they are ‘youth languages'.
_	By 1835 the living conditions had deteriorated to the extent that in October Robinson personally took charge of Wybalenna, organising better food and improving the housing.
_	This doomed poet's "Les Chants de Maldoror" became the seminal work for the Parisian Surrealists of Modigliani's generation, and the book became Modigliani's favourite to the extent that he learnt it by heart.
_	This proved successful to the extent that Rommel, refusing to believe that an attack was imminent, was not in Africa when it came.
_	The intermingling of Persians, Medes, Parthians, Bactrians, and indigenous "pre-Iranian" people of Iran (including the Elamites) gained more ground, and a homogeneous Iranian identity was created to the extent that all were just called Iranians, irrespective of clannish affiliations and regional linguistic or dialectal alterities.
_	Waspinator's status grew increasingly poor as time went on, to the extent that he was literally taken to pieces by the proto-human girl Una, who had been taught by Cheetor to go for the hinges when attacking robots.
_	This is also significant to the extent that synesthetic individuals have a limited ability to differentiate their experience from that of nonsynesthetic individuals.
_	"Crooker v. California", 357 U.S. 433, and "Cicenia v. Lagay", 357 U.S. 504, distinguished, and, to the extent that they may be inconsistent with the instant case, they are not controlling.
_	As a history recounts, "[T]he eastern wing of the Government House was unroofed on three sides and damaged to the extent that it was not fit for occupancy so major repair work had to be done to the roof and buildings".
_	In both cases, because partners are treated as earning their share of the partnership's income on a flow-through basis, they are treated as engaged in a U.S. trade or business or an unrelated business to the extent that the partnership is so engaged.
_	"The Investigation" succeeds in transforming the actual protocols into a work of literature and art – to the extent that art may be best suited to convey a sense of the experience and preserve the memory of the Holocaust.
_	Great and Holy Friday is observed as a strict fast, and adult Byzantine Christians are expected to abstain from all food and drink the entire day to the extent that their health permits.
_	The Mainland Southeast Asia linguistic area is one of the most dramatic of linguistic areas in terms of the surface similarity of the languages involved, to the extent that early linguists tended to group them all into a single family, although the modern consensus places them into numerous unrelated families.
_	Films that are banned in Australia have been considered offensive to the standards of morality, decency and propriety generally accepted by reasonable adults to the extent that it should not be classified.
_	The substantial rights have to be construed in a way that they also contain the duty to make governance systems transparent, at least to the extent that allows citizens to assess who made a decision and what measures have been taken.
_	To the extent that the contexts of other portraits have been lost to scholars, so too the keys to understanding these remarkable images as the Elizabethans understood them may be lost in time.
_	The court agreed with the plaintiffs and the District Court that Blackwell's directive violated HAVA to the extent that it empowered poll workers to withhold a provisional ballot based on their "on-the-spot determination at the polling place."
_	His affair with Emma Hamilton was widely remarked upon and disapproved of, to the extent that Emma was denied permission to attend Nelson's funeral and was subsequently ignored by the government, which awarded money and titles to Nelson's legitimate family.
_	He, along with his technical advisor A.S.E. Ackermann and British physicist Sir Charles Vernon Boys, developed an improved system using mirrors to reflect solar energy upon collector boxes, increasing heating capacity to the extent that water could now be used instead of ether.
_	For Jains, their scriptures represent the literal words of Mahāvīra and the other fordmakers only to the extent that the Agama is a series of beginning-less, endless and fixed truths, a tradition without any origin, human or divine, which in this world age has been channelled through Sudharma, the last of Mahavira's disciples to survive.
_	Most of Terrebonne Parish and Lafourche Parish were covered with water during the storm surge, yet Houma was spared to the extent that the Coast Guard used their airport for the initial rescue launch site. ""
_	The court went on to declare: "to the extent that the SCA purports to permit the government to obtain such emails warrantlessly, the SCA is unconstitutional."
_	A.R. Collins was among a large number of other people besides Barnes Wallis who made wide-ranging contributions to the development of a bouncing bomb and its method of delivery to a target, to the extent that, in a paper published in 1982, Collins himself made it evident that Wallis "did not play "an all-important" role in the development of this project and in particular, that very significant contributions were made by, for example, Sir William Glanville, Dr. G. Charlesworth, Dr. A.R. Collins and others of the Road Research Laboratory."
_	He is vain to the extent that he builds a giant statue of himself in his front garden and desperately tries to get on the good side of the local gentry.
_	Ivy dominates the ground flora near the Geilsland Road to the extent that almost all other species are eliminated.
_	At the start of European occupation, "A. bidwillii" occurred in great abundance in southern Queensland, to the extent that a Bunya Bunya Reserve was declared in 1840 to protect its habitat.
_	The cost of fertilisers and improvements put into the land, to the extent that they have not been fully used up at the time the allotment is returned to the land fund, shall be compensated.
_	Indeed, to the extent that it is still used, it is no longer viewed nosologically as a disease entity but instead as a symptom, a sign, or a syndrome of both.
_	To the extent that it is necessary to say so, this decision correctly reflects the law in Australia and, to the extent that it is inconsistent, should be preferred to the decision of this Court in "In re Continental C and G Rubber Co Proprietary Ltd".
_	Liberals favoured recognising Demotic as the national language, but conservatives and the Orthodox Church resisted all such efforts, to the extent that, when the New Testament was translated into Demotic in 1901, riots erupted in Athens and the government fell (the "Evangeliaka").
_	Caffeine has proven surprisingly toxic to snails, to the extent that spent coffee grounds (genuine coffee, and not decaffeinated) make a safe and immediately effective snail-repellant and even molluscicidal mulch for pot-plants, or for wherever else the supply is adequate.
_	The Catholic church had fostered Spanish pride and identity, to the extent that "speaking Christian" became, and remains, synonymous with speaking Spanish.
_	To the extent that the exhaustion doctrine is grounded in considerations of public policy, and to the extent that the interests of the public and third parties (such as Quanta in the "Quanta" case) are to be considered as well as those of the contracting parties, the courts may be more likely to place limits on whether the parties can by contract make the doctrine inapplicable to the goods that are the subject of their contract.
_	To the extent that these cravings, and subsequent mineral consumption (as well as in the case of cravings for ice, or other cold neck vasoconstricting food which aid in increasing brain oxygen levels by restricting neck veins) are therapeutically effective decreasing infant mortality, those genetic predispositions and the associated environmental triggers, are likely to be found in the infant as well.
_	There is usually some degree of modification of the found object, although not always to the extent that it cannot be recognized, as is the case with ready-mades.
_	As it was extremely well paid, the vocation was a popular one, and the numbers of Kheshig grew rapidly, to the extent that they were only normally on duty for three days in succession.
_	A major problem lies in determining the extent that the sample chosen is actually representative.
_	It has been pointed out that any mechanism that achieved this feat could be described as "interrupting" the fire of the gun (to the extent that it no longer actually works as a machine gun at all), and also as "synchronizing", or "timing" its fire to coincide with the revolutions of the propeller.
_	To the extent that the spring obeys Hooke's law, and that one can neglect friction and the mass of the spring, the amplitude of the oscillation will remain constant; and its frequency will be independent of its amplitude, determined only by the mass and the stiffness of the spring:
_	In 1950, in order to limit the extent that the Arabs and the Israelis could engage in an arms race, the three nations which dominated the arms trade in the non-Communist world, namely the United States, the United Kingdom and France had signed the Tripartite Declaration, where they had committed themselves to limiting how much arms they could sell in the Near East, and also to ensuring that any arms sales to one side was matched by arms sales of equal quantity and quality to the other.
_	They are always male-dominated, but not to the extent that orcs are.
_	They also apply to juristic persons to the extent that they are applicable, taking into account the nature of the right.
_	Under Boyd's purview, the Engineering Experiment Station gained many electronics-related contracts, to the extent that an Electronics Division was created in 1959; it would focus on radar and communications.
_	The best chess programs are now able to consistently beat the strongest human players, to the extent that human-computer matches no longer attract interest from chess players or media.
_	The issue was a major one, to the extent that the Constitutional Court itself ruled that the Italian Parliament should remain in charge only to reform the electoral system and then should be dissolved.
_	Masinissa and his sons possessed large estates throughout Numidia, to the extent that Roman authors attributed to him, quite falsely, the sedentarization of the Numidians.
_	In this view, a proposition is true to the extent that it is a necessary constituent of a systematically coherent whole.
_	Self-confidence (a strong sense of self) is different from narcissistic personality disorder; people with NPD typically value themselves over others to the extent that they openly disregard the feelings and wishes of others, and expect to be treated as superior, regardless of their actual status or achievements.
_	The treaty only allows taxation to the extent that it covers the cost of administrating the archipelago and covering the services provided to the residents.
_	At speed, however, the downforce provided by the rear spoiler affects this to the extent that at 200 kilometres per hour (125 mph) the downforce is 34% front and 66% rear.
_	The BISF finally succeeded in watering down the scheme to the extent that it became unviable; Salt and his syndicate withdrew, and the scheme was dead, "strangled at birth" according to Wilkinson.
_	When the Decepticons learn of "Scramble City", their combiner robots are deployed to attack, and a battle between them and their Autobot counterparts ensues, focusing on their "Scramble Power" – the interchangeability of the individual limbs – to the extent that at one point, Breakdown of the Stunticons connects to Superion to damage him.
_	Reuben's behaviour angered Jacob to the extent that he gave Reuben's birthright (as firstborn) to Joseph: classical rabbinical sources argue that the birthright had included the right of his descendants (the tribe of Reuben) to become ruler over the tribes (transferred to Judah) and priests (transferred to Levi).
_	Romance ensued and the College Council's sense of propriety was offended to the extent that Metcalfe's employment was terminated early in 1869.
_	While most of those studying are mature students, an increasingly large proportion of new undergraduates are aged between 17 and 25, to the extent that the OU now has more students in this age range than any other UK university.
_	He states that he believes that stem cell research, and indeed embryonic stem cell research, will continue whether or not the U.S. sanctions it, and so it would be the wisest course of action to support it to the extent that the United States will be able to regulate and monitor the use.
_	The camera handles winding and rewinding automatically, to the extent that partially exposed films can, in certain cameras, be removed and used later.
_	No one person is identical to another to the extent that their proposals can be disparaged by a mere reference to that other person.
_	By 1939 and the outbreak of the Second World War the fleet had been successfully rebuilt and expanded, to the extent that the Ellerman groups owned a total 105 ships with a combined capacity of 920,000 tons.
_	The view has been advanced that a transfer is prohibited under paragraph 6 only to the extent that it involves the displacement of the local population.
_	To the extent that it is preyed upon by other animals, it may impact predator populations.
_	They thought Pantheism was similar to the ancient Hindu philosophy of Advaita (non-dualism) to the extent that the 19th-century German Sanskritist Theodore Goldstücker remarked that Spinoza's thought was "... a western system of philosophy which occupies a foremost rank amongst the philosophies of all nations and ages, and which is so exact a representation of the ideas of the Vedanta, that we might have suspected its founder to have borrowed the fundamental principles of his system from the Hindus."
_	They found that though these individuals could be classified very accurately to continental clusters, there was a significant degree of genetic overlap on the individual level, to the extent that, using 377 loci, individual Europeans were about 38% of the time more genetically similar to East Asians than to other Europeans.
_	The fundamentals underlying takaful are very similar to co-operative and mutual principles, to the extent that the co-operative and mutual model is one that is accepted under Islamic law.
_	At virtually every point, the North Korean government has placed roadblocks in the way of the donor community in North Korea, which succeeded to the extent that it did only through extraordinary perspicacity and flexibility.
_	She stares at one of the security guards as blood starts dripping underneath her sunglasses from her eyes to the extent that the ground beneath her rapidly enlarges in a circle of blood before the screen flashes out in red.
_	Softley does not look back on this time favourably claiming during production he had gone "through a lot of hells and no heavens, a terrifying amount of personal pain" to the extent that he quit the music business for over four years.
_	By his example thus he benefitted his fellow Bidefordians, to the extent that it almost seemed commerce of that place seemed both to have flourished and to have fallen with him.
_	Later elaborations of this interpretation treated Enoch as having been a pious ascetic, who, called to mix with others, preached repentance, and gathered (despite the small number of people on Earth) a vast collection of disciples, to the extent that he was proclaimed king.
_	Under his wisdom, peace is said to have reigned on earth, to the extent that he is summoned to Heaven to rule over the "sons of God".
_	Ideally, the wedges are driven under the wagon to the extent that the wagon is supported by the wedges instead of its casters.
_	The town has a historical association with radicalism to the extent that it earned the nickname "little Moscow".
_	On July 12, 2002, the Ontario Superior Court of Justice ruled that the marriages performed by Hawkes in January 2001 were legal, but stayed its decision pending a possible appeal, and on June 10, 2003, the Court of Appeal for Ontario declared the common law definition of marriage as "invalid to the extent that it refers to “one man and one woman” in the ruling of "Halpern v. Canada", immediately striking down all barriers against same-sex marriage in the province.
_	This was the turning point in his life and he thereafter became a staunch devotee of Ramakrishna to the extent that he considered him as an Avatar of God and started propagating his message through lectures in later years.
_	To the extent that Marschner is still remembered, it is largely for his operas "Hans Heiling" (1833), "Der Vampyr" (1828) and "Der Templer und die Jüdin" (1829), extremely popular in his lifetime.
_	However, he came to the conclusion that they were kindred spirits inspired by a similar disaster in their lives, and duplicated Batman's costume and equipment as an homage - to the extent that he began training his own "Robin", who went on to become the second Wrath.
_	Her brain was damaged to the extent that she entered a persistent vegetative state.
_	Deb has several honors to his credit, which include Shanti Swarup Bhatnagar award in engineering sciences in 2005, Thomson Citation Laureate award for his highly cited research in computer science during 1996–2005 and MCDM Edgeworth-Pareto Award for a record of creativity to the extent that the field of MCDM would not exist in its current form in 2008.
_	With the bell moving, plumbing carrying the coolant to the bell has to be flexible and this increases complexity to the extent that the advantages of the design are often considered too costly.
_	In 2000 a Salinas High School principal was in the center of a variety of controversies including bans on clothing to the extent that "thong panties were unofficially banned."
_	Still, some artists in Western Europe drew inspiration from revolutionary ideals, to the extent that Dadaist Richard Huelsenbeck confidently declared in 1920 that Dada was a "German Bolshevist affair."
_	The term became ingrained in the language to the extent that a performance using markers and a sketch pad is still known today as a chalk talk.
_	Brune details that theory of mind has been traced back to primates, but it is not observed to the extent that it is in the modern human.
_	The business was apparently profitable from the outset, to the extent that within a year Prinsep opened a copper mint at Pulta in 1780 under authority of the government, after he and Alexander Cunningham discovered the copper mines at Rotasgarh, producing the first copper coinage in India.
_	The trials would not be blind – patients would know which statin they had been prescribed – but Goldacre writes that they would be unlikely to hold such firm beliefs about which one is preferable to the extent that it could affect their health.
_	Rugs, mugs, jugs, didn’t matter, bought it all, to the extent that I started wandering around London wearing a red Noddy hat with a bell on the end.
_	Thomas argues that the world of "Thunderbirds" is similar to the 1960s to the extent that contemporary capitalism and class structures appear to have survived mostly intact.
_	I'm not sure if I agree with all the conclusions the director came to but I can appreciate that she walked the walk and now talks the talk to the extent that she could so readily outline many of the issues that impact us all."
_	Official policy then concentrated on removing all blacks from the population, to the extent that the full-blooded Aboriginal people were hunted to extinguish them from society, and those of mixed race would be assimilated with the white race so that in a few generations they too would become white.
_	Other frequent areas of disagreement include the extent that the homeless should participate in the writing and printing of street newspapers, and whether street newspapers should accept advertising to generate revenue.
_	This is achieved by photons to the extent that effects described by special relativity are able to describe those of such particles themselves.
_	He first gained repute for his skill at playing cards, to the extent that “jouer à la Dangeau” became an expression in the language of the time and he attracted the attention of Louis XIV.
_	The mill was extensively restored in 1980 by Warwickshire millwrights Gormley and Goodman to the extent that it was able to grind wheat for flour again for the first time that year since it ceased work in 1939.
_	In spite of government efforts, prostitution has now developed to the extent that it comprises an industry, one that involves a great number of people and produces a considerable economic output.
_	In addition, it appears that attacks on humans had been more common in the past, at least after conquistadors arrived in the Americas, to the extent that the jaguar had a fearsome reputation in the Americas, akin to the lion and tiger in the Old World.
_	So while legalism was denounced from the pulpit, it was practiced amongst the congregation to the extent that it has been described as "cultist tendencies".
_	As years went by, the band became synonymous with Martha White to the extent that the advertising jingle itself became a hit, and the band rarely played a concert without it.
_	His recurrent battles with alcoholism have put him at odds with recovering alcoholic Captain Furillo, to the extent that Furillo nearly had LaRue dismissed from the police force for arriving to a major undercover operation inebriated.
_	The divisions maintained separate car fleets and maintenance bases, to the extent that some types of cars were assigned only to one division or the other, and common equipment, such as the BMT Standards, were nevertheless divided by car number between the divisions.
_	Externalities which influence supplier induced demand include direct to consumer marketing and patient susceptibility to marketing to the extent that demand induced supply is now being documented in health economics.
_	In Basra, where they are very prevalent, they are known as "shanasheel" (or "shanashil") to the extent that Basra is often called "the city of Shanashil."
_	As the couple are Christian, he feels compelled by his faith to help them, and becomes embroiled in their plight to the extent that he is not allowed to assist in the twins' eventual separation operation because of his over-involvement.
_	In the words of historian Alan Stephens, "The seemingly interminable round of committee meetings which followed the Tange reorganisation made management very difficult, to the extent that Air Marshal Read often felt he was fighting against the system rather than working with it".
_	Franklin certainly developed a high performance version of Charles Gustafson's Powerplus engine, to the extent that the side-valve engine became the main design used in American high-performance motorcycles, supplanting more expensive overhead valve, multiple valve, and overhead camshaft designs used earlier on racing motorcycles, and persisting well beyond World War II in Class C racing in the United States.
_	Thus it confirmed that colonial legislation (provided it had been passed in the proper manner) was to have full effect within the colony, limited only to the extent that it was not in contradiction with ("repugnant to") any Act of Parliament that contained powers which extended beyond the boundaries of the United Kingdom to include that colony.
_	Mansfield viewed the application of comity as discretionary, with courts applying foreign law "except to the extent that it conflicted with principles of natural justice or public policy."
_	Differences between the groups grew to the extent that in popular perception "Lithuanian" and "misnagged" became virtually interchangeable terms.
_	However, if density is increased to the extent that individual crystals are crushed, the explosive may become more sensitive.
_	They are seen as sort of "super heroes" to the extent that "their parents should be able to work through and solve any issue.[…]
_	These areas are far more affected by nature than humanity, to the extent that the latter is practically unnoticeable, for example virgin forest.
_	To the extent that he is historical, he may have ruled in the third quarter of the 10th century.
_	The Honduran cattle sector, however, never developed to the extent that it did in much of the rest of Central America.
_	The origination and development of Kwaito has had a significant impact on South African culture to the extent that it is seen as a lifestyle as much as a music genre.
_	His personal holiness spread in reputation throughout Rome and the surrounding areas to the extent that even Pope Pius X said of him: "This is a true son of Saint Francis".
_	Unfortunately, these ill-willed beguiling marketing notions have persisted through the decades and become ingrained with each successive generation of newly qualified anesthesiologists and CRNAs (certified registered nurse anesthetists) to the extent that the mere mention of "benzylisoquinolines" (the erroneous but commonly used class name for tetrahydroisoquinolinium neuromuscular blocking agents) immediately conjures images of histamine release, cardiovascular instability and generates unnecessary anxiety.
_	A great number of words of French origin have entered the English language to the extent that many Latin words have come to the English language.
_	John Corvino, associate professor of Philosophy at Wayne State University takes a different tack, arguing that loyalty can sometimes be a vice, not a virtue, and that "loyalty is only a virtue to the extent that the object of loyalty is good" (similar to Nathanson).
_	He told Harris that Marling not only reacted positively, but "actually promised to help me to the extent that she can and she is well connected in the American community".
_	Before 1974, when the US Commission on New Technological Uses of Copyrighted Works (CONTU) decided that ""computer programs, to the extent that they embody an author's original creation, are proper subject matter of copyright"", software was not copyrightable and therefore always in public domain.
_	and tribal nations have also been involved with or had concerns about how the Corps manages water supply, to the extent that Congress or the courts have often gotten involved in trying to mediate disputes.
_	Sudden changes in pressure can damage meters to the extent that many meters in cities in developing countries are not functional.
_	An award which contains decisions on matters not submitted to arbitration may be enforced to the extent that the award contains decisions
_	To the extent that the order does not prescribe otherwise, the testimony or statement shall be taken, and the document or other thing produced, in accordance with the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure.
_	In-game, the Ghost unit is equipped with a cloaking device and is designed for scouting and designating targets for nuclear strike, and has been developed further through the lore of the series to the extent that the "" sub-series was once planned, specifically focusing on the life of a Ghost, Nova.
_	Quiggin argued that the members of the 2004 panel, selected by Lomborg, were, "generally towards the right and, to the extent that they had stated views, to be opponents of Kyoto.".
_	In a 2007 book review of Philip Roth's "Exit Ghost", Romano revived the long-standing controversy over the extent that Roth's fiction is autobiographical.
_	The 34-rooms hotel was housed in the upper floors of the station and its service was known to be equivalent to Raffles Hotel during its peak, to the extent that many dignitaries like the Malaysian royalties frequent the hotel.
_	Thus, again in simple terms, and to the extent that human beings are indeed political beings, crime does seem to have an ontological basis.
_	"No matter how wise and creative the consultant's analysis and recommendations, they pay off only to the extent that the client does what is necessary to benefit from them.
_	"Aftonbladet" called the record "extremely strong" and commended the quality of the lyrics, describing them as "Private, to the extent that you can sometimes not listen without holding your breath.
_	After the United States entered the war on April 6, 1917, operations increased to the extent that a sub-post was needed to accommodate men and the maneuvering balloons.
_	Barclay was notorious for his many wives to the extent that some journalists referred to him as 'Bluebeard'.
_	To the extent that our behavior depends on the degree of energy and intelligence available to us, this center of pure creative intelligence may be described as that resource which gives direction to all that we experience, think and do."
_	A state insurance measure shall be preempted if, and only to the extent that the Director determines that the measure results in a less favorable treatment of a non-US insurer whose parent corporation is located in a nation with an agreement or treaty with the US.
_	Tall and quite beautiful, she is generally surrounded by an aura of cold, to the extent that it's usually snowing in her vicinity, often to the annoyance of those around her, not that any of them would dare say anything.
_	George was willed $6 million on the condition that, "after the space of five years continuously he shall abstain from the use of spirituous, vinous, and malt liquors to the extent that he shall not during this period have been intoxicated."
_	In either case, to the extent that the finished goods are consumed in a State other than the one which taxes the raw material, the increase in cost on account of the tax is a matter of direct concern to the consumer of another State.
_	His "Stalinism" was ironic to the extent Stalin had no political chance to lead the Weltgeist; yet, he was serious about Stalinism to the extent that he regarded the utopia of the Soviet Union under Stalin, and the willingness to purge unsupportive elements in the population, as evidence of a desire to bring about the end of history, and as a repetition of the Reign of Terror of the French Revolution.
_	During this period he also developed an enthusiasm for ballroom-dancing to the extent that he was referred to by his friend George Ernest Morrison, "The Times" China Correspondent,
_	By the mid-1960s, relations between Israel and its Arab neighbors had deteriorated to the extent that a number of border clashes had taken place.
_	As further testing of the prototype continued, the reliability of the engines and gearboxes continued to be problematic, but not to the extent that flight testing was prevented.
_	Chandran is absolutely heartbroken to the extent that he goes to Madras and starts living on streets.
_	The procedures for receiving air from another diver or from one's own equipment are most effective and least likely to result in a life-threatening incident if well trained to the extent that they do not distract the diver from other essential matters.
_	Conjecturally, the image of such a Galois representation, which is an l-adic Lie group for a given prime number "l", is determined by the corresponding Mumford–Tate group "G" (coming from the Hodge structure on "H"("A")), to the extent that knowledge of "G" determines the Lie algebra of the Galois image.
_	Prado took full advantage of the opportunity, to the extent that he remained the starter at second, batting second in the lineup, even after Johnson's return to the active roster.
_	In truth, a democratised Soviet Union was incompatible with denial of the Baltic states' independence for, to the extent that those Soviet republics became democratic, their opposition to remaining in a political entity whose centre was Moscow would become increasingly evident.
_	His vigorous enforcement of "Brown v. Board of Education" (1954), however, made him many enemies amongst the predominantly white political and business culture of New Orleans to the extent that his entire family was soon ostracized and isolated from much of New Orleans' society life.
_	Where a creditor's allowed claim is "secured by a lien on property in which the [bankruptcy] estate has an interest," that allowed claim "is a "secured claim" to the extent of the value of such creditor’s interest in the estate’s interest in such property ... and is an "unsecured claim" to the extent that the value of such creditor’s interest ... is less than the amount of such allowed claim."
_	Diluted nitric acid is not as strong an oxidizing agent and hence does not raise the potential of the metal to the extent that metastable FeO forms on the surface.
_	The Parisian public now has a generally positive opinion of the Haussmann legacy, to the extent that certain suburban towns, for example Issy-les-Moulineaux and Puteaux, have built new quarters that even by their name claim "Quartier Haussmannien", the Haussmanian heritage.
_	The subgenre has gained acceptance by the adult industry to the extent that major awards are presented in this category by organizations such as AVN and XRCO.
_	To the extent that these matters can be clarified, the Main Plot that had been laid in parallel wished also for regime change, with James replaced on the throne by Arabella Stuart.
_	However after a successful loan spell at FC Emmen followed, and while he was there, he impressed his coach at FC Twente to the extent that De Visscher was offered a three-year deal with the club.
_	In a review of the episode in "The Observer", Caroline Boucher wrote: "My domestic Simpsons correspondent, Simon, reports a particularly fine episode, Marge in Chains to the extent that he watched the tape twice."
_	In response, Mawson lowered the work regimen down to six hours a day, and gave the men Sundays off, provided the wind had not let up to the extent that work could be done outside.
_	"Faults" – in adults, guard hair prominent, protruding from coat to the extent that it interferes with the soft lustrous feel.
_	The first Burns supper was established in around 1801 and within ten years many annual celebrations of the bard's life and works were taking place to the extent that the Reverend William Peebles, a target of Burns' wit, felt compelled to publish a poetical work entitled ""Burnomania: the celebrity of Robert Burns considered in a Discourse addressed to all real Christians of every Denomination"".
_	The Custom evolved rapidly in New France, to the extent that in 1760 it was (as applied in Montreal and Quebec City) the "law of Canada", and on certain points it had diverged significantly from its counterpart in France.
_	Therefore, Hume's view was that there are property rights because of and to the extent that the existing law, supported by social customs, secure them.
_	This technique had developed to the extent that in bar conversation at the end of one season Andrew Buckland observed that the 18s had sailed all season without pulling the spinnaker pole back from the forestay and that all the systems could be simplified by eliminating the pole and setting the spinnaker from a fixed (but often retractable) bowsprit.
_	In NSW, colonial towns that retain significant historic form and fabric to the extent that Braidwood does, are rare.
_	The Society, which in fact supports deregulation of the labour market to the extent that employers and employees simply form contracts with each other and then deal with any disputes via the courts, admonished the WorkChoices model particularly for its length and the amount of red tape, claiming it was "all about regulation" and comparing it to the "old Soviet system of command and control", as well as on federalist grounds saying "This attempt on his part to diminish the role of the states, to concentrate all power in Canberra, is very much to Australia's detriment".
_	At any rate, the regular Bavarian troops had been demobilised after the war to the extent that most of the fighting against the Red Army was done by Freikorps units and other German troops from outside Bavaria.
_	Gray is scathing of Isaacs to the extent that when comparing the writings of the two men he wrote ""The differences between Maclean's and Isaacs' accounts [of Shaka's brutality] are so glaring that one is forced to ask which of the two is plain lying.""
_	But Russell T Davies' work on the 2005 revival of "Doctor Who" brought the term to prominence in British television (to the extent that in 2009 a writer for "The Guardian" wrote that "Over here, the concept of 'showrunner' has only made it as far as "Doctor Who"").
_	The sphere within a sphere of the onion made it a much-revered symbol of spirituality and eternity, to the extent that the ancient Egyptians took their sacred oaths with their right hand on an onion.
_	While agreeing that they were discriminated against by the Civil Partnership Act 2004, he considered that "To the extent that by reason of that distinction it discriminates against same-sex partners, such discrimination has a legitimate aim, is reasonable and proportionate, and falls within the margin of appreciation accorded to Convention States."
_	A business is generally able to recover input VAT to the extent that the input VAT is attributable to (that is, used to make) its taxable outputs.
_	Eventually, the balloon will expand to the extent that its skin will break, terminating the ascent.
_	He said at the time that he had had a lifelong complex about his nose to the extent that he could not mix socially.
_	In professional diving, solo diving is normal procedure when one diver is sufficient to perform the required task, particularly on surface supplied equipment, to the extent that it is not even noted as an exception.
_	His biodynamic convictions also means that Joly disapproves of the label "winemaker" to the extent that his business card is reported to read "Nicolas Joly, "Gérant de la Société", Nature assistant and not a winemaker".
_	The song has since taken off around campus to the extent that it is now on JMU Athletics billboards, theme music for videos, and starting in the 2013 Football Season, the Marching Royal Dukes will present it as a part of their pre-game show.
_	To the extent that the amount so collected does not exceed the amount required to be paid to the family for the month in which collected, the State shall distribute the amount so collected to the family.".
_	But Stephen Palmquist explains that this is part of Kant's definition of the term, to the extent that anyone who claims to have found a way of making the thing-in-itself knowable must be adopting a non-Kantian position.
_	To the extent that people are pathologically narcissistic, they can be controlling, blaming, self-absorbed, intolerant of others' views, unaware of others' needs and the effects of their behavior on others, and insist that others see them as they wish to be seen.
_	That feels interesting to me, but Ultravisitor seems to do that to the extent that it risks being completely incoherent.
_	However, to the extent that this mass is unevenly spread, formula_26 controls which states are likely to get more mass than others.
_	He had developed such a strong friendship with Charles by the time of this portrait that the emperor's courtiers were uneasy at the extent that a lowly painter was allowed into his confidence.
_	Due to overgrazing, frequent forest fires, and the appropriation of land for housing, the mountain's ecology and soil have suffered greatly, to the extent that much of the soil is now barren or can only support herbaceous vegetation.
_	Lamping is the name of a hunting technique of using a powerful beam to dazzle animals to the extent that they can be approached closely and collected, inspected or shot.
_	The electrical network is in disrepair to the extent that prolonged and periodic blackouts are normal, and exposed lines sometimes electrify puddles of rainwater.
_	To the extent that the Supreme Court Act provided that the Appellate Division had jurisdiction to adjudicate the constitutionality of Acts of Parliament, it was invalid.
_	The caffeine content of these coffee drinks, to the extent that caffeine is present in them, will not prevent intoxication from their alcohol content.
_	The BIOS also frees computer hardware designers (to the extent that programs are written to use the BIOS exclusively) from being constrained to maintain exact hardware compatibility with old systems when designing new systems, in order to maintain compatibility with existing software.
_	It is difficult to disentangle subjective factors and objective correlates because the objective world is dealt with only to the extent that it enters subjective experiences.
_	Temples in the tradition often use crystal balls in meditation teaching, to the extent that the crystal ball has become a sacred symbol of the meditation tradition.
_	The event received considerable international and domestic media attention and frightened the then Soviet authorities to the extent that jazz festivals were prohibited as a perceived threat to the existing communist ideology.
_	The match was played in a strong wind, to the extent that when Frederick Maddison took a corner kick for Wanderers, the gale blew the ball back out of play.
_	However, the great conquests of the Persians made the sword more famous as a Persian weapon, to the extent that the true nature of the weapon has been lost somewhat as the name Akinaka has been used to refer to whichever form of sword the Persian army favoured at the time.
_	To the extent that happens it negates the effect of the pricing policy.
_	By 2004, the church had grown to the extent that they were able to call their first full-time Pastor.
_	He said: "I don't follow gossip very much so I don't really know the impact of WikiLeaks, but I can assure you that the security agencies in Canada are following it very closely and to the extent that I need to be involved and address those issues, they will brief me on the issues."
_	Meanwhile, Rosaria's condition worsens, to the extent that she tries to drown herself, prompting Father Lucas and Michael to have her hospitalized for further care.
_	Garret has raised standards to the extent that Oklahoma is recognized as a national model by the National Institute for Early Education Research.
_	Hence it seems reasonable that students and alumni be allowed to use the image as a celebration of that past, to the extent that they may choose".
_	Each party owes the same obligations to all other parties, except to the extent that they have stated reservations.
_	It had fallen into disrepair to the extent that it appeared on English Heritage's Buildings At Risk register, but was redeveloped by the Maysand Group over three years, finishing in August 2006
_	He gained widespread support in the community, to the extent that Jamaican police had to seek permission from his organization before entering the neighborhood.
_	This style subsequently became wildly popular in Puerto Rico, to the extent that in 1848 it was banned by the priggish Spanish governor Juan de la Pezuela.
_	Simon Cowell was alerted to the interest shown by the public, and pursued the two reluctant actors (and later Robson's mother) for the next four months to record the song, to the extent that Robson Green threatened legal action to stop Cowell harassing them.
_	As a result of the Australia wide 1995 - 2009 drought, water levels in Lakes Albert and Alexandrina dropped to the extent that traditional burial grounds, which had been under water, were now exposed.
_	Yet ultimately even emptiness needs to be transcended, to the extent that it is not a vacuous emptiness, but the expanse of the mind of Buddha, Buddhic Awareness and Buddha-realms, all of which know of no beginning and no arising - as Stephen Hodge points out:
_	If the ball is damaged to the extent that it gives either team a disadvantage, it is replaced with a used undamaged ball in similar condition.
_	Working as a television writer for a low-rated sitcom, "Those McAllister's", Taylor Peters (Matthew Broderick) has developed a few vices, such as drinking, drug abuse and compulsive gambling, which have previously damaged his career to the extent that he takes sessions with an analyst only so his wife Lorraine (Maura Tierney) can feel he is taking the cure.
_	Coelacanths disappeared from the fossil record some 80 million years ago (upper Cretaceous) and, to the extent that they exhibit low rates of morphological evolution, extant species qualify as living fossils.
_	Writers played on their manipulative manner to the extent that James manages to con the entire Hutchinson family, out of their restaurant "The Hutch".
_	There Sprite tells him that it was him who made all the Eternals forget who they were, took away their powers, and removed all record of them, as revenge for a million years of them treating him like a child - to the extent that they created him as an Eternal 'who would never grow up', trapped in the form of a prepubescent boy (he would later use this form to, in the Marvel Universe, inspire J. M. Barrie to create Peter Pan).
_	There is evidence that Ezell and Bogan's relationship went beyond the recording studio, to the extent that Bogan's husband considered divorce proceedings.
_	Before the claims are met, secured creditors are entitled to enforce their claims against the assets of the company to the extent that they are subject to a valid security interest.
_	After a number of generations, the antecedents of many "mestiços" became mixed to the extent that the Portuguese felt a need to establish a set of distinctions among them.
_	In his later years, Smith had a hip replacement operation (both knees and an elbow are made of plastic as well) and also began to suffer from arthritis to the extent that he could not work and often needed a wheelchair or walking stick and had to claim incapacity benefit.
_	This battle is said to have resulted in much bloodshed and slaughter on both sides, to the extent that hostilities abated for a while thereafter.
_	He was also a fan of American glam performers Sparks, Jobriath, and The New York Dolls, the last of which were a significant influence on Morrissey, to the extent that he organised a British fan club for the band through small adverts in the back pages of music magazines.
_	Designers have identified this and in some cases are able to exploit it to the extent that prices can be escalated to surprising proportions without reference to the cost of manufacture.
_	And to the extent that no-nit policies result in absenteeism, the child's education suffers, and the school's funding (e.g., from government sources) may be reduced.
_	The crab-hawks ("Buteogallus") and the solitary "eagles" ("Harpyhaliaetus") seem to be allied with the latter, to the extent that these three genera might be united in "Buteogallus".
_	To the extent that these drugs alter people’s emotions they have a profound effect on the essential nature of their identities.
_	The other important aspect of the multiplier is that to the extent that government spending generates new consumption, it also generates "new" tax revenues.
_	However, she notices that Dong-hyuk is very happy with Mi-ryung and never shares a smile with her, which makes her very jealous, to the extent that she forces her husband out of the house and thinks of filing for divorce.
_	It was noted in 2014 that the Ghanaian student population in Australia (like the Nigerian one) was growing fast to the extent that Australian universities were keen to attract more students from Ghana.
_	Joyce and Edwards divorced in 1968 but remained close friends, to the extent that she used to console him after his subsequent relationships broke down.
_	"L. glyciosmus" is considered edible, but is not recommended to the extent that some mycologists consider it inedible.
_	Michael Williams espouses his view on the responsibilities a commander has for the men in his charge, to the extent that he may even be responsible for their souls.
_	It hit at King James's claim to the extent that it depended on the House of Lancaster.
_	In the meantime Allee and Addicks’ efforts continued to bear fruit to the extent that their supporters became a majority at the 1896 Republican State Convention.
_	Bhavsingh's fourth son, Madhu Singh, became a close friend and confidant of his brother-in-law, the Raja of Kota, to the extent that the Raja gave his sister in marriage to Madhu Singh, and prevailed upon him to move to Kota and take up an important position at his court.
_	In recent generations, the interpretation of the process has become more stringent to the extent that it takes actions that are unprecedented in Jewish history such as cancelling conversions.
_	Cormac Burke has written an anthropological (non-religious) evaluation of the effect of contraception on marital love, "Married Love and Contraception", to argue that "contraception does in fact denaturalize the conjugal act, to the extent that, far from uniting the spouses and expressing and confirming the love between them in a unique way, it tends to undermine their love by radically contradicting the full mutual self-giving that this most intimate act of the marital relationship should signify."
_	During the 2012 season, Somerset were ravaged by injuries to the extent that on two occasions the county were reduced to their last 11 available players, with members of the coaching and support staff having to fill in as 12th men.
_	Hughes intended to make a "jet-age" "Hell's Angels" to the extent that the flying scenes were the most important element, and led to his obsessive re-editing that stretched into years.
_	Liberal feminists believe women and men possess the same rational capabilities and have no fundamental differences in capability; therefore, they assert that women should have equal opportunity as men to the extent that some liberal feminists believe there should be no legal distinctions between men or women.
_	(to the extent that Beartooth have been considered a hardcore punk band) and without the electronic elements that Attack Attack!
_	One torpedo hit , damaging the heavy cruiser to the extent that the ship remained under repair until September 1941.
_	To the extent that an institutional system of social control falls short of these requirements, Fuller argues, we are less inclined to recognise it as a system of law, or to give it our respect.
_	The formalism is quite similar to Prolog, to the extent that it borrowed its cut operator.
_	Since being introduced into North America, the mute swan has increased greatly in number, to the extent that it is considered as an invasive species.
_	To the extent that women and men with disabilities are gendered, the interactions of these two identities lead to different experiences.
_	However, the optimal policy equation shows that, to the extent that there is multiplier uncertainty (the extent to which formula_8), the magnitude of the optimal policy action is diminished.
_	During the three months she spent in New York, Kahlo painted very little, instead focusing on enjoying the city to the extent that her fragile health allowed.
_	The original plot by Patrick Berry would have seen Riker and Data travel to the surface with an otherwise all female away team, which offended the planet's leader to the extent that Yar stuns him with a phaser as a show of strength in order to prevent his immediate execution.
_	They fought in many wars as allies, one of the most difficult ones was the “Krepi war” in 1869 where the Dutch and the Ewe forces inflicted heavy casualties on Asante and Akwamu forces to the extent that Otumfuo Kofi Karikari, the then Asantehene decided to withdraw from the war, so he ordered Adu Bofo, the then Asante army general to abandon the Krepi war; but Bofo continued to the end, and later demanded heavy ounces of gold for the captured Dutch (German) missionaries.
_	The report said that to the extent that district Board members, its Superintendent (who learned of TheftTrack at a meeting of his Cabinet in 2008), and its principals were aware of TheftTrack's capabilities, they "did not appreciate the potential of that ability to raise serious privacy concerns, and they should have sought more information … or advice" from the district lawyer.
_	To the extent that the book can be said to possess a plot, this can be summarized as the story of the hapless Nikolai Apollonovich, a ne'er-do-well who is caught up in revolutionary politics and assigned the task of assassinating a certain government official—his own father.
_	However, Section 183(b) allows two types of deductions attributable to a hobby: (1) deductions that would be allowable to the taxpayer in a taxable year whether or not such activity is engaged in for profit, and (2) deductions that would be allowable to the taxpayer if the activity were engaged in for profit, but only to the extent that the income from the activity exceeds the deductions allowable by the first type of deduction.
_	Unfortunately, after six years the art form declined to the extent that today very little Spouge is played on the airwaves.
_	Its success irritated the colonists to the extent that they took legal action against Houphouët.
_	The sub-prime market did not take hold in Canada to the extent that it did in the U.S., where the vast majority of mortgages were originated by third parties and then packaged and sold to investors who often did not understand the associated risk.
_	Both Horrocks and "Nightwing" writer Devin Grayson opposed the move during planning, to the extent that Horrocks deliberately kept "Batgirl" out of several key events in the story.
_	The peninsula as a whole was known to the world as a source of the precious metal to the extent that it was proclaimed "Chrysḗ Chersónēsos" (the golden peninsula) by Ptolemy.
_	His collaboration with the musical genius duo Laxmikant Pyarelal has been most successful to the extent that he was considered a heir of Mohammad Rafi at his peak in the late 1980s and early 1990s.
_	Aiming for a radically different experience than most other games in the genre, the game focused on character interaction and politics to the extent that combat was entirely removed from the design.
_	In an extreme state, called elephantiasis, the edema progresses to the extent that the skin becomes thick with an appearance similar to the skin on elephant limbs.
_	Wilderness areas are those judged to have been far more affected by nature than humanity, to the extent that the latter is practically unnoticeable.
_	In most jurisdictions, a floating charge is only vulnerable to the extent that it does not secure new money for the company.
_	Brent concluded by testifying that thimerosal could not have degraded Michelle's immune system to the extent that when she was vaccinated with MMR nine months later, it caused brain damage, saying "That couldn't possibly be the case."
_	In Fitzgerald, Bosworth had begun and directed a band, and had gained the respect of the band members to the extent that they tried to apply Bosworth's values to their lives.
_	Originally lowly clerks, by the 6th century they had risen in importance, to the extent that Peter the Patrician, when distinguishing between civil and military officials, calls the former "chartoularikoi".
_	The duo have become well known in the UK, to the extent that they (and often the programme itself) are almost always referred to as just Kim and Aggie.
_	In his final league appearance, he tormented KCC goalie Sadiq Wassa to the extent that when he scored his fourth in the 5–0 win, he simply walked off the field as if to suggest that domestic opposition no longer matched his ambitions.
_	Second was the almost exclusive focus on the person, Lev Vygotsky, himself to the extent that the scientific contributions of other notable characters have been forgotten.
_	Rubinstein described his memory as photographic, to the extent that he would visualize an errant coffee stain while recalling a score.
_	Its appearance was extremely similar to the African species, to the extent that even hand-held specimens can hardly be told apart except by direct comparison or measurements.
_	While Hooker was not finding gradations of varieties, Darwin's barnacles were showing this to the extent that defining species was extremely difficult.
_	"To the extent that "Wilko" rested on suspicion of arbitration as a method of weakening the protections afforded in the substantive law to would-be complainants," Kennedy wrote, "it has fallen far out of step with our current strong endorsement of the federal statutes favoring this method of resolving disputes."
_	Chinese community leaders often straddled both legitimate businesses as well as the activities of secret societies, meaning that the influence of secret societies was widespread to the extent that these community leaders had government connections, moral authority in society and economic power all conflated together.
_	Warning: Horrendous traffic jams can clog up to the extent that the stretch from Madian to Jianxiang can become a three-lane "car park" during rush hour.
_	In his view, Judaism is "an untouchable sanctuary which must not be subjected to human judgment nor subordinated to human considerations" and "progress is valid only to the extent that it does not interfere with religion".
_	To the extent that such a statement can be said to be anything other than general in nature, it applies to Martin in respect to his elevation of garden design to the realm of art (as differentiated from design); a concept virtually unheard of in the Australian context and still in embryonic form internationally.
_	To the extent that governance relations restrict this basic freedom, “they constitute a structure of domination, the members are not self-determining, and the society is unfree."
_	The East Germans had made significant renovations to the building to the extent that it was not recognized by architects looking for it after 1989.
_	The count of ethnic Wayana individuals is further complicated due to the close ties that the Wayana share with other ethnic groups in the region, especially the Aparai in Brazil, to the extent that they are sometimes considered one group, the Wayana-Aparai.
_	The process applies to the states to the extent that the states have incorporated grand juries and/or common law.
_	Devore, in his 1973 masters thesis, tweaked Codd's rules to greatly reduce the size of Codd's design, to the extent that it could be implemented in the computers of that time.
_	Despite his clarification that the statement made was taken out of context and publicized, the criticism, primarily on social media, continued to the extent that prior to the film's release, campaigns calling for boycotting the film began, on ground that Khan was "anti-national".
_	It has been suggested that Palestinian rabbis interacted more with the common folk than their Babylonian counterparts, to the extent that several Palestinian sources depict them "dining and partying together"; they were also on more familiar terms, addressing their fellow Palestinians as "my son" or "my daughter".
_	To the extent that it might be referred to in Soviet/Russian usage by any one person's name, it was known (at least at a somewhat earlier stage of development) as a Kamenev centrifuge (after Evgeni Kamenev.)
_	Park, the structures will be maintained, but only to the extent that they will not be allowed to fall over or otherwise deteriorate in a major way.
_	Ziyarat Amin Allah seems to have a high significance to the extent that for instance according to Imam al-Baqir as the fifth Imam of Shia Islam, whoever among Shia Muslims recites it (Ziyarat Amin Allah) by Ali ibn Abi Talib’s tomb or even when he/she is by the tomb of other (Shia) Imams, the (most high) God carries the Ziyarat and supplication to Jannah (paradise) in a letter of light, and in fact it will be signed by the Islamic Prophet Muhammad’s seal, and this is going to be kept until the occasion this is delivered to the promised Mahdi who is regarded as the descendants of Muhammad and subsequently he will welcome the owner of that by good news, salutation and generosity.
_	Home equity indebtedness is defined as any indebtedness secured by a qualified residence to the extent that the aggregate amount does not exceed 1) the fair market value of that qualified residence, minus 2) the amount of acquisition indebtedness with respect to that residence.
_	To the extent that a person is fearful of social encounters with unfamiliar others, some people may experience anxiety particularly during interactions with outgroup members, or people who share different group memberships (i.e., by race, ethnicity, class, gender, etc.).
_	The HHS recommendation on scheduling is binding to the extent that if HHS recommends, based on its medical and scientific evaluation, that the substance not be controlled, then the DEA may not control the substance.
_	Anti-Mosaddegh material were repeatedly aired on the radio channel to the extent that Iranian staff at the BBC Persian radio went on strike to protest the move.
_	Gadolinium possesses unusual metallurgical properties, to the extent that as little as 1% of gadolinium can significantly improve the workability and resistance to oxidation at high temperatures of iron, chromium, and related metals.
_	To the extent that they do, however, one could argue that they are not unified.
_	To the extent that history is continuous and ungeneralizable, all systems of periodization are more or less arbitrary.
_	The report did not confirm a diagnosis of "Generalised Anxiety Disorder" by a witness called by the defence, "No evidence could be found to indicate that Mr Pistorius suffered from anxiety to the extent that it impaired his functioning prior to the incident in February 2013."
_	Some political analysts allege that had he won the election he was going to becoming too powerful to the extent that he was going to overshadow longstanding political players from the Matabeleland region and this was going to cause serious challenges in the body politic of Zimbabwe.
_	The Daorsi had suffered attacks from the Delmatae to the extent that they requested Roman aid.
_	A modern view agrees to the extent that 10 of the essays can be shown to have been written by William (for his father) in 1615, at a time when Thomas Hobbes was his tutor.
_	Article 96 gives a definition of "computer program", and reiterates the criteria for copyright protection: the work is only protected to the extent that it is the author's own intellectual creation, and the ideas and principles underlying any of the elements of the program,
_	The court reasoned that with literary works a non-literal element is protected to the extent that it is an expression of an idea rather than the idea itself.
_	In a similar fashion to the world of Robert E Howard's Conan and of Jack London novels, civilization is seen as having a softening and corrupting influence in comparison to the hardy Ahrmenee and the Horseclans, although not to the extent that they outweigh the peace and prosperity that Milo and others work towards.
_	Chemotherapy is teratogenic during pregnancy, especially during the first trimester, to the extent that abortion usually is recommended if pregnancy in this period is found during chemotherapy.
_	In other words, Weber argued that social phenomena can be understood scientifically only to the extent that they are captured by models of the behaviour of purposeful individuals—models that Weber called "ideal types"—from which actual historical events necessarily deviate due to accidental and irrational factors.
_	Also, much of her work is read from a biographical perspective because of the posthumous publication of her love letters to Ignacio Cepeda, to the extent that her life has overshadowed the wider cultural significance of her literary output.
_	If a court does not have "personal" jurisdiction over a party, its rulings or decrees cannot be enforced upon that party, except by comity; i.e., to the extent that the sovereign which has jurisdiction over the party allows the court to enforce them upon that party.
_	To the extent that there is democracy in today's Algeria, it is founded in three pieces of legislation:
_	In "Situated Action: A Symbolic Interpretation" Vera and Simon wrote: " ... the systems usually regarded as exemplifying Situated Action are thoroughly symbolic (and representational), and, to the extent that they are limited in these respects, have doubtful prospects for extension to complex tasks"
_	He was reportedly disproportionately tall, to the extent that his hands reached his knees while standing.
_	Laettner was widely reviled by opposing fans throughout his career, to the extent that more than 20 years after graduating from Duke, he was voted the most hated college basketball player in history in an ESPN online poll.
_	By the late 19 century, cash crops in the region were being rapidly expanded to the extent that by 1914 there were 475 thousand dunam of olive groves (about 47.5 thousand hectares or 112 thousand acres) across the area that is now Israel and the Palestinian territories.
_	On 3 February 1965 the court, in "Airlines of New South Wales Pty Ltd v New South Wales (No 2)", found that air navigation within a state can be regulated by the Commonwealth to the extent that it provides for the safety of, or prevention of physical interference with, interstate or foreign air navigation.
_	The injury even sickened media personality Robert Walls, who was watching the match on television, to the extent that he had to turn off his television.
_	By July 1917, depth charges had developed to the extent that settings of between were possible.
_	However, in some circumstances the normal legislative procedure is radically accelerated to the extent that the proposed law, or Bill, appears to bounce back and forth between the two chambers like a ping-pong ball.
_	The legislative history explains that literary works include "computer programs to the extent that they incorporate authorship in the programmer's expression of original ideas, as distinguished from the ideas themselves" (p. 18).
_	Lee Kiho is considered to be one of South Korea’s most unusual writers to the extent that one critic has declared that the conventions of a story cannot be applied to Lee’s work.
_	Kirya Balaki Kebba was an astute and courageous politician, who disagreed with the Milton Obote II Government to the extent that he had to flee for safety into exile in the Republic of Kenya.
_	In its original decision, the Court had ruled that was unconstitutional under the Sixteenth Amendment to the extent that the statute purported to tax, as income, a recovery for a nonphysical personal injury for mental distress and loss of reputation not received in lieu of taxable income such as lost wages or earnings.
_	Subsidizing displacees under the URA can be very beneficial in some cases, to the extent that the Act will provide an owner with an improved living situation.
_	Case Farms argued, to the extent that an agency relationship existed, the scope of that agency was limited solely to informing recruits about the availability of work at Case Farms’ processing plant.
_	Metrovision, the area's economic development chamber, stated that they had secured guarantees for purchasing suites, season tickets and club seating from businesses to the extent that there was a waiting list for suites.
_	The arts, he argues, “cannot ascertain truth or knowledge,” and the humanities do so only to the extent that they emulate the sciences.
_	This term is often used in the field of metallurgy to refer to the extent that an alloying element will dissolve into the base metal without forming a separate phase.
_	Goldfinger has an obsession with gold to the extent that academic Elizabeth Ladenson says that he is "a walking tautology".
_	Progressive ratio reinforcement schedules provide information about the extent that a pharmacological agent is reinforcing through the breakpoint.
_	He is very nosy about Chuck's personal life (to the extent that he doesn't see why Chuck would object to Morgan knowing his ATM PIN) and believes his approval of Chuck's girlfriends is important.
_	When the aircraft was at , Bajdak put it into a shallow dive and pulled up abruptly at high speed, at which point the wing fabric began to tear rapidly, to the extent that it could be seen from the ground.
_	Ohio Republican Party political director Jason Mauk said: """To the extent that voters in that district were sending a message to the Republican Party at the state or national level, we have heard that message and we will continue to listen to their concerns.""
_	He had previously complained of the poverty of his diocese to the extent that, when his plan to become abbot of Malmesbury was blocked by Earl Godwin in 1055, he had abandoned his duties and left to become a monk at in France.
_	A spokesperson cited the film's "candid and clinical discussion of homosexuality" and its "overtly expressed pleas for social acceptance of the homosexual, to the extent that he be made socially tolerable".
_	As such, one may judge that others "have integrity" to the extent that they act according to the values, beliefs and principles they claim to hold.
_	Phatudi became involved in the nascent Lebowa nation building exercise and had risen in prominence to the extent that when Lebowa was granted self-government on 2 October 1972, Phatudi was appointed Minister for Education before his election as Chief Minister on 8 May 1973.
_	Simon Cowell was alerted to the interest shown by the public, and pursued the two reluctant actors for the next four months to record the song, to the extent that Robson Green threatened legal action to stop Cowell harassing them.
_	Many species, particularly in North America, are highly variable to the extent that they cannot be separated without dissection in many cases.
_	To the extent that kibbutzim, moshavim, and moshavim shitufiim are agricultural cooperatives based on individual membership, the national settlement movements in Israel are viewed as secondary cooperatives or cooperative federations, whose members are lower-level primary cooperatives.
_	Considering the poor state of the property in later years, it is possible that funding was not provided and restoration works were not undertaken or were not undertaken to the extent that was required.
_	Once infants begin to form into toddlers, they begin to test out their freedoms and the extent that they should go with their freedoms.
_	Language can be artistic to the extent that artists use language as a source of creativity in art, poetry, calligraphy or as a metaphor to address themes as cultural diversity and the vulnerability of the individual in a globalizing world.
_	To the extent that the accretion of Siletzia to North America can be given a definite date most studies give it as about 50 Ma.
_	As Kodhai grew into a maiden, her love and devotion for Ranganatha (the reclining form of Vishnu) grew to the extent that she decided to marry none but the Ranganatha himself.
_	"Takao", "Maya" and "Atago" spent their time primarily escorting carriers, while "Chōkai" played perhaps the most influential part; as flagship of Vice-Admiral Mikawa's strike force, "Chōkai" led the Japanese forces to victory at the Battle of Savo Island on 8 August 1942, inflicting what has been credited as the worst blue-water defeat in United States Navy history by sinking three American cruisers and severely damaging a fourth, as well as damaging the Australian cruiser "Canberra" to the extent that she had to be scuttled without any of the Japanese ships taking more than superficial damage, although "Chōkai" took the most hits.
_	But his influence could be profound in 1874 he criticised her impending Report of Land Tenure in India to the extent that it was never published because she "could lose influence".
_	The idea is that polymers tend to be etched easily by oxygen, fluorine, chlorine or other reactive gases to the extent that a pattern defined using a polymeric mask is rapidly degraded during plasma etching.
_	The authority of family hierarchy and superiors in the Confucian political hierarchy was recognized to the extent that it did not contradict divine prerogatives.
_	In the federal tax case of "Smith v. United States", the United States Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit stated that the taxpayer's: ". . . . invocation of the Fair Debt Collection Act is entirely without merit, as the statute expressly excludes 'any officer or employee of the United States . . . to the extent that collecting or attempting to collect any debt is in the performance of his official duties' from the definition of 'debt collector.' 15 U.S.C. section 1692a(6)(C)."
_	On 'Belladonna', Smith's liquid guitar relaxes Sioux to the extent that she drops a few masks to reveal her vulnerability.
_	The maintenance shops in San Bernardino are still in use by BNSF Railway, although not to the extent that they were used in the 20th century.
_	On release in spring 1974, the film was praised for its offbeat comedy mixed with high suspense and tragedy and Eastwood's acting performance was noted by critics to the extent that Clint himself believed it was Oscar worthy.
_	It as in Mount Sion that Andy took up the hurley for the first time having been encouraged to do so by Brothers Malone and O'Connor and he adapted to the game in style to the extent that he developed into one of the best players in the school, up there with the man who was to become his great friend and colleague with Mount Sion, Waterford and Munster, John Keane.
_	Again, in this phase, children try to find out the extent that they can go until someone stops them.
_	Established in 1996 to repeal the Abortion and Sterilisation Act (to the extent that the latter was applicable to abortion), the Choice on Termination of Pregnancy Act stressed that "termination of pregnancy is not a form of contraception or population control," and divided pregnancy into three trimesters.
_	The coverage upset Jackson, and damaged his health; Jackson's health had deteriorated to the extent that he canceled the remainder of his "Dangerous" World Tour and went into rehabilitation.
_	Nevertheless, the traditions are often strongly held; students at Oxford and Cambridge frequently believe that theirs is the only correct style, to the extent that the till end is often known as the "Cambridge End", and the other as the "Oxford End".
_	To the extent that an importer fails to use reasonable care, Customs may impose a penalty.
_	The main reason for this is the strange obsession of Muslim and Hindu elites of subcontinent with English to the extent that they have criminally neglected literary pursuits in local languages (there are some exceptions but that proves the point rather than refute it).
_	Unlike most concept cars, it is mechanically functional to the extent that it can be driven.
_	In some traditional communities, such as in Kandal Province in Cambodia, it was uncommon for Buddhists to slaughter animals, to the extent that meat had to be bought from not-Buddhists.
_	To the extent that human physiology contains a physical/chemical aspect (broken bones, impinging tumours on vital nerves, severed arteries, or severe tissue damage, significant hormonal or chemical imbalances, severe microbial invasion, and the like), a mechanic-material approach will produce effective results, witness the ‘miracles’ of Western emergency medicine, but in the realm of internal ‘medicine’, there are no cures, only the suppression of symptoms or long-term disease and disorder management using chemical means, mostly synthetic, the intellect seeing no difference between a natural ‘chemical’ and a synthesized one.
_	To the extent that cyber-ethnography is similar to ethnography in a localized space, it will raise similar ethical considerations.
_	Once they grasp that poverty is not simply poverty but that it has "a revolutionary, subversive side, which will overthrow the old society", science - Communist thinking, to the extent that it incorporates this subversive side - "has ceased to be doctrinaire and has become revolutionary."
_	It is the fullest account of Edwards' life but mingles fact with fiction to the extent that it has been listed in bibliographies of American fiction.
_	On his return to Britain in 1954, he found he faced hostility for having left the Goons to the extent that his picture had been excised from early pictures and wasn't replaced until Bentine complained to BBC Director-General Michael Checkland in the 1990s.
_	Asturias shows how dictatorship corrupts people and destroys their values to the extent that compassion for one's companion in distress ceases to exist."
_	For those living outside British Columbia, it is difficult to convey the extent that the CPR empire covered BC.
_	But, to the extent that students of honors colleges and programs are isolated among themselves – by way of exclusive classes or activities or living quarters – the overall benefits might accrue in isolation, while at the same time, can also be a drain on quality academic environment for the larger student population who otherwise would benefit from more interaction with exceptional students.
_	The delays frustrated locals to the extent that they made representations to the government over their concerns at the lack of progress.
_	Mather moved to a boarding house in the Bunker Hill neighborhood, where she was said to become involved with a woman referred to only as "Beau" Justema believes "Beau" was Mather's lover and patron, to the extent that soon after the two met Mather opened her first professional photography studio.
_	Shelley was particularly captivated by Jane's singing voice, to the extent that some commentators have suggested it had a hypnotic effect on him.
_	To the extent that the helmet is jewelled, such decoration is largely confined to the elements associated with the dragons.
_	The Kings County Department of Public Health stated that it would continue its investigation but that their preliminary determination was "that to the extent that a cluster may exist, it is most likely a random event unrelated to any environmental exposure unique to Kettleman City."
_	To the extent that cross-examination is necessary to bring out the truth, the party must have it.
_	The saving grace, to the extent that there was any, was the choreography by Mr. Bennett (who also served as director and partial librettist) and the high point of the production was Tommy Tune's long-legged, high-kicking dance up a set of stairs on a stage filled with balloons.
_	The "Murray" spelling is not used for the geographical area, which is "Moray", but it became the commonest form of the surname, especially among Scottish emigrants, to the extent that the surname "Murray" is now much more common than the original surname "Moray".
_	Since then the estate has seen a period of decline to the extent that it is now recognised as one of the most relatively deprived areas of the district.
_	Ntak Ibesit was seriously affected by the Nigerian civil war, to the extent that the "Ummanis" and other foreign traders who settled and carried out business at Ekpene Okpo (the river port of the town) left and did not return.
_	Firstly, many are sexually dimorphic to the extent that females and males of the same species were, for some time, placed in different genera; and secondly, some of the species are so similar that they can only be separated by considering details of the male genitalia.
_	The Socialist Sunday Schools along with the Labour Church were impeded by a lack of their own premises and met objections to hiring of suitable halls to the extent that in 1907 London County Council evicted five branches out of hired school buildings.
_	He was also known to treat the completed screenplay with great fidelity, to the extent that some of his screenwriters remarked on how closely the finished film realised their intentions.
_	Moreover, even to the extent that the principal components of IIAs are similar across most of the agreements, substantial divergences can be found in the details of these provisions.
_	Grimthorpe was noted for his aversion to the Perpendicular — to the extent that he would have sections he disliked demolished as "too rotten" rather than remade.
_	Conditions did improve during the 1920s though, to the extent that by 1930, the building was little more than a hospital caring for sick townspeople, mainly the elderly.
_	Neersville has recently had difficulty maintaining volunteer support, to the extent that the company lost its license to carry patients as a volunteer company.
_	Peer-to-peer system can be trusted as far as the operators of the various servers can be trusted or to the extent that the architecture of the peer-to-peer system limits the amount of information available to any single server and the server operators can be trusted not to cooperate to combine the information they hold.
_	In her younger years, Murray often was devastated by the end of these relationships, to the extent that she was hospitalized for psychiatric treatment twice, in 1937 and in 1940.
_	These laws are true to the extent that the ear is sensitive to the frequency and amplitude of the acoustic waves, and further, is able to resolve the differences in their frequency.
_	By 1658, the hajduks had mastered Herzegovina to the extent that they "forced taxes on all villages towards Gacko".
_	The Women's Image Awards because to the extent that women's voices remain silent everyone is robbed of their contribution.
_	The Red Ghost can become transparent or invisible when in intangible form, to the extent that Reed Richards was unable to detect him hiding in the same spacecraft over several days with sensitive equipment.
_	As a result, Nomura had a large quantity of images redrawn, to the extent that "the entire production was in jeopardy."
_	The next day, the text proclaims that Stephen was led out to be judged before the crowd, but instead Stephen recounts a supposed prophecy by Nathan of Jesus' coming, which annoys the guards to the extent that they bind him and take him to the head of the guard.
_	The bill would direct the Secretary to give priority to grant applicants to the extent that they are from states that:
_	At high levels of play, the backhand serve has become popular to the extent that forehand serves have become fairly rare at a high level of play.
_	Gerard was a patron of learning, to the extent that he urged at least one of his clergy to study
_	His many children and grandchildren married among all the Miami kinship groups to the extent that over one-fourth of the current Indiana Miami tribe can claim descendency from him.
_	NASA was designated as a technical advisor for the FCC and the communications corporation to the extent that would aid the nation.
_	the average weekly wage during the war was increased by between 8–12 per cent, it was not enough to keep up with inflation and as a result there was considerable discontent amongst workers, to the extent that industrial action followed.
_	By this time, public confidence in the Treasury had grown to the extent that a dollar in gold was worth only $1.05 in greenbacks.
_	This report affected the running of the hospital to the extent that patients had improved rights that allowed them to enter or leave the hospital at will, unless they were suffering from a condition that gave demonstrable reasons to detain the patient.
_	To the extent that punitive methods often involve incarceration, thereby preventing further crimes being committed by the individual, they can also be considered preventive.
_	"Though most Americans do not realize it, America is penetrated by Russian military intelligence to the extent that arms caches lie in wait for use by Russian special forces."
_	In Allied-occupied Austria, the Russian term "poputchik" (fellow traveller) was translated into German as "Mitläufer", and they were considered to be "lesser offenders" (a person who, although not formally charged with participation in war crimes, was sufficiently involved with the Nazi regime to the extent that the Allied authorities could not legally exonerate them).
_	Cervantes says in the "Don Quixot" (in 1604) that in Catalonia their name was pedreñal, to the extent that pedreñal lock means miquelet lock, the long-barreled wheel lock pistols were not called pedreñals.
_	Following the First World War regular and special flights increased significantly to the extent that some modern flight are so commercial that thousands of covers are carried that no pilot could ever possibly sign.
_	In addition they have also noted the overuse of harem antics and cliches to the extent that the series often feels more like an ecchi harem comedy as opposed to a serious sci-fi/horror series.
_	To the extent that satire exists in MDEs comedy, it feels like more of rationalization than a reason for the shock itself."
_	The rationale was that UNEP's status as a "programme", rather than an "organization" in the tradition of the World Health Organization or the World Meteorological Organization, weakened it to the extent that it was no longer fit for purpose given current knowledge of the state of the planet.
_	"Furthermore, we do not see the necessity for an employer to allow events to unfold to the extent that the disruption of the office and the destruction of working relationships is manifest before taking action."
_	Telescope operation was automated to the extent that the survey could be run all night without observer intervention.
_	The Stadtbahn is well known in transport circles around the world for pioneering the concept of operating trams on train tracks, to achieve a more effective and attractive public transport system, to the extent that this is often known as the Karlsruhe model tram-train system.
_	Such substitutes would, I think, be unsatisfactory or inadequate only to the extent that the present activities do in fact serve religious goals.
_	The reformer party in the Legislative Assembly desired that the Jury system be reformed, to the extent that they passed a "Jury Law Amendment Bill" no less than four times over eight years.
_	Miles and like-minded advocates seek to expand personhood to great apes, to the extent that—eventually—legal rights of personhood would be conferred under the law.
_	The absence of hierarchic leadership within the Council has caused the departments to acquire a very considerable autonomy, to the extent that the federal executive has been characterised as "seven co-existing departmental governments."
_	The country's highly centralised power structure concentrated political decisions not on any parliament nor even on government ministers but on the Central Committee and Politburo of the ruling party, although this stark reality was softened to the extent that influential Central Committee members were often also Volkstag members.
_	In 1945 it was estimated that 5000 miners in the South Wales region were affected by the condition to the extent that they could not work in the coal industry.
_	While the Khitans did not associate Buddhism with the Chinese people because it was seen more as a Uyghur religion and thus not the religion of the Chinese, whom they saw as inferior, what is not clear is the extent that Buddhism penetrated the Khitan population, as the bulk of Buddhist shrines and temples were located in the southern part of the domains of the Liao where the largely Chinese sedentary population resided.
_	However, it has now become very popular among the "middle class and intelligentsia, to the extent that it has become very "de rigueur" and a mark of Indonesian-ness."
_	The convictions were accordingly upheld, but the sentences were ordered to run concurrently, to the extent that the effective period of imprisonment was seventeen years.
_	To avoid political troubles, Takahisa quickly associated himself with "Shōgun" Tokugawa Tsunayoshi's favorite, Yanagisawa Yoshiyasu, to the extent that he was derided by his peers as "Yanagisawa's footmat".
_	Setting aside the order of the SCA in "Fourie"'s case, the court declared that the common-law definition of marriage was unconstitutional and invalid to the extent that it does not permit same-sex couples to enjoy the same status, benefits and responsibilities as those accorded to heterosexual couples.
_	For Jains, their scriptures represent the literal words of Mahāvīra and the other fordmakers only to the extent that the Agama is a series of beginning-less, endless and fixed truths, a tradition without any origin, human or divine, which in this world age has been channelled through Sudharma, the last of Mahavira's disciples to survive.
_	He was secretive, even towards his own family to the extent that they did not truly appreciate his origins.
_	Throughout 1989, Gaillot continued to cause considerable tension within the French Bishops' Conference, to the extent that the members of the episcopate voted to censure him.
_	His physical state rapidly deteriorated to the extent that he weighed only thirty-eight kilos.
_	This scepticism arises partly because the railways in the area are heavily used by scheduled passenger trains, to the extent that Crossrail trains seem unlikely to progress to Dartford unless new tracks were laid to boost local rail capacity.
_	In his 1756 meditation text "Nama-rupa-nibbinda Shu-bwe" Medawi argues that the decline of the Buddha's "religion of practice" (paṭipatti sāsana) is individual, only to the extent that someone has given up practicing has the sasana truly declined:
_	Its quality and prestige remain intact to the extent that it long withstood massive sugar consumption.
_	Now, when new churches are built, to the extent that they still are, specialist architects are not necessarily required, and increasingly functiional architecture is preferred.
_	Galway were forced to rely on a lot of young inexperienced players, but as the season drew to a climax Kenna engendered a real team spirit in the side to the extent that over the last seven games United collected five wins, a draw and one loss.
_	To the extent that "C implies E" then "Not-E must also imply Not-C".
_	Payments to S shareholders by the corporation are distributed tax-free to the extent that the distributed earnings were previously taxed.
_	It has a goal of carrying out that vision to the extent that five million churches are planted around the world and a billion people are converted.
_	Book 8: A Touch of Magic: Lauren's little brother, Max, begins to neglect his dog, Buddy, to the extent that Buddy runs away.
_	"The human being himself, to the extent that he makes sound use of his senses, is the most exact physical apparatus that can exist."
_	“In some places, they kill slaves and bury them with their masters in order to serve them in the afterlife, this practice is carried out to the extent that many load a ship with more than sixty slaves, fill it up with food and drink, place the dead on board, and the entire vessel including live slaves buried in the earth (Quirino and Garcia, 1958)”
_	By 1836, the number of pupils had increased to the extent that he opened another gym in another part of the city.
_	In 1907 her health deteriorated to the extent that she was forced to lead a primarily sedentary life, receiving visitors and directing her household from a chaiselonge.
_	The preacher's message had a profound effect on Banyard, to the extent that he became teetotal and regularly attended the church.
_	Thus, predictive coding inverts the conventional view of perception as a mostly bottom-up process, suggesting that it is largely constrained by prior predictions, where signals from the external world only shape perception to the extent that they are propagated up the cortical hierarchy in the form of prediction error.
_	Due to increased investment in forestry management and production, Turkey became recognized for its timber industry, to the extent that its supplies were viewed as competitive within a globalized international context.
_	However, she always wanted to be a step ahead of her daughter, constantly feeling jealous of her and wanting to put her down, to the extent that she even allowed her brother, Georg Ludwig of Holstein-Gottorp to openly displaying his strong liking for Sophie, so much so that he kissed her on the lips.
_	'Tibetan singing bowls' have as a result become a prominent visual and musical symbol of Tibet, to the extent that the most prevalent modern representation of Tibet within the US is that of bowls played by Americans.
_	Goods bought by the debtor under an instalment-sale transaction also form part of the free residue, to the extent that their market value exceeds the balance outstanding in terms of the transaction.
_	When 7 World Trade Center collapsed, debris caused substantial damage and contamination to the Borough of Manhattan Community College's Fiterman Hall building, located adjacent at 30 West Broadway, to the extent that the building was not salvageable.
_	To the extent that these beliefs are co-extensive with the six principles of Muggletonian belief, then they are redundant.
_	It gets very busy during the summer months, namely from March to October, to the extent that it becomes a slot coordinated airport.
_	Federal common law is valid only to the extent that Congress has not repealed the common law.
_	Senior political columnist for "Newsweek" and "The Daily Beast" John Avlon lauded Obama for "an audacious speech to the extent that Obama sought to reclaim politicized concepts like American exceptionalism from their conservative contexts, making the case that the combination of diversity and opportunity makes the American Dream possible for each new generation."
_	However, if the loading is rapidly applied and large enough, or is repeated many times (e.g. earthquake shaking, storm wave loading) such that the water does not flow out before the next cycle of load is applied, the water pressures may build to the extent that it exceeds the force (contact stresses) between the grains of soil that keep them in contact.
_	To the extent that at that time the Community dealt with these matters at all, they were being handled intergovernmentally, principally in European Political Cooperation (EPC).
_	The intent behind dependency injection is to decouple objects to the extent that no client code has to be changed simply because an object it depends on needs to be changed to a different one.
_	Until these drainage works the two lochs nearly met and often did during flooding, to the extent that early writers such as Boece, Hollings and Petruccio Ubaldini regarded the lochs as one, using the name 'Garnoth' or 'Garnott'.
_	As the year progressed, concerns about his heart continued, to the extent that in May it was suggested he go for tests at the Harefield Hospital.
_	Many minor problems present in the original Windows 98 were found and fixed which make it, according to many, the most stable release of Windows 9x family—to the extent that commentators used to say that Windows 98's beta version was more stable than Windows 95's final (gamma) version.
_	They were gradually absorbed into the line infantry becoming a hybrid type that proved successful against the French, to the extent that Napoleon recruited several units of Austrian army Grenzer to his own army after victory over Austria in 1809 compelled the Austrians to cede territories from which they were traditionally recruited.
_	According to OSM, "[t]o the extent that low income populations are prevalent in the coalfields, the impacts of mountaintop mining are felt disproportionately by these environmental justice populations".
_	Green praised "the ways in which the manga plays with perception, senses, and connection with alien intelligence are the ways in which sci-fi writing is made interesting", but noted that "it doesn't manage that to the extent that the series becomes one of the more urgently involving that you'll read."
_	According to "Artforum" magazine, "Huey's process defamiliarizes...objects to the extent that they become alien, worthy of scrutiny."
_	This design proved popular with builders, home-buyers and other architects in Seattle's rapidly growing residential neighborhoods and streetcar suburbs, to the extent that some blocks of Seattle's Capitol Hill neighborhood developed around 1910 were built almost entirely according to this plan.
_	An example of the former is evidenced in his preference for the Western concept of divorce, how everyone supposedly does it—to the extent that it’s almost a fad.
_	During the early eighties 1 Parachute Battalion had grown in size to the extent that it had eight full-time rifle companies on strength.
_	On 24 December 2010, judges Frank Stock, Susan Kwan and Johnson Lam of the Court of Appeal overturned the judgment of the lower court to the extent that the claim for wrongful termination of contract was dismissed.
_	In the wake of the successful employment of air-dropped nuclear weapons against Hiroshima and Nagasaki to effectively end World War II, SAC became the focus of the nation's nuclear strike capability, to the extent that Joint Chiefs of Staff (JCS) Publication 1259/27 on 12 December 1946 identified that, "...the 'air atomic' strategic air force should only come under the orders of the JCS."
_	In 2009, use of leisure craft at Littlehampton rose to the extent that at least 200 more moorings were required.
_	Dilution of indoor pollutants with outdoor air is effective to the extent that outdoor air is free of harmful pollutants.
_	In Zürich, Korsakov had felt his position secure to the extent that he hadn't made a single inspection of the line, nor had he removed his baggage or hospitals to a safe distance; instead, everything was left jumbled up in the city.
_	To the extent that a popular vote was held, it was primarily directed to filling the office of Vice President.
_	According to Professor Leerssen, "he was also one of the few native literati to embrace the new order even to the extent that he was in the employ of Trinity College for a period in the early to mid-1590s, and was also one of those involved with the Gaelic translation of the New Testament, undertaken for purposes of proselytization by the protestant archbishop of Tuam."
_	Causal notions are important in general relativity to the extent that the existence of an arrow of time demands that the universe's semi-Riemannian manifold be orientable, so that "future" and "past" are globally definable quantities.
_	The court granted the order to the extent that those sections authorised the search and seizure of property where there were no reasonable grounds for suspecting that a specified offence had been committed.
_	For instance, the rule regarding comparative advertising in Canada appears to be inconsistent with both functions to the extent that prohibiting a company to use a competitor's name in order to convey correct information to consumers makes communication less efficient and more costly (linguistic function), and makes it hard for the company to explain why the products it sells are different from the competitor's, which would create a trust problem (trust function)
_	It continued to stage variety shows, even when the other venues converted to screening films, but the quality of these declined to the extent that it ended staging "We never clothe 'em" shows, soft core striptease.
_	Directed by Stéphane Bernasconi, the series has been praised for being "generally faithful" to the original comics, to the extent that the animation was directly adopted from Hergé's original panels.
_	They also developed the list of Hellenistic lots to the extent that they became historically known as Arabic parts, for which reason it is often wrongly claimed that the Arabic astrologers invented their use, whereas they are clearly known to have been an important feature of Hellenistic astrology.
_	To the extent that these desired outcomes occurred, and benefited the lives of students in ways that might never be measurably through quantitative means, those aspects of many models were successful.
_	The blisters usually affect the palate or oropharynx and are often long lived to the extent that patients burst them for symptomatic relief.
_	In his 1997 book "Movies as Politics", Jonathan Rosenbaum makes a case for "Black Girl" as the symbolic genesis of sub-Saharan African filmmaking, at least to the extent that the authorship belonged to a born and bred African.
_	To the extent that she represents the devil and shuts off the Geneverse world, she foreshadows final series regular, DCI Jim Keats, a demon who obliterates the meticulously created Geneverse purgatory's façade, reveals the characters' prior deaths, and tempts them to come to hell.
_	When the city rejected this demand, resentment from the countryside region grew still larger to the extent that the city feared an attack.
_	For this purpose, the inputs in production must moreover be used in an economical way, and care must be taken not to waste resources to the extent that this would mean additional costs for an enterprise, or reduce productivity.
_	He famously wrote, "...the confidential character of patient-psychotherapist communications must yield to the extent that disclosure is essential to avert danger to others.
_	Though used by several artists, White's attachment to the instrument raised its popularity to the extent that Eastwood Guitars began producing a modified replica around 2000.
_	Overgrazing by sheep in Grisedale Common has damaged the vegetation to the extent that it has needed careful management.
_	Nonrenormalizable interactions are weak only to the extent that the Planck scale is large.
_	Language can be artistic to the extent that artists use it as a source of creativity in art, poetry, calligraphy or as a metaphor to address themes as cultural diversity and the vulnerability of the individual in a globalizing world.
_	Wear attested to his Mr. World Canada duties preventing him from pursuing an acting career to the extent that he would have liked.
_	This caused a great retreat in social use of Catalan and knowledge of the language, to the extent that Spanish passed Catalan as a mother tongue for the first time in the history of Catalonia.
_	Efforts by the War Department to clarify the issue were rebuffed by the Navy to the extent that the Secretary of War warned President Herbert Hoover in 1930 that the situation was endangering national defense.
_	They argued that the motives of politicians are "To come to power, to stay in power and, to the extent that they can, to keep control over money."
_	This version was a staple of any Soviet holiday dinner, especially of a Novy God (New Year's Eve) dinner (to the extent that its presence was considered on a par with Soviet Champagne or mandarin oranges), due to availability of components in winter.
_	Reports and commentary following the outbreak have focused on the extent that prison officials may have been complicit in the escape, and on whether the escaped prisoners can be expected to join in larger-scale attacks.
_	The novel depicts a post-apocalyptic society that has sought to banish privilege and envy, to the extent that people will even have their faces surgically altered in order to appear neither too beautiful nor too ugly.
_	The rate of effort required to bring stores forward was of significant concern to the Australian corps commander, Lieutenant General Stanley Savige, to the extent that his orders to the commander of the 11th Brigade stipulated no further advances in the sector, with the exception of patrolling to prevent the movement of Japanese reinforcements towards the south, and for information gathering purposes.
_	Likewise, James McDonald has expressed the view that extreme groups undermined serious scientific investigation, stating that a "bizarre 'literature' of pseudo-scientific discussion" on "spaceships bringing messengers of terrestrial salvation and occult truth" had been "one of the prime factors in discouraging serious scientists from looking into the UFO matter to the extent that might have led them to recognize quickly enough that cultism and wishful thinking have nothing to do with the core of the UFO problem."
_	He switched Graham Teasdale (a forward struggling so badly that he was thinking about returning to a bush league) in to the ruck and Teasdale dominated to the extent that he won the Brownlow medal in a canter.
_	Pursuant to this clause, the CAN-SPAM Act preempts any state regulation of commercial electronic messages, "except to the extent that any statute ... prohibits falsity or deception."
_	He admits that his sister's progress in sports surprised him to the extent that shortly, wrestling with his younger sister became a difficult challenge and served as a great training for him.
_	In the end Místico frustrated Psicosis to the extent that he landed a low blow on Místico in clear view of the referee, earning a disqualification for his team, leaving Místico, Rayo de Jalisco, Jr. and Blue Panther the victors in the longest match of the night at 22:45.
_	Although private retailing should increase competition in principle, in many cases producers have entered into exclusive marketing agreements with distributors for the market region, to the extent that each brand is often only available from a single distributor in the state (although large retailers such as Costco have been able to take some advantage of the law and in some cases have introduced their own house brands).
_	To the extent that military history adds to a place's culture, Springfield's history is notably rich, beginning with the 1675 Attack on Springfield during King Philip's War.
_	With self-holding tapers, the male and female wedge together and bind to each other to the extent that the forces of drilling can be resisted without a drawbar, and the tool will stay in the spindle when idle.
_	Its proximity to a large gasworks resulted in it being damaged by bombs several times during World War II, to the extent that it was Brighton's most bombed building.
_	He was also critical of the curvature of space of general relativity, to the extent that he claimed that an absolute time was essential to astronomy (Larmor 1924, 1927).
_	The English Wiktionary does not rely on bots to the extent that some other editions do.
_	Notable Beat writers such as Kerouac, Ginsberg, and Gary Snyder were drawn to Buddhism to the extent that they each, at different periods in their lives, followed a spiritual path in their quests to provide answers to universal questions and concepts.
_	The prisoners are sympathetic toward them because they try to help them to the extent that they can.
_	By 1903 business had grown to the extent that a new location was once again sought.
_	As ruled in Senate vs. Ermita, "the oversight function of Congress may be facilitated by compulsory process only to the extent that it is performed in pursuit of legislation."
_	In the final two films, the Oracle succeeds in unbalancing the Matrix (seeing the simultaneous rises of both Neo and Smith) to the extent that it is almost destroyed.
_	Others have said instead that it is merely overstated, and in response to his habeas corpus petition, the U.S. Government stated in 2009 that it did not contend Zubaydah had any involvement with the 9/11 attacks, or that he had even been a member of al Qaeda, simply because they did not have to: "In simple terms, the issue in this habeas corpus action is Petitioner's conduct", rather than membership or inclination: "Petitioner's personal philosophy is not relevant except to the extent that it is reflected in his actions".
_	Their proportion has steadily grown to the extent that they now constitute around 90% of its students.
_	A right for the employee to be redeployed does not yet exist, except to the extent that the employer must consult about redeployment possibilities when more than 20 employees could be redundant.
_	Sarcopenia may progress to the extent that an older person may lose his or her ability to live independently.
_	In subsequent decades, the term became the dominant frame of shared social existence in Catalonia and no longer carried a passive sense of mere tolerance but rather the active engagement of relations between neighbors and of the full expression of cultural pluralism in which there is public space for all traditions Convivència overlaps semantically with the concept of "civility" ("civisme") to the extent that both may refer to mutual respect in the shared use of public space yet there is an important distinction.
_	Some humiliation roleplay (pup-play and age play in particular) is combined with loyalty and care-giving to the extent that these fetishes can be seen as exercises in trust rather than primarily a humiliation fetish.
_	The fable of Tannakin Skinker was popular in England, and the idea of the pig-faced woman soon entered popular culture, to the extent that by 1654, it was recorded that one of the signs at Bartholomew Fair was "the Signe of the Hoggs-fac'd Gentlewoman".
_	Apparently he met some of his former colleagues before the broadcast and drank to the extent that his broadcast, still known today by his repeated phrase "the fleet's lit up", was so incoherent he was taken off air after a few minutes and suspended for a week by BBC Director-General John Reith.
_	The presence of both Dr. Franklin and Delenn, along with changes to Zack Allan's uniform, further place the events just before episode 409 "Atonement", to the extent that its continuity problems can actually be resolved.
_	This name has over the years achieved an almost official status, to the extent that the 1000-year anniversary was celebrated by a row of tiger sculptures around city hall.
_	Dunnery is rumoured to have demanded full band leadership and control over material, and it's also claimed that he clashed with former creative foil John Beck to the extent that he demanded Beck's expulsion from the band.
_	To the extent that a popular vote was held, it was primarily directed to filling the office of Vice President.
_	To the extent that psychiatry presents these problems as "medical diseases", its methods as "medical treatments", and its clients – especially involuntary – as medically ill patients, it embodies a lie and therefore constitutes a fundamental threat to freedom and dignity.
_	As the Paris segment of the novel begins, Templar and Trelawney have become partners to the extent that Simon, when leaving his traditional "calling card" consisting of the drawing of a stick figure with a halo, is now compelled to add a female figure to the image.
_	According to Ella Chmielewska, the plaques have merged into the landscape of the city to the extent that they are often treated not as works of art, but as a specific element of the urban information system.
_	To the extent that a popular vote was held, it was primarily directed to filling the office of Vice President.
_	As the Russo-Finish 'winter war' only interested the British government to the extent that it offered a pretext for interrupting the traffic of iron ore to Germany, 'Pat' Mackesy, with his experience of war in arctic conditions, was an obvious choice as commander of an expeditionary force.
_	In simple terms, to the extent that people can share common wishes, desires and aspirations, they can commit themselves to work together.
_	Its influence grew to the extent that it incorporated 33 dependent churches and monasteries.
_	This work was successful to the extent that today the tower leans by less than half a centimetre despite its great height.
_	A good example is the unrestrained use of sandblasting to clean smog deposits from soft-stoned buildings — a technique employed in the UK in the 1960s and 1970s — which has damaged the external faces of stonework to the extent that in some cases, later, the stonework has needed to be replaced.
_	McGrillen had developed a fear of "The War of the Worlds" when he was quite young, to the extent that he could not look at the album cover.
_	A simple reverse dictionary, which collates words starting from the end, provides a rough rhyming dictionary to the extent that spelling follows pronunciation.
_	Decroux has been called the "father of modern mime", which is true to the extent that he is the father of his own style or corporeal mime (though he credited Jacques Copeau with paternity, claiming only to have raised the child).
_	To the extent that both men were responsible for delivering a better future for the people there was an inherent overlap between their public profiles.
_	The can in a way be compared with the steer-wrestling events in American rodeos to the extent that they are related expressions of a rural culture that can be traced to the ancient Basque tradition of Iberia. of running in front of bulls.
_	Some forms of Chiac deviate from the original language to the extent that it is nearly incomprehensible to the larger francophone community.
_	Festinger argued that people depend on social reality to determine the subjective validity of their attitudes and opinions, and that they look to their reference group to establish social reality; an opinion or attitude is therefore valid to the extent that it is similar to that of the reference group.
_	Although not a full opt-out, both Poland and the United Kingdom secured clarifications about how the Charter of Fundamental Rights of the European Union, a part of the Treaty of Lisbon, would interact with national law in their countries limiting the extent that European courts would be able to rule on issues related to the Charter if they are brought to courts in Poland or the UK.
_	To the extent that an object's internal distribution of mass differs from a symmetric model, we may use the measured surface gravity to deduce things about the object's internal structure.
_	People who could not buy goods also could not afford to travel to the extent that they had before, so passenger revenues were also down.
_	Critics and admirers tend to agree that Blair's electoral success was based on his ability to occupy the centre ground and appeal to voters across the political spectrum, to the extent that he has been fundamentally at odds with traditional Labour Party values.
_	Born into a family of architects, design was prevalent in Maya's life from the start to the extent that she never even thought about going in any other direction besides art.
_	While the priority question on the technical innovations Childe used is still debated, he established the use of double and triple lanterns for special theatrical effects, to the extent that the equipment involved became generally available through suppliers to other professionals.
_	In this case, to the extent that the decision is factual, the decision-making strategy relates to the level of proof and its application.
_	The victory helped to change the headmaster's mind about the team to the extent that he allowed the school's name to be engraved on the trophy.
_	Therefore, "Monitor's claim may be paid to the extent that the value of the items furnished exceeds any compensation which Monitor may have received from" the prime contractor for the work.
_	Judge Dlott found that the materials presented by Lindback are "almost devoid of factual findings" and overall found that the Lindback exhibits "are not probative even to the extent that they are admissible".
_	Political organizations are constitutional to the extent that they "contain institutionalized mechanisms of power control for the protection of the interests and liberties of the citizenry, including those that may be in the minority".
_	"With regard to press reports citing leaked documents, known as the Panama Papers, the Central Bank of Cyprus announces that it is assessing the information to the extent that it may concern the Cypriot banking system and taking, where necessary, appropriate action."
_	To the extent that fuel is reprocessed on-site, as proposed for the Integral Fast Reactor, opportunities for diversion are further limited.
_	Shortly after its loss, the Commander of Submarine Force Atlantic wrote in the March 1964 issue of the U.S. Naval Institute's monthly journal "Proceedings" that "the Navy had depended upon this performance to the extent that it had asked for and received authority to build 14 of these ships, as well as an additional 11 submarines with very much the same characteristics.
_	AMQP mandates the behavior of the messaging provider and client to the extent that implementations from different vendors are interoperable, in the same way as SMTP, HTTP, FTP, etc. have created interoperable systems.
_	Most patients identified via newborn screening as having this enzyme deficiency were asymptomatic, to the extent that SCADD was removed from screening panels in a number of regions.
_	Club cricket continued to the extent that it could, with large crowds attending the matches.
_	Besides the city-based health services, many city residents make regular use of mission hospitals which are outside the city to the extent that these form part of the health delivery system of the city (Mlambe Hospital and Nguludi).
_	However, at least in the English-speaking world, "O Come, O Come Emmanuel" is associated with one tune more than any other, to the extent that the tune itself is often called "Veni Emmanuel".
_	There are stricter Safety requirements on GBAS systems relative to SBAS systems since GBAS is intended mainly for the landing phase where real-time accuracy and signal integrity control is critical, especially when weather deteriorates to the extent that there is no visibility (CAT-I/II/III conditions) for which SBAS is not intended or suitable.
_	There are not a great many differences; although Margaret Thatcher did make attempts to curtail immigration, it was not to the extent that Powell had proposed in 1968.
_	Catches on the other hand increasingly exploited the gaps revealed by rests which reveal hidden meanings from other lines, to the extent that many began to believe that this is the essence of the catch.
_	The year 1984 was a difficult one for Young, as his first heavy promotional and live concert tour of America strained his vocal cords severely, to the extent that he was forced to rest his voice and did not sing for much of the year.
_	Those were tumultuous years for Iran, the nationalist Prime Minister, Dr.Mossadegh, had nationalized the oil industry in 1951, and now the confrontation between Iran and Britain have escalated to the extent that the Iranian government refused to allow the British any involvement in Iran’s oil industry, and Britain was making sure that Iran could not export any oil.
_	Hemingway believed the writer could describe one thing (such as Nick Adams fishing in "The Big Two-Hearted River") though an entirely different thing occurs below the surface (Nick Adams concentrating on fishing to the extent that he does not have to think about anything else).
_	In 108, he created her empress—even though she was also described as jealous, to the extent that that year, she poisoned Consort Li, who had given birth to a son of the emperor, Liu Bao (劉保).
_	Still, the movement to return to rule by the Japanese mainland was popular to the extent that event legislative session, from the very first, passed a resolution to return to Japanese administration.
_	During the Mozambican Civil War (1977–1992) the transmission lines were sabotaged to the extent that 1,895 towers needed to be replaced and 2,311 refurbished over a distance of 893 km on the Mozambican side of the line.
_	On 22 March 1967, "Pipers main storage battery had deteriorated to the extent that the ship was restricted to surface operations.
_	Love of self, family, or nation is good only to the extent that it magnifies the glory of God.
_	Well, except to the extent that the [historic]
_	The audio tracks became popular to the extent that a live show was conceived and staged.
_	At the time, it was thought a triumph for Thomas Wolsey and allowed Henry VIII to greatly increase his standing in European political circles, to the extent that England became seen as a third major power.
_	The Army Staff's duties included, among other things to assist the Chief of the Army with leadership of the Army's mobilization, training, tactics, organization, equipment and personnel to the extent that such activity was not directly related to operational activities, which was handled by the Defence Staff.<ref name="1977/78:63"></ref>
_	Personal factors also weighed heavily and the German Kaiser was close to the murdered Franz Ferdinand and was affected by his death, to the extent that German counsels of restraint vis a vis Serbia in 1913 changed to an aggressive stance.
_	As theatrical performances were banned on Sundays at this time, it also made Brookwood a popular choice for the burial of actors for the same reason, to the extent that actors were provided with a dedicated section of the cemetery near the station entrance.
_	Simeon was the singer, but began to incorporate a 1940s vintage audio oscillator into the show, which alienated the other band members to the extent that the group was eventually reduced to the duo of Simeon and Taylor, at which point they renamed themselves The Silver Apples, after the William Butler Yeats poem "The Song of the Wandering Aengus".
_	Ironically, this was to the extent that up until the end of the 15th century the Ottoman Empire (the most powerful and prominent Sunni state and future arch-enemy of the Shia Safavids) used to send many of its Ulama (Islamic scholars) to Iran to further their education in Sunni Islam, due to a lack of Madrasahs (Islamic schools) within the Empire itself.
_	In this way, they "personify" or "represent" interests, and who they personally are, may well be completely irrelevant to that – it is relevant only to the extent that their true personality fits with the role.
_	As a whole it is a masterpiece of Romanesque carving in Catalonia, to the extent that other works have been arranged around it, such as the Descent from Santa Maria de Taüll, what remains of the one from Durro, as well as works of other types (altar frontals, crucifixes)
_	When they received this news, they immediately ordered Matthews to cross the Western Ghats to take Bednore, to the extent that he felt compelled to do so despite a lack of sound military footing for the effort.
_	Upon the appointment of the liquidator, all of the powers of the directors are suspended and the company itself will cease to carry on business except to the extent that the liquidator believes it will assist the beneficial disposal of the business.
_	However, in California, the plaintiff who prevails on a tort claim in a bad faith action may be able to recover part of its attorneys' fees "separately" and in addition to the judgment for damages against a defendant insurer, but "only" up to the extent that those fees were incurred in recovering contractual damages (that is, for breach of the terms of the insurance policy), as opposed to "tort" damages (for breach of the implied covenant).
_	To this day, the series is popular and well loved in its home country to the extent that the theme park Heide Park features a themed area devoted to the show.
_	Graves strictly enforced the treaties to the extent that the French government protested.
_	Aidan Dunne wrote “...the balance of power in the art world has shifted to the extent that curators play a prescriptive and constitutive role in what artists do and how their work is framed and presented, to the extent that artists are crucially dependant on curatorial approval.
_	An “unexpected war” against terrorism, coupled with the invasions of Iraq by allied forces, stretched Canadian soldiers thin, to the extent that it forced Canada to seriously consider changing foreign policy to combat rising global insecurity.
_	Hence after each performance, Dan Ping and Wan-Yin would have a rendezvous at the theatre and their love deepened to the extent that they vowed to run away from the city and to get married elsewhere.
_	The lake consumes water to the extent that all the water in the lake must be replenished every year.
_	When the club closed in 1975, Bingenheimer was reportedly disenchanted with the stylized dance genre disco to the extent that he abruptly abandoned his club "English Disco," so as not to be associated with the popular movement.
_	To the extent that such alternatives do exist, Green has shown they pose environmental and economic challenges, and he believes they should not be hastily adopted without considering potential unintended adverse consequences.
_	To the extent that the good or service of interest is representative of a sector, EIOLCA can provide very fast estimates of full supply chain implications for that good or service.
_	The country’s first Transitional Rehabilitation Unit - a unit that helps people with acquired brain injuries rehabilitate to the extent that they have regained enough independence to return to life living in the community - was opened at the RHN in 1993.
_	People living and working in the Fremont neighborhood often dress the characters in apparel appropriate to the season (termed "art attacks" by some), to the extent that those unfamiliar with the sculpture may not find it immediately obvious that those under the 'shelter' are actually statues.
_	In that capacity he harshly criticised, to the extent that it was possible, what he perceived as omissions and authoritarianism by the royal administration and Palace Cabinet.
_	Its decisions are the ultimate expression and application of Canadian law and binding upon all lower courts of Canada, except to the extent that they are overridden or otherwise made ineffective by an Act of Parliament or the Act of a provincial legislative assembly pursuant to section 33 of the "Canadian Charter of Rights and Freedoms" (the "notwithstanding clause").
_	That is, Piaget suggests that the environment is understood through assimilations of objects in the available schemes of action and these accommodate to the objects to the extent that the available schemes fall short of the demands.
_	His forces were strict in enforcing this, to the extent that some blacks felt as if they were again enslaved.
_	NPR will label stories from Sedaris, such as "Santaland Diaries," as fiction, while "This American Life" will fact check stories to the extent that memories and long-ago conversations can be checked.
_	From this perspective the maintenance and enhancement of close relationships depends on the extent that both people are concerned for each other's needs, and are willing and able to meet those needs.
_	Lummis promised that the magazine's coverage of Southern California would be "concise, interesting, expert, accurate" to the extent that it would be trusted by Eastern readers.
_	(2) Transnational citizenship (immigrants acting in codevelopment activities, embedded in a transnational dynamic, are also transnational citizens, to the extent that they have a dual presence.
_	The experimental system was created as a result of a severe 2010 storm that overproduced renewable energy to the extent that all conventional power sources were shut down, or in the case of a nuclear power plant, reduced to its lowest possible operating level, leaving a large area running almost completely on renewable energy.
_	To the extent that it has been controversial, the controversy has centered entirely on those parts of the Communion that have sought to expand a sufficient statement of faith to include other formulae.
_	This is perceived as having widened the gap in quality between the two organisations, to the extent that in 2015 one commentator described the BDO as "mostly an unwilling feeder to the PDC: most of its biggest stars... jump ship given the chance."
_	Traffic grew to the extent that by 1907 the GNR had installed double track between Foyle Road and St. Johnston, but in 1932 it was singled again.
_	Gobeille v. Liberty Mutual Insurance Company, , was a United States Supreme Court case in which the Court held that a Vermont state law requiring the disclosure of certain information relating to health care services was preempted by the Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA) to the extent that the state law applied to ERISA plans.
_	Under Prince, the police were organized under military discipline to the extent that unmarried constables were required to be housed in special barracks and needed approval to marry.
_	More technical dive profiles may be less tolerant of error to the extent that a single error may be life-threatening, so technical divers tend to carry and use equipment to mitigate such possible errors, and to use and practice procedures known to reduce the risk of comitting such errors.
_	Moreover, the concept only really applies to a massive system; if the goal is simply to protect against accidental launches or very limited 3rd-country attacks, then marginal cost is not important, while if the goal is to protect the US deterrent force, then it has to survive only to the extent that it accomplishes that mission – more Soviet missiles does not add to the threat to the deterrent.
_	Willy is a touch sensitive, and when Dr. Harold Legg (Leonard Fenton) makes several remarks about "dog mess" in the Square, Ethel fears it upset him to the extent that he can't perform at all.
_	To the extent that organization is achieved in Falun Gong, it is accomplished through a global, networked, and largely virtual online community.
_	Western artists including Hans Memling depicted oriental carpets from Turkish Anatolia with guls in several of his paintings, to the extent that these are known as Memling carpets.
_	Mitch later abducts Charlie, and reveals to him that he doesn't need the moon to change, that he learned to control himself to the extent that he can transform at will.
_	He wanted a ship that looked and felt like it was used and lived in, to the extent that he claims "One of the first things I thought was, 'I'm gonna have a ship with a toilet,'" which appeared as a pull-out drawer in Mal Reynolds' cabin in "Serenity".
_	Thus, as such past decisions as "Sears" and "Compco" "have made clear that state regulation of intellectual property must yield to the extent that it clashes with the balance struck by Congress in our patent laws."
_	Until the 19th century, Ottoman prose never managed to develop to the extent that contemporary Divan poetry did.
_	Contents of ghinnawas are considered personal, even sensitive to the extent that Lila Abu Lughod was warned "never to reveal any women's poems to men".
_	Numbers of fish may be decreasing somewhat but not to the extent that would warrant listing it under a higher risk category.
_	The station is particularly busy at weekends with tourists visiting Camden Market and Camden High Street, to the extent that entry is prohibited on Sunday afternoons to prevent overcrowding on the station's narrow platforms.
_	To the extent that electing a Condorcet winner and not electing a Condorcet loser is considered desirable outcomes for a voting system, approval voting can be considered vulnerable to sincere, strategic voting.
_	Rules 39 and 67 permit International Searching and Preliminary Examining Authorities not to carry out search and examination on certain types of subject matter, such as scientific and mathematical theories, methods of doing business and computer programs to the extent that the Authority is not equipped to carry out a search or international preliminary examination concerning such programs.
_	The relevant declaration of invalidity concerned statutory provisions in the Act and the Criminal Procedure Act, as well as their respective Schedules, to the extent that they were gender-specific.
_	To the extent that enough precision remains, they can then be rendered accurately.
_	Because of the potential for abuse of a security interest that catches all of a company's assets, many jurisdictions have enacted provisions in their insolvency legislation providing that a floating charge granted shortly prior to the company going into liquidation will be invalid, or invalid to the extent that it does not secure new loans made to the company.
_	During the elections, vast powers are assigned to the election commission to the extent that it can function as a civil court, if needed.
_	Thus, under the strongly unitary executive theory, independent agencies and counsels are unconstitutional to the extent that they exercise discretionary executive power not controlled by the president.
_	Morton was quoted as stating: "I have received threats from the Scientologists and things have become pretty heavy — to the extent that it's almost more than my lawyers can handle …
_	The carrier had accumulated significant debts that outstripped its revenues from the mid-1980s, to the extent that aircraft were detained or impounded for unpaid debts.
_	The façade of the Cathedral is the most elegantly decorated, to the extent that it was completed.
_	Something in our world is only "real" to the extent that it conforms to the Sacred or the patterns established by the Sacred.
_	Agreements in relation to real property are void to the extent that they prohibit or restrict dealings by reason of the colour, race or ethnic origins of an individual or their family.
_	However, it is unclear as to the extent that PCFT contributes to folate transport across these epithelia.
_	He had a reputation for "terroris(ing) those under him to the extent that they are afraid to express their opinions for fear of being (sacked)" (Haldane Diary 31 March).
_	To the extent that there are many religious firms competing against each other, they will tend to specialize and cater to the particular needs of some segments of religious consumers.
_	Virtually every part of the Copper Country was cleared of timber, to the extent that only a few small areas of old-growth forest like (the Estivant Pines) are left.
_	Formerly cleared lands have been left to regrow, to the extent that many parcels of land are now being harvested on a limited basis by timber and paper companies.
_	The protagonist, Hayashi Akiko, is repulsed by little girls but obsessed by little boys—she even imagines a little boy being beaten by his father to the extent that his innards spill out.
_	Permission culture is a term often employed by Lawrence Lessig and other copyright activists such as Luis Villa and Nina Paley to describe a society in which copyright restrictions are pervasive and enforced to the extent that any and all uses of copyrighted works need to be explicitly leased.
_	Stoddart has characterised modern art as dominated by left-wing politics, to the extent that "certain artistic forms likewise became suspect: the tune; the rhyme; the moulding; the plinth" as coercive and overly traditional.
_	However, Connah's position in regard to the history of Finnish architecture is seen as polemical because of his critical, questioning approach to what is regarded as the prevailing viewpoint among modernist Finnish architects that architecture is primarily determined by social not aesthetic issues – to the extent that during the 1960s and 1970s Finnish architects sought a non-aesthetic constructivist architecture: one such critic of Connah's position has been the academic Christer Bengs.
_	The tax revenue increase had not hurt his approval ratings to the extent that it prevented it from reaching 89% during the Gulf War, four months after the tax vote.
_	To the extent that the ions remain at their initial energy, the energy can be tuned to take advantage of the peak of the reaction cross section or to avoid disadvantageous (for example neutron-producing) reactions that might occur at higher energies.
_	News of the wheels initially spread by word of mouth, but the cumulative effect was a reawakening of skateboarding to the extent that, by 1975, scores of manufacturers had entered the market, a national magazine, Skateboarder, had re-formed and Nasworthy was selling 300,000 sets of wheels per year.
_	Article 24(1) of the Constitution of Kenya provides that, "A right or fundamental freedom in the Bill of Rights shall not be limited except by law, and then only to the extent that the limitation is reasonable and justifiable in an open and democratic society based on human dignity, equality and freedom, taking into account all relevant factors..."
_	The Middle School provides sport programs for the Students but not to the extent that the High School does.
_	He and his son Marcus considerably improved the landscape to the extent that it was described in the Parliamentary Gazetter of 1844 in the following terms: ""The mansion built by Sir Walter Synnot and the demesne attached to it is laid out and planted in a tasteful style.
_	Xu "et al" therefore (re)defined the concepts of Deinonychosauria and Avialae to the extent that "Archaeopteryx" and "Xiaotingia" belonged to the Deinonychosauria in the clade Archaeopterygidae.
_	The Home, with additions and modifications, served in its original function until the 1970s when seamen's wages and conditions improved to the extent that the standard of accommodation provided by the Home was no longer adequate and use declined.
_	Patent laws in the UK and throughout Europe specify a non-exhaustive list of excluded things that are not regarded as "inventions" to the extent that a patent application relates to the excluded thing as such.
_	I believe it can merit no more definite verdict than 'not proven' and that it certainly does not exist to the extent that is often assumed", and "The parallels that I have drawn between [the huehuetlatolli of the Aztecs], (recorded by Bernardino de Sahagún in the 1500s) and ancient Near Eastern wisdom are in no way exhaustive, but the fact that they can be produced so easily underlines what should be obvious anyway, that such precepts and images are universally acceptable and hence that similar passages may occur in Proverbs and Amenemope simply by coincidence."
_	In the mid-19th Century, there were some 25 wineries in North Carolina, with extensive independent vineyards, to the extent that North Carolina dominated the national market for American wines at the time.
_	The second was the imposition of a duty on individuals, in section 8(2), to uphold the rights of other individuals: “A provision of the Bill of Rights binds a natural or a juristic person if, and to the extent that, it is applicable, taking into account the nature of the right and the nature of any duty imposed by the right.
_	Whole vessels in plain colours are far less common among the Sasanians to the extent that many of the full-coloured examples are believed to be imported.
_	Breakages as representing "plutocracy", which subordinates democratic government to its power, to the extent that even socialist politicians "no longer dare even to talk of nationalizing any industry" which can return profit for the "plutocrats", or attract subsidies for them.
_	In some instances, wolves have displayed an uncharacteristic fearlessness of humans and buildings when attacking dogs, to the extent that they have to be beaten off or killed.
_	As a community, Phishheads socialize new fans and self-police to the extent that concerts resolve more incidents than they create.
_	As described in both novels and the short story "The Great Simoleon Caper" (1995), hyperinflation has sapped the value of the US dollar to the extent that trillion dollar bills—"Ed Meeses"—are nearly disregarded and the quadrillion dollar note—the "Gipper"—is the standard 'small' bill.
_	Its success irritated colonists to the extent that they took legal action against Houphouët, accusing him of being anti-French for never seeking French citizenship.
_	But to the extent that the text speaks of a "written" document, Woodruff cautions that "critics appear to have taken the text of the first folio recto too much at face value in drawing conclusions about Popol Vuh's survival."
_	He encouraged his staff to do likewise, and to engage in a wide range of sexual activity, to the extent that they felt comfortable; he argued that this would help his interviewers understand the participants' responses.
_	Screenwriter Wolf Mankowitz declared that Sellers felt intimidated by Orson Welles to the extent that, except for a couple of shots, neither was in the studio simultaneously.
_	Written Cantonese has carried this process out to the farthest extent of any non-Mandarin variety, to the extent that pure Cantonese vernacular can be unambiguously written using Chinese characters.
_	In early 1905, the use of wireless telegraphy in Europe had increased to the extent that there was much concern by the British Admiralty about mutual interference between neighbouring operators, particularly nearby ships using different transmission systems.
_	Wills did succeed to the extent that the Marysville area is nowadays a vibrant community.
_	It is therefore likely that any of these species have been significantly reduced to the extent that they have been prevented from evolving in the first place, and further that the Xeelee were unable to prevent the evolution of the Photino Birds.
_	In 1921, the "North China Daily News" reported that in the Shaanxi province, prevalence of robbery and violent crimes were serious to the extent that farmers were "afraid" to "venture out of doors".
_	Whiter's linguistic studies—in particular, his research into the language used by Gypsies—led him to be cited as a role model by George Borrow, to the extent that Whiter appears in Borrow's "Lavengro" as "Reverend Whiter the philologist".
_	Some time before the Calamity War, Mars has been terraformed to the extent that it has a breathable atmosphere.
_	To the extent that lawyer advertising might be said to encourage frivolous lawsuits, the Court countered that the American Bar Association had observed that the "middle 70% of our population is not being reached or served adequately by the legal profession," suggesting that a vast number of meritorious cases are being stifled for want of a lawyer willing and able to assist the client in bringing suit.
_	Considerable research effort continues to be directed toward the purpose and ramifications of alarm-calling behaviour, because, to the extent that this research has the ability to comment on the occurrence or non-occurrence of altruistic behaviour, we can apply these findings to our understanding of altruism in human behaviour.
_	Luther's thought is revolutionary to the extent that it is a theology of the cross, the negation of every affirmation: as long as the cross is at the center, the system building tendency of reason is held in check, and system building does not degenerate into System.
_	Rather a lack of perceived control over digital goods leads consumers to feel that they never truly own digital goods to the extent that they do comparable physical goods.
_	The implied freedom was held to be a negative right, not a grant of a free-standing positive right, and operated chiefly as a restraint on executive and legislative power to the extent that such power would burden the implied freedom.
_	After 30 years, Martins was judged to have maintained the New York City Ballet's financial security and the musicality and performance level of the dancers, but he has not emphasized the Balanchine style to the extent that many observers expected he would.
_	The club's relationship with the local newspaper worsened during the 1937–38 season, to the extent that "Crusader" was "either banned by the directors or was voluntarily taken off by [the editor]".
_	She was famous to the extent that "Tenko and the Guardians of the Magic", an American magical girl-inspired cartoon series based on her character, was created and Mattel produced a line of fashion dolls named after her.
_	Nevertheless, it is one of the features of lucid dreams that they can have an extremely high quality of perceptual realism, to the extent that the dreamer may spend time examining and admiring the perceptual environment and the way it appears to imitate that of waking life.
_	The WAC-21 is very similar in many respects to the Austrian NORICUM GH N-45 gun-howitzer, to the extent that the carriage of the Type WA-021 can accommodate the ordnance of the NORICUM weapon.
_	His contact and relationships with British officials alarmed the Turks and Arabs to the extent that he was called to Baghdad and placed under house arrest in 1912.
_	They offer subtle criticism which are cleverly quoted with humour and satire to the extent that the criticized does not get embitered.
_	Ufa continued to build on their initial success to the extent that, coming to the end of the season, they were equal with Neftekhimik Nizhnekamsk at the top of the table with 86 points.
_	"To the extent that policymakers and elite opinion in general have made use of economic analysis at all, they have, as the saying goes, done so the way a drunkard uses a lamppost: for support, not illumination", it can be quoted succinctly as: "[P]olicymakers […]
_	However, fortunes declined to the extent that they were relegated at the end of the 1994–95 season.
_	Gaspard immediately became famous, and was therefore very much in demand to the extent that it was necessary to retain him in advance.
_	To the extent that control of the state can affect the welfare of groups, groups have an interest in seeking control of the state in order to distribute state rents in ways that favor themselves and help to maintain power.
_	Private schools rely on their own funds, but they are highly uncommon in the Netherlands, to the extent that even the Dutch monarchs have traditionally attended special or public schools.
_	This limits coincidence counters to improving the signal to noise ratio to the extent that the quantum behavior can be studied, without removing the noise completely.
_	There John won his father-in-law's affection, to the extent that he granted him possession of the island of Leucas—Richard had promised to, but probably never did, cede the nearby island of Ithaca to the couple as well.
_	An alternative view is that Ecuador and Venezuela separated from the Gran Colombian Federation and inherited all of the treaty obligations that Gran Colombia had assumed, at least to the extent that they apply to their respective territories.
_	In Britain, this revival first occurred during King George III's reign, and his granddaughter, Queen Victoria, was a major proponent of the cameo trend, to the extent that they would become mass-produced by the second half of the 19th century.
_	The attendants there were friendly and the atmosphere far less oppressive than the wards; the patients were given greater liberty, to the extent that some were allowed to drink alcohol.
_	However, as far as the relationship with Strepponi proceeded, Phillips-Matz recounts that Verdi was "living in an apartment around the corner from Strepponi's house", that the news of this had reached Italy ("Verdi had been seen "chez" Strepponi"), and that, in writing the music for "Jérusalem", he had received her help to the extent that a handwritten love duet in the composer's autograph score contains alternative lines in her handwriting and in his.
_	Prominent Black Panther of the 20th century Eldridge Cleaver adopted the "Catechism" as a "revolutionary bible", incorporating it into his daily life to the extent that he employed, in his words, "tactics of ruthlessness in my dealings with everyone with whom I came into contact".
_	To the extent that this occurred, many in Iraq expressed some amount of concern over the potential for sectarian divisions to shape Iraqi social and political life.
_	They not only disregard their governors, but are in constant clashes amongst themselves, to the extent that the inhabitants of its twelve quarters cannot visit one another" (he also implied that one reason for the luxuriant horticulture around the village was that grazing animals were likely to be stolen).
_	To the extent that it is grounded in a real event, however, it probably only reflects
_	Both historical and projected key performance measures may generally be flat or negative to the extent that safe and sound operations may be adversely affected.
_	Second, the court concluded that Montana could also exercise personal jurisdiction because BNSF had substantial operations in Montana, to the extent that it could be deemed "at home" in Montana for jurisdictional purposes.
_	The British Columbia Court of Appeal upheld the convictions, pointing to section 88 of the Indian Act. Section 88 stipulates that, "all laws of general application from time to time in force in any province are applicable to and in respect of Indians in the province, except to the extent that such laws are inconsistent with this Act or any order, rule, regulation or by-law made thereunder, and except to the extent that such laws make provision for any matter for which provision is made by or under this Act."
_	Jesus had previously used saliva and clay to cure a man of blindness, and when the man with eye disease approached Simeon, he anointed the man's eyes with mustard, burning him and aggravating the condition to the extent that he reportedly went blind.
_	During the time of expansion in the Republic and early Empire, Roman armies had acted as a source of revenue for the Roman state, plundering conquered territories, displaying the massive wealth in triumphs upon their return and fueling the economy to the extent that historians such as Toynbee and Burke believe that the Roman economy was essentially a plunder economy.
_	Günther's specimens were from a different location, from Nuwara Eliya District (to the extent that the location is known).
_	It is an obligate feeder on the ectoparasites of other fish to the extent that it will fail to thrive in an aquarium where these feeding needs are not met.
_	I wanted to destroy that guy that I played, to the extent that there was any of "me" there.
_	It is gradually sloping to the extent that, during low tide, the water level is low enough to allow one to walk as far as five hundred metres from the shore like in Pulong Pasig of Calauag.
_	The Pope established very friendly relations with other denominations, to the extent that when the Greek Patriarch in Egypt had to absent himself from the country for a long period of time, he left his Church under the guidance of the Coptic Patriarch.
_	When a new pope was being considered in 1958, Dalí was an enthusiastic supporter of Angelo Giuseppe Cardinal Roncalli, to the extent that Roncalli's ear became the subject of his trompe-l'œil composition "The Sistine Madonna" (1958).
_	According to "Consumer Reports", as of 2009, SUV rollover safety had improved to the extent that on average there were slightly fewer driver fatalities per million vehicles, due to rollovers, in SUVs as opposed to cars.
_	The Quran simply says at 18:90, "To the extent that when he reached the rising-place of the sun, he found it rising upon a nation for which We had not kept any shelter from it."
_	While the aroids are little traded, and overlooked by plant breeders to the extent that the Crop Trust calls them "orphan crops", they are widely grown and are important in subsistence agriculture and in local markets.
_	The book considers individuals behavior only in the extent that it helps explain the nature of organizations.
_	This story was at least untrue to the extent that the detainees also included scientists actively engaged in eager attempts to build a nuclear bomb, namely Kurt Diebner and Walter Gerlach.
_	In 2015, the Enlarged Board of Appeal held, in case G 3/14, that "the clarity of the amended claims of a patent may be examined in opposition proceedings only when, and then only to the extent that the amendment introduces non-compliance with Article 84 EPC."
_	A loyal follower of the original founder (the original Number 1), she served as a prototype for the process used to transform Midnight into a half-human, half-machine being that he became, to the extent that she allowed herself to be disfigured and maimed to facilitate her transformation into becoming a cyborg.
_	Although Greek has undergone morphological and phonological changes comparable to those seen in other languages, never since classical antiquity has its cultural, literary, and orthographic tradition been interrupted to the extent that one can speak of a new language emerging.
_	Sometimes these strange choices of drink will have equally strange effects on Jack; Toilet Duck for instance causes him to experience hallucinations, and floor polish makes him temporarily appear to be dead, to the extent that he appeared to decompose.
_	In other states, private prepared code annotations have no official sanction; thus, they are judicially noticeable only to the extent that they restate or quote from officially prepared documents like legislative committee reports.
_	The group has garnered a reputation for its highly violent nature to the extent that other groups on the fringes of the British far right have sought to avoid being publicly associated with the RVF.
_	While both dump-month periods immediately follow periods of greater movie attendance when event movies expected to be critical and/or commercial successes are released, and periods of greater consumer spending generally there are also reasons specific to both periods that further dampen movie attendance to limit the expected box office returns to the extent that movies with strong potential will be scheduled for other times of year.
_	Composition and delegation are in fact largely automated by embedding; according to researchers Schmager "et al.", this feature "has many of the drawbacks of inheritance: it affects the public interface of objects, it is not fine-grained (i.e, no method-level control over embedding), methods of embedded objects cannot be hidden, and it is static", making it "not obvious" whether programmers will overuse it to the extent that programmers in other languages are reputed to overuse inheritance.
_	He added that the Church tolerated homosexuality and disregarded the obligation of clerical celibacy: "Secret affairs and marriages, illegitimate children, rampant homosexuality, pedophilia and illicit sex have riddled the priesthood to the extent that the UN Commission on Human Rights has investigated the church for sexual abuse…"".
_	There is significant hybridization of elk with the more numerous red deer to the extent that pure elk may no longer exist in the wild in New Zealand.
_	This lack of reliability arises from the fact that eye movement occurs frequently, rapidly, and over small angles, to the extent that it is impossible for an experimenter to perceive and record the data fully and accurately without technological assistance.
_	The liability of the Minister of Police had now been broadened to the extent that it included liability for every stage of an unlawful arrest committed by a policeman in the scope of his employment.
_	The general dissatisfaction of rural populations in Bolivia increased to the extent that large indigenous protests in La Paz the week before the election pushed for a constituent assembly to better represent the rural and indigenous social groups in the constitution.
_	Its declared ambition is that the state would restrict fundamental rights only with especially serious reasons, only to the extent that is considered absolutely necessary and solely based on law, while ensuring required procedural guarantees.
_	Fruit which was allocated to the tithe could not be swapped for fruit which wasn't, to the extent that wine couldn't be swapped for vinegar, and olive oil couldn't be replaced by olives; furthermore, fruits were not allowed to be individually divided if only part went to the tithe (small whole pomegranates had to be used rather than sections from a large pomegranate, for example).
_	The Queen's opinion is unknown, but Heseltine has stated: "I think she is an old and wily bird about her own views ... to the extent that I could divine what she felt, I think she felt the same ...
_	Dr. Walker cuts him short and explains that he doesn't expect anything from Gruenwaldt but only asks he try to understand that life and death situations occur daily to the extent that he can't remember them all.
_	Syrgiannes was freed, and was able to restore himself to Andronikos's favour, to the extent that in late 1329 he was entrusted with the important governorship of Thessalonica, the Empire's second-largest city, and of western Macedonia and Albania.
_	The Secretary of State may, "to the extent that it appears to him requisite or expedient to do so in the interests of the safety of the State or the safe custody of persons lawfully detained" exempt the Crown by Order in Council (section 48(4)).
_	On the national and international scene, Botafogo is often confused with the Rio de Janeiro club with the same name to the extent that the Rio club is often credited with being the infamous club against which Pelé scored a record 8 goals in one game.
_	This applies when the comet is sufficiently far from Jupiter to have well-defined orbital elements, and to the extent that Jupiter is much less massive than the Sun and on a circular orbit.
_	Cardus had first heard Ferrier at the Edinburgh Festival in 1947; he became a devoted admirer to the extent that, eventually, questions were raised about his critical blindness to her technical weaknesses.
_	According to Andrew Radd in "Wisden", the club were mollified by his success, but he wrote: "Rarely in Northamptonshire's history have the performances and the personality of one cricketer dominated a season to the extent that Curtly Ambrose did in 1994."
_	The tent is traditionally constructed for the first time during the marriage ceremony and is considered an extension of the union, to the extent that the phrase "making a tent" is a metaphor for becoming married.
_	To the extent that the right to be forgotten concerns a data subject's right to limit the searchability of third party postings about him/her, the Guideline does not constitute a right to be forgotten.
_	The details are not worked out yet but to the extent that entire rooms, entire walls, roofs or floors or entire utility systems can be pre-built and installed as completed components, that will be the goal of Zero Waste design.
_	His work also continued to broaden in scope, with an increasing emphasis on the landscape and context of his subject matter, to the extent that in some later works such as "Catskill Cadilac" the subject is "not so much sinking into the landscape as being hidden by it".
_	In addition, a conclusion can only be valid to the extent that the observations upon which it is based are reliable.
_	Under Boyd's purview, the Engineering Experiment Station was awarded many electronics-related contracts, to the extent that an Electronics Division was created in 1959; it focused on radar and communications.
_	The difference is that men typically do not experience the negative effects to the extent that women do.
_	Officials at NOAA and in the National Weather Service forecast offices were expecting a severe weather outbreak on April 3, but not to the extent that ultimately occurred.
_	At this time the games tended to be low scoring, dominated by such pitchers as Walter Johnson, Cy Young, Christy Mathewson, and Grover Cleveland Alexander to the extent that the period 1900–1919 is commonly called the "Dead-ball era".
_	Having narrowly avoided the destruction of Earth's ecosystems, the feudal Greater Brazil attempted to return most of the planet to a "natural" state, to the extent that most of Earth's population inhabits a few megacities.
_	In the mid-19th century, theatre productions began to reinstate the original Shakespearean text, and in the 20th century, critics and scholars undertook a significant re-appraisal of the play's value, to the extent that it is now considered to be one of Shakespeare's greatest works.
_	However, he found first-team football hard to come by in later seasons, particularly under Jim Smith when Billy Turley kept him out of the side to the extent that he had a transfer request accepted by Oxford in December 2006.
_	An internal JPAC report, obtained by the Associated Press in July 2013, cited JPAC's management as being inept, mismanaged, and wasteful, to the extent that it could worsen from "dysfunction to total failure".
_	The Engine Pool contains mainly carp, and has flourished, to the extent that it held the UK five-hour match record in 2000, when 414 lb (188 kg) of fish were caught in a five-hour period.
_	Hence, writings may only be protected to the extent that they are original, and "inventions" must be truly inventive and not merely obvious improvements on existing knowledge.
_	(to the extent that there's a King Charles III in the 2000s, just as prog 1 said) but ignores the prequel strip "Disaster 1990!".
_	Compulsory purchase only applies to the extent that it is necessary for the purchaser's purposes.
_	An earthquake in 1476 may have devastated the island to the extent that its occupants, the Genovese, evacuated.
_	The New Zealand eight dominated its race to the extent that the interesting part was who would take silver and bronze.
_	Her character also received criticism for being an overly passive damsel in distress, and a "Public Menace Un-nyun" (민폐언년) meme circulated, to the extent that writer Chun Sung-il issued a public defense and apology towards Lee.
_	Following closely the contemporary Earhart biographies that had appeared, "Amelia Earhart: The Final Flight" dramatized Earhart's final flight to the extent that more myth than fact comes through.
_	To the extent that electors did not use both their votes, the figure given will be an underestimate.
_	Both subsections stipulate that, to the extent that such legislation may limit one of the rights in section 23, the limitation must comply with section 36(1), the limitations clause of the Constitution.
_	The rationale was that UNEP’s status as a programme, rather than an organization in the tradition of the World Health Organization or the World Meteorological Organization, weakened it to the extent that it was no longer fit for purpose given current knowledge of the state of Earth.
_	Norman's music influenced Thompson to the extent that he named the Pixies' first EP and a lyric in the band's song "Levitate Me" after one of Norman's catchphrases, "Come on, pilgrim!"
_	As theatrical performances were banned on Sundays at this time, it also made Brookwood a popular choice for the burial of actors for the same reason, to the extent that actors were provided with a dedicated section of the cemetery near the station entrance.
_	Stalin's deviation differs from the "diversionist" position to the extent that it never seeks to establish a "foreign" influence or a linguistic appropriation of Marxist categories as an aesthetic of concealment.
_	Political and military events are judged to be of historical significance to the extent that they are associated with changes in institutions.
_	To the extent that detailed design decisions for software systems are relegated to the coding phase, the IDEF6 technique should be usable during the software construction process as well.
_	We further declare that you are not required by these Our Letters Patent to inquire, or to continue to inquire, into a particular matter to the extent that you are satisfied that the matter has been, is being, or will be, sufficiently and appropriately dealt with by any of the following:
_	He develops a talent for intrigue, which irritates Sir Magnus to the extent that Widmerpool is asked to leave the organisation.
_	The latter kind of claim holds that, to the extent that a public school itself promotes the majority religion, the state is guilty of coercive interference in the lives of the individual.
_	He was unnaturally fond of his mother, to the extent that Germany became a "mother symbol".
_	"I have to admit that, among the conservative figures I monitor professionally, you have always seemed something of an anomaly to the extent that you seem genuinely considerate and interested in dialogue with those with whom you disagree," Mantyla recently wrote to the pastor.
_	But where parliament makes a law in Concurrent Legislative List, and Provincial Assembly also legislates on it, the Provincial law will be void to the extent that it conflicts with the Federal law.
_	He urged them to "ensure that the situation does not deteriorate to the extent that it might constitute a threat to peace and security", and to enter into negotiations to solve the problem.
_	The Tehran Times reported: "According to the indictment, a number of the accused confessed that the post-election unrest was preplanned and the plan was following the timetable of the velvet revolution to the extent that over 100 stages of the 198 steps of Gene Sharp were implemented in the foiled velvet revolution."
_	The final edition was greatly expanded to the extent that Calvin referred to it as a new work.
_	His performance in a losing cause impressed the opposition's manager, Martín Palermo, to the extent that as soon as the transfer window opened, he signed the player.
_	"She paid an appropriate amount of attention to her schoolwork, and worked hard, but didn't slave over it to the extent that she didn't have any time left to save the world."
_	While he does not condemn therapy as useless, he suspects that it is only effective to the extent that the therapist becomes a true friend to the client, involved in their world.
_	Moral realism (also ethical realism or moral Platonism) is the position that ethical sentences express propositions that refer to objective features of the world (that is, features independent of subjective opinion), some of which may be true to the extent that they report those features accurately.
_	Arthur Edeson used a wider-angle lens than Toland and the film includes many long takes, low angles and shots of the ceiling, but it did not use deep focus shots on large sets to the extent that "Citizen Kane" did.
_	However, the stark simplicity of the party's supremacy was blurred to the extent that Central Committee members often combined their party roles with ministerial office and/or membership of the national legislature.
_	Native title rights and interests are based on laws and customs that pre-date the British acquisition of sovereignty, and may exist over land and waters to the extent that they are consistent with other rights established over the land by law or executive action.
_	As she said, relations between them had improved, but not the extent that could work together as a group again.
_	Sometimes conditions are better than expected, but other times they may be worse, and may deteriorate during the course of a dive to the extent that recovery becomes an emergency.
_	A case was filed in court seeking to extend the voter registration period arguing that Section 5(1) of the Elections Act was in conflict with the Constitution to the extent that it limited continuous registration of voters.
_	The court cited many holdings in California case law to the extent that it did not matter whether the arrest took place before or after the search.
_	This tour also saw Tom develop the LED aspect to his show to the extent that on stage he had a massive screen behind Alex's drum kit showing visual content triggered by his electric bass.
_	Others would argue that the position of Vice President of Uruguay, and such power as the holder of the office exercises, is mainly significant to the extent that the holder is prepared to identify himself unreservedly with the current President of Uruguay, and that in any case the office of Vice President of Uruguay originated from the period of the Presidency of Gabriel Terra, 1931–1938, who ruled by decree.
_	David Wilkinson's unique facilitative teaching style at University has won him many plaudits, to the extent that he is often found teaching lecturing skills to fellow lecturers around the world.
_	Returns based strategies that use factors such as momentum signals (e.g., 52-week high) have been popular to the extent that industry analysts incorporate their use in their Buy/Sell recommendations.
_	Before the highways were upgraded to the extent that they permitted trans-Canada commercial shipping by road within Canada, and did not require trucking companies to dip below the 49th parallel to traverse the Great Lakes, the railways knit the country together.
_	However, National's vote had collapsed to the extent that it could not form a government even with New Zealand First's support, depriving the party of its negotiating advantage.
_	To the extent that it denies the illusion of simplicity, it is a reasonable facsimile of reality.
_	From this, it follows that a creature should behave altruistically to the extent that those benefiting carry the same genes — 'inclusive fitness', as this source of cooperation in nature is termed.
_	The justification for idealistic postulates is practical (a point Royce made repeatedly in his maturity, accepting the label of pragmatist for himself), to the extent that it embraced practical life as the guide and determiner of the value of philosophical ideas.
_	Steve Perkins of BBC Music awarded the song five stars and said "by the time ["No Air"] hits the final stretch, the title actually seems rather prophetic, since Jordin and Chris are yodelling away at the tops of their voices to the extent that you wonder how they're concealing their need to gasp for big lung bucketfuls of precious oxygen every thirty seconds."
_	The elevation plans turned out imprecise to the extent that it was impossible to use them for a tenfold magnification.
_	The Pacific coast was also home to many blacks and mulattoes free sticking by his great abilities as vagueros, to the extent that the laws of the sixteenth century forbidding them riding on horses or have weapons were almost always ignored because their skills were as necessary as feared, skills that would later valuable recruits from colonial militias and gave opportunity for upward social mobility.
_	His sense of touch is enhanced to the extent that he is able to feel the impressions of ink on a piece of paper.
_	This does not prevent him from exercising an independent criticism that, according to some writers, exhibits a marked tendency toward rationalism, to the extent that he judged other biblical commentary "against his twin standards of accuracy, grammatical precision and reliability", and in that regard "Ibn Ezra determined that, aim notwithstanding, Rashi had successfully grasped and imparted the contextual sense 'but one time in a thousand'."
_	The situation deteriorated to the extent that Gordon, together with Olongapo residents, struggled hard to be free of the provincial government.
_	Ramsey kept the relationship secret to the extent that Tottenham knew nothing of it until days before the wedding.
_	Missionary work, to the extent that it occurred in these areas, was administered through the Home Missionary Program at the stake level.
_	When Motamid succeeded to the throne, he complied with every whim of his wife, to the extent that his subjects could not stop themselves expressing their dissatisfaction.
_	Nitrogen fixation by industrial processes like the Frank–Caro process (1895–1899) and Haber–Bosch process (1908–1913) eased this shortage of nitrogen compounds, to the extent that half of global food production (see Applications) now relies on synthetic nitrogen fertilisers.
_	"Sunday Too Far Away" (1975), set on an outback sheep station, pays homage to Roberts' shearing works, to the extent that "Shearing the Rams" is recreated within the film.
_	Al Ashmawy was so successful to mix real true stories with other imaginary ones to the extent that we don’t know what is real and what is not.
_	Some sources suggest that much of Scriabin's music is entirely based on the chord to the extent that whole passages are little more than long sequences of this chord, unaltered, at different pitches; but this is rarely the case.
_	In general, white markings are more pervasive in chestnuts than in non-chestnuts, to the extent that homozygous non-chestnuts (which carry the "Extension" (E) gene and may also carry the Agouti gene) were more modestly marked than non-chestnuts heterozygous for the "E" gene.
_	To the extent that voters did not use both their votes this will be an underestimate of turnout.
_	She memorized a great deal of poetry, and would use it to communicate, to the extent that, "If asked how she was feeling, Audre would reply by reciting a poem."
_	However, unlike the duty to defend, the duty to indemnify exists only to the extent that the final judgment is for a covered act or omission, since by that point, there should be a clear factual record from trial or summary judgment in the plaintiff's favor revealing what portions of the plaintiff's claims are actually covered by the policy (as distinguished from potentially covered).
_	Bringing with him from York his assistants Pyttel, Sigewulf, and Joseph, Alcuin revolutionised the educational standards of the Palace School, introducing Charlemagne to the liberal arts and creating a personalised atmosphere of scholarship and learning, to the extent that the institution came to be known as the 'school of Master Albinus'.
_	Halford has been praised for his versatility, to the extent that he is referred to as a utility player.
_	Special attention was put into the terrain and geography, to the extent that real buildings and geographical sites are visible ingame, such as the Iraqi Presidential Palace in Baghdad.
_	Though generally in favor of reducing public spending, Geoghegan warned in 2010 not to cut spending too the extent that it is "cutting into the muscle" of the western world", which could lead to social conflict and strikes.
_	The strength of the copyleft governing a work is an expression of the extent that the copyleft provisions can be efficiently imposed on all kinds of derived works.
_	But in this very same constitution, it is expressed that it is possible "to the extent that it is necessary" for a law to be passed that limits or impacts the execution of the right to privacy law.
_	The next term proves challenging for Daniel: he makes friends with Audrey McFall and continues to be friends with Janeece but to the extent that he is looking after her child Cheryle more than she is.
_	By 1895, the circumstances had changed to the extent that there was now a dearth of Mexican dollars and the authorities in both Hong Kong and the Straits Settlements were putting pressure on the authorities in London to take measures to have a regular supply of silver dollar coins.
_	We therefore expressly overrule "Laffey" to the extent that it imposes the above discussed different method of determining reasonable attorney fees on attorneys situated as Yablonski and Galloway are here.
_	Willard was secretary of the Los Angeles Chamber of Commerce while he edited "The Land of Sunshine", which from its inception was supportive of commercial interests in Los Angeles and San Diego to the extent that it would have caused a clear conflict of interest controversy if Willard was publicly linked to the magazine.
_	In the weeks that follow, Harris is the target of distrust and hostility, to the extent that Tamura orders townspeople to not even sell him food.
_	Coué thus developed a method which relied on the principle that "any idea exclusively occupying the mind turns into reality", although only to the extent that the idea is within the realm of possibility.
_	Coué thus developed a method which relied on the belief that "any idea exclusively occupying the mind turns into reality", although only to the extent that the idea is within the realm of possibility.
_	His importance was noticeable to the extent that he participated in the team that was set to broker a peace deal between Saudi-Arabia and Yemen over a border disagreement between the two countries.
_	Duncan also established his reputation as a stoic player, to the extent that opposing fans taunted him as "Mr. Spock", the prototypical logical, detached character from "Star Trek".
_	At first he led a self-described "wild-life" but then became more religiously conservative to the extent that he would prevent his siblings from watching television.
_	The supervisory response is limited to the extent that minor adjustments are resolved in the normal course of business and that operations continue to be satisfactory.
_	He held that to the extent that there was any uncertainty, it could be resolved under the legal maxim "id certum est quod certum reddi potest" ("if something is capable of being made certain, it should be treated as certain").
_	The "Gazette" had been highly critical of the treatment of the Blanketeers in March 1817, to the extent that it was in return criticised for 'highly libellous' statements, but felt itself vindicated when charges against the alleged ringleaders were dropped in September 1817.
_	There is justification for this to the extent that no member regularly plays 'leading' parts, but all are moved around in the cast from week to week, from important to minor roles.
_	Tall and quite beautiful, she is generally surrounded by an aura of cold, to the extent that it's usually snowing in her vicinity, often to the annoyance of those around her, not that any of them would dare say anything.
_	To the extent that the ASC's pronouncements, known as "Statements of Standard Accounting Practice" (SSAPs), have not been replaced by FRS, they remain in force.
_	Economics takes an anthropocentric approach to the value of the natural world: biodiversity, for example, is considered beneficial only to the extent that it is valued by people and increases profits.
_	The group presented a document to the elders of the Molotschna Mennonite Churches which indicated "that the total Mennonite brotherhood has decayed to the extent that we can no more be part of it" and fear the "approach of an unavoidable judgment of God."
_	Alley classic has affected musicians to the extent that many bands have styled themselves after one variation or another of "Crazy Rhythm".
_	These are typically included in the drawing, to the extent that they are visible to the artist.
_	"The cardinals are true electors," to the extent that they are legally nominated to be designators of the pope.
_	The ratio that results from comparing the two numbers provides the extent that the total G is oxidized.
_	The lineage retained strong ties with the royal family in Alexandria, to the extent that marriages occurred between certain high priests and Ptolemaic princesses, strengthening even further the commitment between the two families.
_	Section 3 would direct the Secretary, to the extent that appropriations are available to the VHA for medical services, to reimburse non-VA facilities with which the VA does not have such a contract for providing hospital care and medical services to such veterans, if such care and services cannot be provided within the VHA's wait-time goals in a facility with which the VA has a contract.
_	The war resulted in unprecedented growth in passenger numbers, to the extent that there was not enough capacity to carry all potential passengers.
_	Whannel gives the example of the death of Diana, Princess of Wales as an example of Vortextuality as this story dominated the media for days, to the extent that it removed most other items from the news agenda.
_	The Universal Right to Vote by Mail Act (, ) is a proposed bill that would "Amend the Help America Vote Act of 2002 to prohibit a state from imposing additional conditions or requirements on the eligibility of an individual to cast a vote in federal elections by mail, except to the extent that it imposes a deadline for requesting the ballot and returning it to the appropriate state or local election official.".
_	In the mid-19th Century, there were some 25 wineries in North Carolina, with extensive independent vineyards, to the extent that North Carolina dominated the national market for American wines at the time.
_	This system was associated in particular with the English town of Rochdale, to the extent that it was described as the "Rochdale System" of sanitation.
_	North Chelmsford, an industrial village, is distinct from the rest of the town to the extent that it has many of its own town services.
_	To the extent that this period is relevant to modern Catholic dogma, it is in the area of papal supremacy.
_	In the first half of the 20th century the urban growth of Hull surrounded it, to the extent that by 1950 the place was no longer recorded.
_	Shelby, in his time on television, popularized the Pratt necktie knot, to the extent that it is sometimes referred to as the "Shelby Knot" or "Pratt-Shelby."
_	Despite his simple procedures, absence of collaborators and lack of formal training, he came to dominate his field, to the extent that the period from 1930-1950 has been characterized as the "Kahlian era" of ciliate systematics.
_	When the battle started in northern Malaya, Paris's 12th Brigade was sent to protect the retreat of the Indian 11th Infantry Division, which it did successfully, to the extent that it surprised the Japanese, inflicting high casualties on some of their more overconfident units.
_	A "Remission in Schizophrenia Working Group" has proposed standardized remission criteria involving "improvements in core signs and symptoms to the extent that any remaining symptoms are of such low intensity that they no longer interfere significantly with behavior and are below the threshold typically utilized in justifying an initial diagnosis of schizophrenia".
_	They also simplify their own interface to the extent that these tools can be used directly by non-technically qualified staff.
_	The reviser's changes generally conform very closely to this Greek text, even in matters of word order; to the extent that the resulting text may be only barely intelligible as Latin.
_	Naagloshii gain power by hunting magical practitioners and devouring their power; most are millennia old and thus have acquired extreme power, to the extent that even powerful wizards avoid fighting them if possible.
_	In response, the borough council agreed to underwrite the projected £33 million cost of the station to the extent that section 106 payments from the promoters of property developments expected near the station do not reach this sum.
_	When the Decepticons learn of this, their combiner robots are deployed to attack, and a battle between them and their Autobot counterparts ensues, focusing on their "Scramble Power" - the interchangeability of the individual limbs - to the extent that at one point, Breakdown of the Stunticons connects to Superion to damage him.
_	The club initially played at Mill Lane, which had sloped to the extent that the crossbar was level with the top of one of the corner flags.
_	Landseer became well known for his paintings of the landscapes, people and particularly wildlife of Scotland, to the extent that his paintings, along with the novels of Sir Walter Scott, became the primary means through which people in the rest of the United Kingdom came to picture Scotland.
_	Horney developed her ideas to the extent that she released one of the first "self-help" books in 1946, entitled "Are You Considering Psychoanalysis?".
_	By the time of his death his popular esteem had been restored to the extent that 12,000 people filed past his coffin before his burial in Paris.
_	By 2016 economic liberalisation had progressed to the extent that both locally-responsible and state industrial enterprises gave the state 20% to 50% of their output, selling the remainder to buy raw materials with market-based prices in akin to a free market.
_	Maboyas, on the other hand, was a nocturnal deity who destroyed the crops and was feared by all the natives, to the extent that elaborate sacrifices were offered to placate him.
_	To the extent that soldiers believed the MGR existed, it effectively gave them permission to err on the side of killing suspected Vietnamese enemies even if there was a very good chance that they were civilians.
_	Hancock's popularity within the Democratic party grew to the extent that he was considered a potential presidential nominee for that party in the 1868 election.
_	The calendar was intended to replace the "bourgeois" calendar to the extent that, in 1939, newspapers were forbidden to write about New Year's Day.
_	The commission also said "To the extent that South Ossetian militia initiated the shooting on Georgian villages, police and peacekeepers before the outbreak of the armed conflict," South Ossetia violated the prohibition of the use of force.
_	After this, the 15th Brigade's engineer support were called upon to regularly carry out route clearance and proving operations as the Japanese became increasingly desperate to destroy the Australian armour, to the extent that they were prepared to sacrifice an artillery piece in order to lure the Australian tanks into a trap where they could be destroyed by mines.
_	"To the extent that all the factors are not equally relevant and specific, however, the chance that the weaker ones will be relied on is too remote to sustain a facial vagueness attack."
_	Wallach and Kogan highlighted that the creativity measures were not only weakly related to one another (to the extent that they were no more related to one another than they were with IQ), but they seemed to also draw upon non-creative skills.
_	He, along with his technical advisor A.S.E. Ackermann and British physicist Sir Charles Vernon Boys, developed an improved system using mirrors to reflect solar energy upon collector boxes, increasing heating capacity to the extent that water could now be used instead of ether.
_	The decline continued apace during the 1930s depression and goods traffic on the branch dwindled to the extent that in 1953 British Railways considered closing the line completely.
_	Through these persistent efforts to win the attention of publishers, Rounds unintentionally developed a reputation as a gifted storyteller, to the extent that editors eventually advised him to create an artistic opportunity for himself by writing a story collection that he could also illustrate.
_	Much disagreement persists about the boundaries of the subgenre, and the extent that their lyrics are explicitly Christian varies among bands.
_	After losing in the final, Gill and his Rovers teammates indulged in the local beer to the extent that they were arrested and kept in police cells overnight.
_	According to Bach, “a belief can be justified even in the absence of any action on the part of the believer, as in the case of beliefs formed automatically or routinely without any deliberate consideration;” whereas “a person is justified in believing something to the extent that he holds the belief rationally and responsibly.”
_	Dr. Holguin uses dirty tricks to create pressure on Romero to the extent that he is kidnapped and beaten by Dr. Holguin's men.
_	It is possible for the envelope to be heavily coated in saliva to the extent that the fibrous material of the envelope itself is completely hidden.
_	To the extent that proponents of the use of "H. ergaster" define "ergaster" as a separate lineage, equivalent to "African "H. erectus"", rather than a pure chronospecies, the assignment of OH 9 to "H. erectus sensu stricto" by Colin Groves supports subsuming "H. ergaster" into "H. erectus".
_	Students are frequently blamed, to the extent that the British National Union of Students has attempted to play down this "outdated stereotype".
_	Others, however, were convinced of the truth of his words to the extent that those who were opposed feared to lay their hands on him.
_	Other objects include the Battersea and Witham Shields, and an especially closely related work is a bronze shield boss found in the river Thames at Wandsworth in London, to the extent that Piggot designates a "Torrs-Wandsworth style"; all these three objects are in the British Museum.
_	Chambers v. Florida, 309 U.S. 227 (1940), was a landmark United States Supreme Court case that dealt with the extent that police pressure resulting in a criminal defendant's confession violates the Due Process clause.
_	In Hindustani, the numerals between 10 and 100 have developed to the extent that they need to be learned independently.
_	The "Times" would report: "Obviously the favorite of the packed [Long Beach Municipal] auditorium, Miss Germany's introduction as the fourth runner-up drew spontaneous boos from the audience to the extent that Ed Hennessy, the master of ceremonies, had to remonstrate with the crowd."
_	The PDC gained a following in Lima to the extent that the party was able to defeat strong candidates from Popular Action and the Odriíst National Union in order to have Luis Bedoya Reyes elected Mayor of Lima.
_	To the extent that Morton's craniometric measurements were erroneous, the error was away from his personal biases.
_	McCauley was formerly chairman of Plymouth Argyle F.C. when he presided over what most supporters consider the darker years of Argyle's recent history, to the extent that he and his family received several death threats from extremely aggrieved Argyle supporters.
_	In 1976 the division's combat strength had dropped to the extent that it was really only a brigade-group formation, possessing only two infantry battalions: 1 and 2 RVR, as well as two field artillery regiments, a medium regiment and a locating battery.
_	The Custody Officer must record everything which an arrested person has with him at the police station and may search a person to the extent that he considers it necessary to do so, but may not conduct an intimate search for these purposes.
_	Nevertheless, and in contrast to his analogues in other Islamic states, usually denoted by variants of the title "hajib", the holders of the office never expanded their power to the extent that they could rival the Sultan's own.
_	This was successful to the extent that the Pathet Lao lost an election widely perceived as fraudulent.
_	However, ZTT, which maintained they had invested heavily in "Liverpool" (to the extent that the digital recording system used to record the album was very nearly treated as a sixth member of the band on the sleeve of the "Warriors of the Wasteland" single), had other ideas, and promptly sued Johnson in an attempt to hold him to his original contract with the label.
_	That outraged Churchill to the extent that he was against providing support to German opposition to Hitler for the rest of the war.
_	After suffering a serious stroke in 1981, Abel rehabilitated his paralyzed right hand to the extent that he was able to ink and draw again—which he did through the rest of the 1980s, primarily for Marvel.
_	There were delays in gaining official approval for the line to the extent that, when Queensland Parliament finally approved construction, mining at Mount Perry was substantially curtailed.
_	The killer's identity was a well-kept secret during taping, to the extent that even executive producer Zuiker didn't know who the killer was for the first eight episodes.
_	Puloma, overcome by her plight, cried intensely to the extent that the tears she shed created a river called Vadhusaras which later became the location of the hermitage of her son Chavana when he had become a sage with immense ascetic achievement.
_	He had a strong arm and exploited his power frequently, to the extent that the Australian wicket-keeper Don Tallon complained about the jarring impact of his unnecessarily strong throws when the batsmen were already home and no run out was possible.
_	To the extent that one accurately reflects about one's progress towards a learning goal, and appropriately adjusts the actions to be performed in order to maximize performance and foreseeable outcome; effectively, at this point one'self has become self-regulated.
_	In one theory of life insurance, needs based analysis, life insurance is only needed to the extent that assets left behind by a person will not be enough to meet the income and capital needs of his or her dependents.
_	The Parthians did, however, have a thriving oral minstrel-poet culture, to the extent that their word for minstrel – "gosan" – survives to this day in many Iranian languages as well as especially in Armenian ("gusan"), on which it practised heavy (especially lexical and vocabulary) influence.
_	During this spell the club also performed well in the cups – defeating Ross County in the League Cup, taking Inverness to a Scottish Cup replay, and only losing out on penalties to Livingston in the semi-final of the Petrofac Challenge Cup. Aitken impressed to the extent that he was recruited by Championship side Dumbarton in May 2015 and was quickly replaced by former Ayr United manager Brian Reid.
_	Like most viruses with RNA genomes, double-stranded RNA viruses do not rely on host polymerases for replication to the extent that viruses with DNA genomes do.
_	Some of the communities have been isolated from other Jewish communities, to the extent that their classification as "Persian Jews" is a matter of linguistic or geographical convenience rather than actual historical relationship with one another.
_	Here in Funan, Paramārtha's reputation grew to the extent that Emperor Wu of Liang sent ambassadors to bring Paramārtha to the Chinese imperial court.
_	Clark’s final conclusion shocked my reasoned eclectic viewpoint: he suggested that the Byzantine Textform — to the extent that such could be established in its archetypal form — was the most likely candidate for autograph originality against all rival claimants, whether favored Greek manuscripts, other texttypes or subjective internal factors.
_	Cruise ships are potentially subject to RCRA requirements to the extent that chemicals used for operations such as ship maintenance and passenger services result in the generation of hazardous wastes.
_	In the early 19th century, the islands were often visited by sealers, to the extent that the seals had been nearly exterminated by 1835.
_	To the extent that an individual has this dehumanizing implicit association, they are more likely to support violence against African Americans (e.g., jury decisions to execute defendants).
_	Furthermore, though the majority of Ba'ath members were Shia, it was the Sunnis who were disproportionately removed from offices, to the extent that the latter called it "de-Sunnification".
_	During the term of office of Colonel F.R. Collins DSO as SAR Chief Mechanical Engineer from 1922 to 1929 articulated locomotives were in great favour in South Africa, to the extent that the Railway Board of the day instructed that non-articulated engines should only be ordered in exceptional circumstances.
_	He severely burns Voz's face, disfiguring him to the extent that Voz is forced to wear a metallic, silver mask.
_	"To the extent that a citizen's right to vote is debased, he is that much less a citizen," Warren declared.
_	When Clark appeared in public as Superman some years later, the lonely and depressed Lana deduced his true identity and became something of a stalker, to the extent that Lex Luthor noticed the frequency with which she appeared in the vicinity of the hero and actually had her tortured in an attempt to gain whatever inside knowledge of Superman she might have.
_	It focuses on the subject of a non-anthropomorphic concept of God, to the extent that one can interpret God as the Universe itself.
_	However, in 2004, the South Korean government issued the following statement: "Our government takes the position that the 1909 Gando Convention, signed by Japan illegally without Korea's consent, is null and void, to the extent that the Eulsa Treaty, which deprived Korea of its diplomatic rights in 1905, is a null-and-void treaty obtained through duress."
_	Several hundreds have visited it since the film's release, to the extent that the owners planned to increase tariffs and renovate the rooms around a "Kahaani" theme.
_	African identity and physical features are stronger here than elsewhere in Mexico as the slaves here did not intermarry to the extent that others did.
_	Bob is a very unassuming character and despite the fact that since retiring as national rowing coach he has been building rowing boats, he has stayed out of the lime light to the extent that current British oarsmen and women have little understanding of the contribution he made to their success.
_	One may compare this to the "category utility hypothesis" proposed by : "A category is useful to the extent that it can be expected to improve the ability of a person to accurately predict the features of instances of that category."
_	To the extent that the Civil Rights Act of 1866 may have been intended to go beyond preventing discrimination, by conferring particular rights on all citizens, the constitutional power of Congress to do that was more questionable.
_	The Bass VI never caught on to the extent that the four-string Precision Bass and its derivatives did.
_	By the 18th century, the French school had become the western European standard to the extent that Domenico Angelo, an Italian-born master teaching in England, published his "L'Ecole des Armes" in French in 1763.
_	In the run up to the start of the First World War there was an enormous expansion and consolidation of tram services to the extent that by 1915 trams were the most popular form of transit; the Manchester system was carrying 200 million passenger journeys a year on 662 vehicles (there were only a handful of buses at this time).
_	He was more popular for his double entendre dialogues in his films to the extent that most associated the term "double meaning" with Kashinath and many went to the extent of attributing the decline of Kannada films quality to him.
_	When asked about his slight uncertainty, Dawkins quips, "I am agnostic to the extent that I am agnostic about fairies at the bottom of the garden."
_	Scott was "deeply influential in the development of Italian romantic opera" to the extent that by 1840 (barely 20 years after this opera), there were 25 Italian operas based on his works, the most famous being Donizetti's "Lucia di Lammermoor" of 1835.
_	Occasionally a new feature (such as an item, class, or skill) may be made too powerful, too cheap, or too easily obtained to the extent that it unbalances the game system.
_	This is to the extent that tax evasion has been described by Greek politicians as "a national sport" - with up to €30 billion per year going uncollected.
_	Sport academics who research the Paralympic Games consider this protest to be pivotal, because it shows the passion of athletes to win and the extent that sports people will go to claim gold.
_	He reported that Ghulam Ali's spiritual energy ("fayz") was so strong that it caused him to become restless and disturbed, to the extent that he was hardly able to move from his place.
_	A non-native water hyacinth Icornia species was introduced in 1961, and has now proliferated to the extent that it is blocking the artificial waterways and filling the impoundments.
_	As soon as the election process becomes organized by political leaders, to the extent that money allows, the vote ceases to be truly significant.
_	Sofia and Julio meet and great passion arises between them, to the extent that Julio is determined to face anything, including ending his relationship with Elisa.
_	This serial keyboard cable communication is only bi-directional to the extent that the computer's electronics controls the illumination of the caps lock, num lock and scroll lock lights.
_	In Oman, it is illegal to provide or use unauthorized VoIP services, to the extent that web sites of unlicensed VoIP providers have been blocked.
_	Monsalve had been working for years as liaison with CIA local spy webs, to the extent that the U.S. Embassy itself described him in a report as the "most pro-American" officer of the Chilean Navy, as revealed by a research carried out by Universidad Arcis and published in its Estudios Político Militares.
_	The day arrives when Kate is to show the Empress the completed portrait, but the Empress was furious as a newspaper stated her to be very evil to the extent that she killed Tung Chih with a smallpox laden handkerchief.
_	Green regarded the national state as legitimate only to the extent that it upholds a system of rights and obligations that is most likely to foster individual self-realisation.
_	This passage has been translated by some fans to mean that one ceases to live if one's body is damaged to the extent that it cannot be repaired.
_	Morris, the recently appointed co-captain of New South Wales, had greatly impressed Australia captain Don Bradman, to the extent that Bradman made Morris one of the three selectors for the 1948 tour of England.
_	There Bernardino came under the influences of Mattia Preti, Andrea Sacchi and Pier Francesco Mola, and of Guercino, to the extent that until the 20th century Bernardino's fresco of "Aurora" in Palazzo Bianchi Bandinelli was attributed to Guercino himself.
_	The beam projector no longer is used to the extent that it once was, as newer fixtures and PAR lamps have created easier ways to produce the effect.
_	To the extent that deemed tax payment exceeded taxes otherwise due, it was refundable to the shareholder.
_	Bags can choke and suffocate a fish or fill its stomach to the extent that it starves.
_	For the sake of emphasis, (i) “We want to keep the focus on biology because for too long cognition was considered a function that could be almost entirely divorced from its physical instantiation, to the extent that whatever could be said of cognition almost by definition had to be applicable to both organisms and machines.”
_	The Directives are flexible to the extent that the national authorities of the Member States have the choice of the form and method of the implementation of the Directive.
_	To the extent that a popular vote was held, it was primarily directed to filling the office of Vice President.
_	Once consciously acquired and sufficiently exercised, these programs can become automated to the extent that their execution happens beyond the realms of our awareness.
_	In the latter half of the 19th century the blanket coat was popularized amongst the European-descended population of Canada to the extent that it was looked on as national dress.
_	In the end, Lazar's own finances were ruined to the extent that his own sons refused to take up his debt-ridden estate upon his death.
_	However the EU has been under-spending on regional funds to the extent that €7.7 billion of unpaid funds was paid back to member states in 2017 (in addition to several billion more that came in due to cartel and anti-trust fines).
_	Eno went on to record 1975's Discreet Music with this in mind, suggesting that it be listened to at "comparatively low levels, even to the extent that it frequently falls below the threshold of audibility", referring to Satie's quote about his musique d'ameublement.
_	Two years in the saddle as the Chief of Edo State, he had virtually turned the state around and put it in a sound footing to the extent that Edo State was voted the most industrialized state in 2001 by an assessment team headed by the then Minister of information Professor Jerry Gana.
_	In that same year he was also appointed Urban Prefect of Rome and gained a reputation for severity, to the extent that he became unpopular with the Roman mob.
_	Consequently, the definition of the levels depends on the definition of discursive formation and types of discourse, and the three levels may collapse to the extent that these concepts are not conceived.
_	By 1959, Davis had developed to the extent that, after a concert of Stravinsky and Mozart with the London Mozart Players, the chief music critic of "The Observer", Peter Heyworth, wrote, "Mr Davis conducted two works in a manner that showed that he is not only outstanding among our younger conductors, but probably the best we have produced since Sir Thomas Beecham, his senior by forty-eight years."
_	However, several recent studies and very large-scale meta-analysis have cast serious doubt on whether it performs as well as other instruments, or better than chance, and to the extent that it does, whether this is largely due its inclusion of past offending history, rather than the personality trait scores that make it unique.
_	Collecting passport stamps as proof of travels was a major part of Giuliano's endeavour, and he describes being obsessed about his stamps, to the extent that he travelled with ink pads in five different colours so that he could assist immigration officers whose stamps may lack ink.
_	The NCAA repealed this limitation in the 1970s; to the extent that junior varsity teams exist at the college level, many are classified as club squads.
_	The bisexual Berling had an illegitimate child with Louise Rasmussen, Carl Christian (1841–1908) who was much liked by the King, to the extent that he insisted on signing the new constitution on Carl Christian's 8th birthday on 5 June 1849.
_	The Yugoslav post-war sources emphasize that Partisans managed to convince Atherton to change his pro-Chetnik and anticommunist view at the extent that he began arguing with General Nedeljković, according to the letter sent to Pijade by Broz on 11 April.
_	Landry told radio talk show host Moon Griffon that he hopes his legal victory over the governor will persuade Edwards not to attempt to govern by executive orders to the extent that outgoing U.S. President Barack H. Obama did during much of his eight-year tenure.
_	The curse, however is softened to the extent that he would be one of the most illustrious men of his time.
_	In the aftermath of the Second World War (1939–45), the Russian term "poputchik" (fellow traveller) was translated to the German as "Mitläufer", to identify the person who, although not formally charged with participation in war crimes, was sufficiently involved with the Nazi régime to the extent that the Allied authorities responsible for the denazification of Germany could not legally exonerate him or her from association with the War crimes of the Wehrmacht.
_	However, because the several states are limited in sovereignty under the United States Constitution, these types of laws are extremely limited in terms of enforcement, except to the extent that they are backed by various U.S. federal laws.
_	To the extent that the individual's tax on the dividend was less than the tax credit – for example, if his income was too low to pay tax (below £595 in 1973–1974) – he would be able to reclaim some or all of the £30 tax paid by the company.
_	Over the years, "Jet" has become almost synonymous with Microsoft Access, to the extent that many people refer to a Jet database as an "Access database".
_	With the wide distribution associated with the tract form, and a price in pennies, the "Tracts" succeeded in drawing attention to the views of the Oxford Movement on points of doctrine, but also to its overall approach, to the extent that "Tractarian" became a synonym for supporter of the movement.
_	Gujarati took up a number of words, while elsewhere the influence was great enough to the extent that creole languages came to be ("see Portuguese India, Portuguese-based creole languages in India and Sri Lanka").
_	In the 2010s, the social democratic parties that had dominated some of the post-World War II political landscape in Western Europe were under pressure in some countries to the extent that a commentator in "Foreign Affairs" called it an "implosion of the centre-left".
_	The ubiquity of distributed computer networks, mobile communications technologies and team based project approaches to work have brought many of the ideas that he wrote about to fruition, to the extent that they now seem passé and dated.
_	Although the events of 1836 led to independence for the people of Texas, the Hispanic population of the state was very quickly disenfranchised, to the extent that their political representation in the Texas State Legislature disappeared entirely for several decades.
_	Finally, he frames the Rev. Danvers for the trickery in order to also ruin his career, which succeeds flawlessly—to the extent that Danvers takes his own life.
_	The Makhnovists called various congresses of soviets, in which all political parties and groups – including Bolsheviks – were permitted to participate, to the extent that members of these parties were elected delegates from worker, peasant or militia councils.
_	"Meaningful learning" is the concept that learned knowledge (e.g., a fact) is fully understood to the extent that it relates to other knowledge.
_	For example, the Directors exercised their powers pursuant to the laws and regulations of the Republic of Estonia, but only to the extent that these had not been repealed or amended by the German military command.
_	The Litchurch area was one of these growing suburbs, to the extent that in 1860 it was extracted from the borough of Derby to become a township in its own right.
_	A few languages also have pre-glottalised nasal clicks, which have very brief prenasalisation but have not been phonetically analysed to the extent that other types of clicks have.
_	In contrast to al-Kindi, who considered the subject of metaphysics to be God, al-Farabi believed that it was concerned primarily with being "qua" being (that is, being in and of itself), and this is related to God only to the extent that God is a principle of absolute being.
_	The DA therefore advocates a mixed-economy approach, where the state is involved in the economy only to the extent that it can expand opportunity and choice.
_	It is designed to prevent a "g-induced loss Of consciousness" (abbreviated G-LOC), a situation when "g"-forces move the blood away from the brain to the extent that consciousness is lost.
_	Long-term exposure to Trellium-D was said to be damaging to Vulcan brains, and T'Pol's injecting of the chemical caused her permanent damage, to the extent that she was expected to have some difficulty controlling her emotions for the rest of her life.
_	Kim's theory postulates a zero-sum process whereby assimilation or "adaptation" occurs only to the extent that the newcomer lose the characteristics of their original cultural identity, such as language, customs, beliefs and values.
_	To the extent that this order prohibited the reporting of evidence adduced at the open preliminary hearing, it plainly violated settled principles: '[T]here is nothing that proscribes the press from reporting events that transpire in the courtroom.'
_	All the zooids are attached to each other and are physiologically connected to the extent that they cannot survive alone.
_	This death, compounded by the heavy casualties sustained by his forces during the siege and the realization of his own mortality, angered Genghis to the extent that once he captured Bamyan he completely destroyed the city and killed its entire and surrounding regions population.
_	Most international versions of the show remain quite similar to each other: their main format remains true to the original fly on the wall observational style with the emphasis on human relationships, to the extent that contestants usually are forbidden from discussing nominations or voting strategy.
_	However, the act of writing further strained his failing eyes, to the extent that he could no longer rely on his sight.
_	A number of groups of Persian Jews have split off since ancient times, to the extent that they are now recognized as separate communities, such as the Bukharian Jews and Mountain Jews.
_	At the same time, aerial refueling techniques were improved to the extent that Eighth Air Force bombers could still reach targets in Europe and Asia even if overseas bases were destroyed by an enemy attack.
_	During the weeks before the conference, large numbers of Bábís travelled to Mashhad from around the country, angering city authorities to the extent that Mullá Husayn's personal attendant was arrested and publicly tortured in an effort to drive Mullá Husayn from the city.
_	Membership in the group required a break with past life and its everyday pursuits in order to focus on the new knowledge to the extent that ties of family and kinship would be relaxed or severed.
_	Among the painters, a classical tradition predominates to the extent that there is no hint of Mannerism in the sixteenth century and Giulio Romano is omitted, nor is there any reference to Rococo taste, where a modern list would include Antoine Watteau and François Boucher.
_	Due to differences in phonology, lexicon, and grammar, Erzya and Moksha are not mutually intelligible, to the extent that the Russian language is often used for intergroup communications.
_	It was reported that there was a lack of communication impacting the coordination of services, to the extent that organizations were operating within separate silos, resulting in a lack of collaboration between the various organizations.
_	The operation centre was "simply overloaded", the report concludes, to the extent that staff did little to prevent further attacks during "the acute phase".
_	On the other hand, writing has gradually alienated people in literate cultures from the natural world, to the extent that 'our organic atonement to the local earth is thwarted by our ever-increasing intercourse with our own signs' (1996:267).
_	He aggressively cut dead wood from the ranks and reorganized the officer ranks to the extent that the "Army and Navy Journal" called it on July 18, 1885 "...virtually a new regiment, so much has its personnel changed during the past six months..."
_	Defenders of the new calendar further note that, to the extent that is a secular observance in the western world, (i.e., O.S.) appears to be becoming one as well, in Orthodox countries that continue to follow the old calendar.
_	The Overland Telegraph was an important means of communication in the northern Territory, to the extent that it was reported that nominations of candidates could be made by telegraph.
_	Procrastinators report more stress, more symptoms of physical illness, and more medical visits, to the extent that, overall, procrastinators suffer more stress and health problems.
_	She identifies herself as a "banfhili" (female poet) from Connacht and claims to have come from Alba, where she had learnt the art of prophecy to the extent that she could now boast the skill of "imbas forosnai", or all-encompassing illuminating knowledge.
_	To the extent that electors did not use all their votes this will be an underestimate of turnout.
_	According to Scott Gordon, a political organization is constitutional to the extent that it "contain[s] institutionalized mechanisms of power control for the protection of the interests and liberties of the citizenry, including those that may be in the minority".
_	Thomas Lang, for example, has mastered the heel-up and heel-down (single- and double-stroke) to the extent that he is able to play dynamically with the bass drum and to perform various rudiments with his feet.
_	The patent (option) will have value to the buyer (owner) only to the extent that the expected price in the future exceeds the opportunity cost of earning just as much in a risk-less alternative.
_	Truth is verifiable to the extent that thoughts and statements correspond with actual things, as well as "hangs together," or coheres, fits as pieces of a puzzle might fit together, and these are in turn verified by the observed results of the application of an idea to actual practice.
_	A central assumption of the APE model is that people tend to rely on their implicit evaluations when making explicit evaluative judgments to the extent that the implicit evaluative response is consistent with other momentarily considered propositional information.
_	To the extent that the likelihood principle is accepted, such methods are therefore denied.
_	Extreme cases of vitiligo, to the extent that little pigmented skin remains, are referred to as "vitiligo universalis".
_	Therefore, the workday will lengthen to the extent that worker's allow and necessitate.
_	Thai fishing boats were also frequently confronted by the Malaysian navy to the extent that the Thai government had to caution its own fishers against fishing without license in foreign waters.
_	According to Marxism, the dictatorship of the proletariat represents the rule of the majority (democracy) rather than of one party, to the extent that co-founder of Marxism Friedrich Engels described its "specific form" as the democratic republic.
_	Mr Henry Woodhouse, Emma's father, is always concerned for his health, and to the extent that it does not interfere with his own, the health and comfort of his friends.
_	"To the extent that "Wilko" rested on suspicion of arbitration as a method of weakening the protections afforded in the substantive law to would-be complainants," Kennedy wrote, "it has fallen far out of step with our current strong endorsement of the federal statutes favoring this method of resolving disputes."
_	By 1876 the company had recovered to the extent that it was then manufacturing twice the number of shotguns as it had been prior to that year.
_	Once the realization requirement is met, gains and losses are taken into account only to the extent that they are also "recognized."
_	Although the Confederate Signal Corps would never achieve a distinct branch identity to the extent that the Union version did, the Confederate Congress authorized its establishment as a separate organization, attached to the Adjutant and Inspector General's Department, on April 19, 1862, a year before the U.S. Congress did so.
_	The medical harms or benefits have not been unequivocally proven except to the extent that there are clear risks of harm if the procedure is done inexpertly.
_	Schedule 8 amends the Competition Act 1998 and greatly expands the jurisdiction of the Competition Appeal Tribunal to the extent that it now has similar powers the High Court.
_	The government accepted Penfold's recommendations, to the extent that he was appointed Governor of the British Virgin Islands in 1991, which, at the age of 48, made him the youngest serving governor of a British territory.
_	To the extent that the suspicion of lesbian love would have been aroused in the village, it would have been the departure from convention, not desire as such that would have given rise to disapproval.
_	To the extent that the European Union becomes a state then that necessitates EU-wide trade unions and a Communist Party of the EU."
_	He did some book illustrations in his early career, but not to the extent that N.C. Wyeth did.
_	He recovered sufficiently to the extent that he could still engage in military combat in the last part of World World II.
_	Frey and Smith concluded, "To the extent that the AAA control-program has been responsible for the increased price [of cotton], we conclude that it has increased the amount of goods and services consumed by the cotton tenants and croppers area."
_	To date, international studies have underlined a preoccupying rise in family dysfunction, abuse and violence, and yet these domestic troubles remain, in most cases, secrets or, at best, unknown to the extent that the shifting manifestation of deviance stays underestimated.
_	Jones was in and out of the side the following year, with the renaissance of Tommy Smith and the emergence of young Scottish defender Alan Hansen severely reducing his first team opportunities to the extent that he left in the summer of 1978 after exactly 100 appearances and 3 goals for the Reds.
_	Overfishing and poaching have reduced wild populations to the extent that farmed abalone now supplies most abalone meat.
_	Note that aliasing will occur, including aliasing below the Nyquist frequency to the extent that the continuous-time filter's response is nonzero above that frequency.
_	To the extent that it makes sense, there is no single "Marxist theory of state", but rather many different "Marxist" theories that have been developed by adherents of Marxism.
_	The monastery's church appears to have been severely damaged during the period of military occupation, to the extent that a new church had to be constructed on the site of the old one.
_	This meant that any single tortfeasor was liable to compensate the loss that the claimant suffered from mesothelioma only to the extent that that tortfeasor was itself responsible for the increase in risk.
_	The townfolk and their mandarins were heavily taxed for the work, and the labourers were worked to the extent that it provoked a revolt.
_	By the evening of 26 December his condition had deteriorated to the extent that the family was summoned.
_	Then the individual appraises ongoing events to the extent that the event is congruent or incongruent with the individual’s goals.
_	However, despite this economic prosperity, the community was not safe: religious hostility increased to the extent that it manifested itself in the form of massacres and expulsions, culminating in the repetitive expulsion of all Jews from various parts of Western Europe in the late medieval period.
_	In technical diving, divers are assumed to be competent and responsible for their own safety or the safety of the team of which they are members to the extent that is agreed by that team.
_	To the extent that the Court implies that the seriousness of a particular felony is a factor to be considered in deciding whether the need to preserve evidence of that felony constitutes an exigent circumstance justifying a warrantless in-home arrest, I think that its approach is misguided.
_	During his tenure with the Campbellites, Thomas had gained some influence, to the extent that some in Richmond, Virginia and New York City left the Campbellites and formed new meetings in line with Thomas' teachings.
_	Murton's agitation eventually disrupted the Rockefeller administration to the extent that not only was he fired two months after the bodies were exhumed, he was told he had twenty-four hours to get out of the state, or be arrested for grave-robbing—a charge with a sentence of twenty-one years, under Arkansas law at that time.
_	The bacterial activity in rapid high heat methods breaks down the material to the extent that pathogens and seeds are destroyed, and the original feedstock is unrecognizable.
_	Studies using event-related potentials (ERPs) have quantified the extent that mind-wandering reduces the cortical processing of the external environment.
_	From the low point of being banned from teaching as a result of his leaving the Society of Jesus, his reputation eventually rose to the extent that Pope John Paul II named him to be a cardinal in 1988.
_	FitzGerald, the first editor of the "Lyttelton Times" until he became the first Superintendent, was vehemently opposed to the tunnel to the extent that he founded "The Press" in 1861, so that he could give a voice to his opposition.
_	Nonetheless, to the extent that the Superman strips contained any expression, they were protected by copyright:
_	This added considerable weight to the head of the luminaire and made it front-heavy, to the extent that a counterweight was required to provide balance and bolted to the outside of the rear of the head.
_	His empire had expanded to the extent that the nearby leaders were complete strangers to him, so it would not be possible to surreptitiously replace them.
_	A common word, phrase, or other sign can only be removed from the public domain to the extent that a trademark owner is able to maintain exclusive rights over that sign in relation to certain products or services, assuming there are no other trademark objections.
_	BARAC has sufficient rate (and sensitivity) to the extent that washing away excess probe is unnecessary to reduce background.
_	Zack suggested the idea of adopting the multiple identity Monty Cantsin, which Kantor accepted, to the extent that it became chiefly associated with him.
_	On the other hand, it must be said that legal commentators in the neighbouring common law countries of Singapore and Malaysia are — to the extent that they are aware of events in Papua New Guinea — somewhat admiring of the extent to which Papua New Guinea's judiciary has maintained its independence as this is unusual in their political environments.
_	To the extent that the exhibition responded to desires other than what made the public feel good, the Guggenheim was catering to the marketing needs of the shows sponsors, in particular BMW.
_	While leaving work one night, Hillary and a visiting Craig become stuck in the parking garage due to the machinations of Sam, a security guard who is obsessed with Hillary, to the extent that he murders a businesswoman who had obliviously threatened his plans for her.
_	Furthermore, economic ideology is distinct from an economic system that it supports, such as a capitalist ideology, to the extent that explaining an economic system (positive economics) is distinct from advocating it (normative economics).
_	To the extent that agrochemicals impact biodiversity, modifications that increase their use, either because successful strains require them or because the accompanying development of resistance will require increased amounts of chemicals to offset increased resistance in target organisms.
_	The Southern Railway considered naming the locomotives after victories of the Second World War, to the extent that a mocked-up nameplate "River Plate" was produced.
_	In addition, a state that is not the ceding insurer's domiciliary state is preempted to the extent that any of its laws or regulations: restrict or eliminate the rights of ceding and assuming insurers to resolve disputes pursuant to contractual arbitration; require that a certain state's laws govern a reinsurance contract, disputes arising from such contract, or requirements of the contract; attempt to enforce a reinsurance contract on terms different from those set forth in the reinsurance contract; or otherwise apply the laws of the state to reinsurance agreements of ceding insurers not domiciled in the state.
_	James Fish commented on Rubicon's landfill diversion goals by saying, "To the extent that all of us own disposal facilities of some type, maybe we are married to it, and I'm OK with that at 30 percent margins.
_	He succeeded to the extent that the first three of these resistance leaders and their groups came together to form the Mouvements
_	There he developed his love of falconry from his contacts with the Bedouin, to the extent that he wrote a series of books on the subject, including "Falconry in Arabia" (1980).
_	Briggs considered the trajectory of cold jet plumes to be dominated by their initial velocity momentum, and the trajectory of hot, buoyant plumes to be dominated by their buoyant momentum to the extent that their initial velocity momentum was relatively unimportant.
_	But it is one of the central jokes of the novel that he cannot explain anything simply, that he must make explanatory diversions to add context and colour to his tale, to the extent that Tristram's own birth is not even reached until Volume III.
_	During the period from the mid to late 1990s, Beenie Man dominated the Jamaican charts to the extent that he perhaps had a good claim to the crown of "Dancehall King", a title only bestowed previously on Yellowman in the early 1980s.
_	Hot, dry periods, when the surface soil dries out to the extent that the lateral roots exude whatever water they contain, will result in the death of such lateral roots unless the water is replaced.
_	To the extent that non-religious movements have actively organised in the UK, many organise nationally from London.
_	Each band is similar to a varve, to the extent that the banding is assumed to result from cyclic variations in available oxygen.
_	After his recent augmentation, he is now capable of grappling with and physically overpowering Spider-Man to the extent that he could eventually crush his foe.
_	The provision of further information would only be essential to the extent that it was reasonably required to enable the accused to make a sufficiently informed decision on legal representation.
_	To the extent that this principle prevails in the future, the only truly viable institutions will be those that are predominantly servant led" [italics original]
_	He eventually begins to live in seclusion to the extent that others in the neighborhood suspect that he is either mad, sick, or overwhelmingly conceited.
_	This causes great pain to the humanoid pilot to the extent that was seen on Crais.
_	He spent 10 days wearing a back brace that left him housebound and unable to move to the extent that he wasn't even allowed to have a shower.
_	"Wally", produced by Bob Harris and Rick Wakeman was not a huge commercial success, but has gained and maintained a loyal following, to the extent that the album has recently been re-released on CD.
_	This was confirmed later by Attorney General Cooper's investigation: "to the extent that Evans's DNA could not be excluded, the SBI experts confirmed that the DNA could easily have been transferred to the fingernails from other materials in the trash can".
_	For a long time, the main manufacturer of instant noodle was Nissin Miojo, to the extent that in Brazil the most common name for them is "miojo", which is a Nissin trademark.
_	As construed by the Supreme Court in the "Brushaber" case, the power of Congress to tax income derives from Article I, Section 8, Clause 1, of the original Constitution rather than from the Sixteenth Amendment; the latter simply eliminated the requirement (Article I, section 9, clause 4 of the US Constitution) that an income tax, to the extent that it is a direct tax, must be apportioned among the states.
_	Essentially, Avicenna did not deny the core dogma of astrology, but denied our ability to understand it to the extent that precise and fatalistic predictions could be made from it.
_	During this time, Stephens became nearly completely isolated socially from the white community, to the extent that he was kicked out of the local Methodist church.
_	This was done to the extent that some games were shipped in the old Atari 400/800 packaging, bearing only a new sticker to indicate that they were also compatible with the XEGS.
_	Lanka flourished under his rule, to the extent that it is said the poorest of houses had vessels of gold to eat and drink off, and hunger was unknown in the kingdom.
_	In reality, since hafnium occurs with zirconium, hafnium can always be a byproduct of zirconium extraction to the extent that the low demand requires.
_	There is virtually no transition between the two works, to the extent that the opening words of "Hellenica", μετὰ δὲ ταῦτα, are translated as "After this", or sometimes "Following these events".
_	Some schools of the Kamakura period (twelfth–fourteenth century), took reverence towards the Lotus Sūtra to the extent that they saw it as the single one vehicle or path of the dharma, and they believed only this practice led society to an ideal Buddha land.
_	In mid-1987, the second nationalization act was amended to the extent that Verbund could be partially privatized, as long as 51 percent remained in government hands.
_	Orientalism is self-perpetuating to the extent that it becomes normalized within common discourse, making people say things that are latent, impulsive, or not fully conscious of its own self.
_	"To the extent that "Wilko" rested on suspicion of arbitration as a method of weakening the protections afforded in the substantive law to would-be complainants, it has fallen far out of step with our current strong endorsement of the federal statutes favoring this method of resolving disputes," he wrote.
_	By Sept. 28, Stalingrad and Southeastern Fronts had been reinforced to the extent that another reorganization was ordered.
_	Even so, Caron ran into some problems in this, her last dance musical, to the extent that Astaire mentioned in his biography that "one day at rehearsals I asked her to listen extra carefully to the music, so as to keep in time".
_	The band agreed; Shulman recorded those parts using a Fender Precision Bass Deluxe with the E String tuned down to D. While Shirley Manson's main vocals were generally not treated to the extent that they had on Garbage's first two albums, a lot of her backing vocals were; on "Androgyny" each vocal track was EQ'd and treated differently.
_	However, this scope is granted only to the extent that particular provisions of PAIA are designed to "alleviate the administrative and financial burden on the state."
_	As she was created bit by bit from the gems, Brahma named her Tilottama and directed her to seduce the demon brothers to the extent that she would become an issue of contention between them.
_	Plato believed that the political corruption created by democracy loosens the "natural" hierarchy between social classes, genders and age groups, to the extent that "anarchy finds a way into the private houses, and ends by getting among the animals and infecting them" ("Republic", book eight).
_	He is critical of the claims made by psychotherapy, and suggests that it only works to the extent that the therapist becomes a friend of the patient, providing encouragement and support.
_	By the end of September 1983, the situation in Lebanon had changed to the extent that not one of the initial conditions upon which the mission statement was premised was still valid.
_	Vincent was extremely cruel, and eventually his overtly brutal treatment of the prisoners concerned even the colonial authorities, to the extent that the Governor sent an investigator to the island.
_	Through the process we have undertaken, his consciousness and behaviour has changed, and continues to change to the extent that we have decided he can now be readmitted as a full member.
_	Hershkovitz may have been most well known for his studies of primates, to the extent that many thought him a primatologist, but he was quick to point out that, as Patterson phrases it, "nothing could be further from the truth".
_	The hurricane dropped heavy rainfall, causing flash flooding that damaged factories and crops; the tobacco crop sustained heavy losses to the extent that the Monthly Weather Review described it as "virtually wiped out".
_	To the extent that states extend their behavior outside territorial boundaries—driven by a wide range of capabilities and motivations—they are likely to encounter other states similarly engaged.
_	In general, all these words, to the extent that they existed in Middle English, had ("short A" as in "trap") which was broadened to .
_	Tanasi first appears in the historical record in the early 18th century, at a time when the fur trade between the English and the Cherokee had grown to the extent that the colonists wanted to regulate it.
_	During extreme droughts in the summer the reservoir has been known to dry out to the extent that the old bridge over the original stream, Summer Ford Bridge, can be seen.
_	The hearings were reopened, further documents were produced, and the Board struck additional testimony though not to the extent that the Party requested.
_	'Tibetan singing bowls' have as a result become a prominent visual and musical symbol of Tibet, to the extent that the most prevalent modern representation of Tibet within the US is that of bowls played by Americans.
_	In following years, the Irish would swell the ranks to the extent that by 1813 the British Army's total manpower was "1/2 English, 1/6 Scottish and 1/3 Irish."
_	The latter book presents a detailed case regarding the history and consequences of government control over institutions and activities which were historically private, to the extent that many citizens assume that privately or communally developed municipal facilities and universities are creations of the state, and that prohibitions on drug use, sex, and personal defence have always existed.
_	However, it was not until the mid-20th century that numbers increased to the extent that the area warranted provision independent of St. Joseph’s Tollcross parish, of which it had until then formed a part.
_	Therefore, the initial Spätlese terminology was for any late harvest wine, and the initial 1775 Spätlese wine was made from grapes that were affected by noble rot to the extent that they appeared unpalatable, and gave a very sweet wine.
_	Klyde beats her to the extent that she stops breathing and appears dead.
_	The art of mummy portraiture flourished, and some Roman emperors had themselves depicted as pharaohs, though not to the extent that the Ptolemies had.
_	SB 37 provided that BSA must examine and report annually upon the financial statements prepared by the executive branch of the state; perform other related assignments, including performance audits, that are mandated by statute; administer the Reporting of Improper Governmental Activities Act; and conduct audits and investigations of public entities requested by JLAC to the extent that funding is available.
_	Certain creditors have preferential status (e.g. secured creditors, tax creditors, & employees) and must be repaid in full to the extent that the company's assets permit them to be.
_	First, discoveries, scientific theories, mathematical methods, aesthetic creations, schemes, rules and methods for performing mental acts, playing games or doing business, programs for computers and presentations of information are not regarded as inventions and are excluded from patentability only to the extent that the invention relates to those areas "as such".
_	In August, following legislative changes, the export of wheat in bags and containers was deregulated to the extent that exporters no longer had to apply to the Wheat Export Authority for consents to exports.
_	The Cold Food Festival is generally ignored in modern China, except to the extent that it has influenced some of the activities and traditional foods for the Tomb-Sweeping Festival.
_	She spoke at conferences and workshops about media criticism and video blogging, and was interviewed by UK Sunday newspaper "The Observer" in March 2012 about modern media culture, stating: "I think to the extent that it could be creating authentic, human female characters, it is a push towards a more feminist media."
_	They further stated that to the extent that these rights are violated, the violation is considered proportionate and therefore justified according to section 8 of Basic Law: Human Dignity and Freedom.
_	The scene affected Strickland to the extent that she found it difficult to act on the set on which the rape was shot.
_	Roberts experienced problems with mutinous Irishmen early in his pirate career and was known to generally avoid recruiting Irishmen, to the extent that captured merchant sailors would sometimes affect an Irish accent to discourage Roberts from forcing them into his pirate crew.
_	The Public Art Council raised questions on the extent that current public art practices have provided artistic satisfaction to the public, who the actual audience is, and how relevant the works are to the lives of residents near the art sites.
_	After the adoption of Monotheism, Israelite belief is found to be free from mythological foundations, to the extent that the Scriptures do not even "understand" paganism (which, on Kauffman's view, is any religion other than Judaism, Christianity, or Islam (Hyatt 1961)).
_	In practice, this led to a polarization within English Protestantism, to the extent that the movements of Laudianism and Puritanism could no longer be described under this all-encompassing banner.
_	The Swiss Federal Constitution declares the cantons to be sovereign to the extent that their sovereignty is not limited by federal law.
_	Although some were never intended to be passed off as genuine Rockingham (for example Paragon's "Rockingham" range of mid-20th century), other pieces are backstamped with a Griffin mark similar to the genuine product to the extent that the unwary could mistake them for originals.
_	To the extent that a popular vote was held, it was primarily directed to filling the office of Vice President.
_	To the extent that the popular opposition between plain and ornate, honest and dissembling was associated with courtiers, (South European) foreignness and Catholicism, the plowman tradition continued to be anti-Catholic and staunchly Protestant.
_	His father Saul had established a banking business that flourished to the extent that it expanded to control Syria's finances, banking and foreign trade for nearly a century.
_	His slice backhand is very flat and dangerous, which he utilises so much to the extent that he comparably rarely hits a topspin or flat two-handed backhand.
_	The impact of the economic crisis hit the Instituto Cubano del Arte e Industria Cinematográfico (ICAIC) directly, leading to an exodus of personnel and the slowing down of production to the extent that, in 1996, the Institute did not release a single feature film
_	Court trials is permitted only to the extent that the prosecutors and the defence can agree that the defendant will plead guilty to some charges and the prosecutor will drop the remainder.
_	The Linz sisters, Viktoria, Katharina, and Elisabeth, are three women whose mother gradually withdrew them from school by creating and reinforcing a story that their father was a monster, to the extent that they believed they must absolutely avoid him.
_	In recent years the value of early Land Rovers and Range Rovers has risen to the extent that this is no longer practical.
_	To the extent that MIT had overspecialized to the detriment of other programs, "the school up the river" courted MIT’s administration with hopes of merging the schools.
_	To the extent that Rule 49(3) of the Standing Rules of Parliament excluded matters of privilege from the jurisdiction of the disciplinary committee of Parliament, it was incumbent on the National Assembly to create a disciplinary mechanism which was consonant with the Constitution.
_	A number of traits of the "A. afarensis" skeleton strongly reflect bipedalism, to the extent that some researchers have suggested that bipedality evolved long before "A. afarensis".
_	Clause 6 of this section goes so far as to declare, ""To the extent that it is capable of doing so, this Chapter extends to things done or actions taken outside Fiji.""
_	CAE is noted for having written the article Nomadic Power and Cultural Resistance, in which CAE argues that with the creation of the internet the power of the elite has become mobile to the extent that it is difficult for a dissident to directly confront the authority, comparing the untrackable, elusive mobility to that of the Scythians.
_	To the extent that records are available, supercells are most frequent in the Great Plains of the central United States and southern Canada extending into the southeastern U.S. and northern Mexico; east-central Argentina and adjacent regions of Uruguay; Bangladesh and parts of eastern India; South Africa; and eastern Australia.
_	He would occasionally experience moments of memory lapse to the extent that he would forget who he was.
_	And to the extent that he's read and people believe what they read, he's dangerous."
_	On 1 December 2005, the Constitutional Court handed down its decision: the nine justices agreed unanimously that the common-law definition of marriage and the marriage formula in the "Marriage Act", to the extent that they excluded same-sex partners from marriage, were unfairly discriminatory, unjustifiable, and therefore unconstitutional and invalid.
_	Relations between the two organizations have been strained ever since—to the extent that they tend to schedule their conventions at the same time, to deter people from being active in both organizations.
_	He had been the target of heavy tackling by the Australians, to the extent that he had to receive stitches above his eye.
_	Following the American Revolution, one of the first legislative acts undertaken by each of the newly independent states was to adopt a reception statute that gave legal effect to the existing body of English common law to the extent that American legislation or the Constitution had not explicitly rejected it.
_	Its inhabitants became famous among the Greeks for their hedonism, feasts, and excesses, to the extent that "sybarite" and "sybaritic" have become bywords for opulent luxury and outrageous pleasure-seeking.
_	Because this provision is not explicitly written into these state laws, as it was in the Missouri law examined in "Webster", pro-choice organizations believe that such a state law is unconstitutional, but only "to the extent that it prohibits pre-viability abortions".
_	Under the management of Martín Palermo, Aránguiz became a regular in the match day squad in the 2016–17 Clausura, and a regular in the starting eleven in the 2017 Torneo de Transición, to the extent that he was named under-20 Player of the Season at the ANFP awards ceremony.
_	Over time, her powers grew to the extent that she could control people without saying a word.
_	The oral debrief has been sophisticated to the extent that its output is now a powerful means of extracting from individuals valuable knowledge that can be used to improve on past performance.
_	To the extent that the proclamation of emancipation is not fulfilled in fact, to that extent we shall have fallen short of assuring freedom to the free."
_	Jackson's health had deteriorated to the extent that he canceled the remainder of his tour and went into rehabilitation.
_	In a 1935 interview, Rosenwald stated that "There is the thought in my mind -- and that I would like to get across to the Jews of America -- that to the extent that the Jews as a whole help their suffering brethren, we will fortify the Jews of all countries against anti-Semitic onslaughts."
_	NAFTA was a mistake to the extent that it did not deliver on what we had hoped it would."
_	However, according to the archaeologist Ruth Whitehouse, Murray's contributions to archaeology and Egyptology were often overlooked as her work was overshadowed by that of Petrie, to the extent that she was often thought of primarily as one of Petrie's assistants rather than as a scholar in her own right.
_	Edward J. Normand is a prominent lawyer known for representing Lloyd's of London in the dispute over the extent that its insurance covered the September 11 attacks on the World Trade Center.
_	If what the law requires to be done can only be done through taxation, then taxation is authorized to the extent that may be needed, unless it is otherwise expressly declared.
_	Winkler also proved himself to be a vocal defender of the theory of evolution, to the extent that he did not wish to question - unlike, at the time, Darwin himself - man's place in evolution.
_	According to Brookes, the influence of Shrewsbury School affected Cardus to the extent that "[t]he playing fields of an English public school were for him a more natural setting than the iconoclastic frenzy of the Lyons café where socialism vied with Richard Strauss for pride of place in the race to modernity".
_	Daniel discards his personal feelings for Janeece and, as her friend, helps out in her wedding to the extent that he was scheduled to give her away, but after Daniel discovers the entire wedding was a scam but was helpless in stopping Craig from getting away, he is left only able to comfort and support Janeece in her difficult time.
_	In this case, the Court struck down that statute to the extent that it considered cross burning as "prima facie" evidence of intent to intimidate.
_	English is the most widely spoken language in the United States and is the common language used by the federal government, to the extent that all laws and compulsory education are practiced in English.
_	As time passed, his accuracy increased to the extent that it seemed every ball landed in exactly the same place.
_	The introduction of ICT in dispute resolution is currently growing to the extent that the difference between off-line dispute resolution and ODR is blurry.
_	On 23 March 2011, Bagwell was quoted by the BBC saying that the Libyan People's Air Force "no longer exists as a fighting force" and that Libyan air defences had been damaged to the extent that NATO forces could now operate over Libyan airspace "with impunity."
_	is undermined by a number of important elisions in the telling of the story, the most important of which is that the writings of the Bogdanovs, to the extent that one can make sense of them, "have almost nothing to do with string theory."
_	Stammler argued that a law could be considered objectively valid to the extent that it enabled the objectively harmonious purposes of freedom, unity and order.
_	The consulship, bereft of any real power, continued to be a great honor, but the celebrations attending it – above all the chariot races – had come to involve considerable expense, which only a few citizens could afford, to the extent that part of the expense had to be covered by the state.
_	The school was overcrowded to the extent that not only did students have to share lockers, but the school day was also run in two shifts to accommodate everyone.
_	There are a couple of exceptions: (i) transfer to a spouse who is a nonresident alien at the time of the transfer; (ii) transfer in trust, to the extent that the sum of the liabilities assumed, plus the liabilities to which the property is subject, exceeds the total adjusted basis of the property; or (iii) transfer in trust, of an installment obligation.
_	The court declared the university's policy unconstitutional to the extent that it regulates the content of student speech in areas of the campus that are public forums".
_	Vocalist James LaBrie described his vocals on "Awake" as "more varied and a lot more aggressive" than on "Images and Words" to the extent that people may think the band had a new singer for the album.
_	Parasitic sea lamprey ("Petromyzon marinus", alewife ("Alosa pseudoharengus") and rainbow smelt ("Osmerus mordax"), in particular, have been implicated in their demise, and are believed to have stressed populations to the extent that previously sustainable levels of exploitation became unsustainable.
_	The bond with Cat enlightens Frances to the extent that she wants to change her life and tackle new scenarios and challenges.
_	As Brooks wrote: "Williams had become a star who transcended race, to the extent that was possible in 1910."
_	I am, nevertheless, a strong advocate of cooperation, which means legitimate exchange, and which circumstances would compel individuals to adopt, to the extent that communism would be beneficial.
_	Exton's advocacy for the Guild appears to have led him to make robust and vigorous comments regarding his opponents, to the extent that it was noted in the 1382 Letter-Book that Exton had made "opprobrious words used to the aforesaid Mayor [Northampton]".
_	A favorable upper-level environment allowed convection to improve, and by late on June 1, the system developed to the extent that the India Meteorological Department (IMD) classified it as a depression.
_	The papers also found public companies, relative to private companies have reduced the percentage of bonus based on financial reporting to the extent that the Sarbanes-Oxley Act has made firms much more concerned about the integrity of their financial reports and increased the costs of noncompliance.
_	His superhuman accuracy also extends beyond archery, to anything he can throw like 616 Bullseye, to the extent that he once escapes captivity by pulling out his own fingernails to use as weapons.
_	Evidence and property management is typically considered critical to the extent that the efficiency or economy of the processes are secondary to the integrity of the evidence and property.
_	Not only the large mansion but 8 other structures have suffered neglect to the extent that they have been placed on the at risk sub-list compiled by the statutory body Historic England.
_	As a didactic device, it can only be used to the extent that it remains intelligible to the learner, unless it is combined with a normal idiomatic translation.
_	Constitutional human rights also apply to foreign nationals to the extent that such rights are not by their nature only applicable to citizens (for example, foreigners have no right to enter Japan under Article 22 and no right to vote under Article 15, and their other political rights may be restricted to the extent that they interfere with the state's decision making).
_	His style fully develops in this time, to the extent that he is awarded the Best Portrait of the Year prize by the magazine "Progresso fotografico" in 1989 and the Kodak European Gold Award in 1994 and 1995.
_	For both males and females, the mistaken partners were more content with their romantic relationship to the extent that they had more positive and less negative sentiment and thoughts toward themselves.
_	Capra and Cohn responded, citing the film’s review, which mollified Kennedy to the extent that he never followed up, although he privately still had doubts about the film.
_	People with albinism often have vision loss to the extent that many are legally blind, though few of them actually cannot see.
_	During his time first as Chief of the "Truppenamt" (1933–1935), and then as Chief of the General Staff (1935–1938), Beck encouraged the development of armoured forces, though not to the extent that advocates of "Panzer" warfare like Heinz Guderian wanted.
_	The peloric plant fascinated Linnaeus to the extent that he grew it at his summer residence in Hammarby and his explanation for it was that a toad-flax had been pollinated by another species.
_	One study showed that Cochrane could learn vocabulary associated with operating a desktop computer; further studies revealed that Cochrane could actually learn commands related to computers to the extent that he was able to perform basic programming tasks on a microcomputer.
_	Some genera such as "Limusaurus" did have somewhat reduced arms and hands, but far from the extent that abelisaurids acquired.
_	Unnecessary in that there are alternative methods available to a correctly rigged diver to compensate for a defective BC, and unsafe in that there is no obvious way to tell which bladder is holding air, and a leak into the secondary bladder may go unnoticed until the buoyancy has increased to the extent that the diver is unable to stop the ascent, while struggling to empty the air from the wrong bladder.
_	The national state itself is legitimate for Green to the extent that it upholds a system of rights and obligations that is most likely to foster individual self-realisation.
_	Some countries with a federal system of government may have both a federal supreme court (such as the Supreme Court of the United States), and supreme courts for each member state (such as the Supreme Court of Nevada), with the former having jurisdiction over the latter only to the extent that the federal constitution extends federal law over state law.
_	Absolute bills are regulated only by the 1878 Act. Security bills are regulated by the 1882 Act and the 1878 Act, to the extent that its provisions are consistent with those of the 1882 Act.
_	The enamel, dentin, and pulp of teeth are affected, to the extent that the affected teeth do not develop properly.
_	He did so with relish and gained respect to the extent that both Roy Evans and Gérard Houllier kept him on the payroll after Souness left, gaining promotion from reserve team coach to the first team, under Houllier.
_	In 1983 anarchist Bob Black wrote that "Separatism may be absurd as a social program and riddled with inconsistencies (scarcely any separatists separate from patriarchal society to anything like the extent that, say, survivalists do — and nobody intervenes more to mind other people’s business than separatists).
_	The challenge of Enhanced 911 for the MLTS is that information about the location of callers is only available to the extent that the private organization discloses the information.
_	"The Charlatan" was notable for the quality of its photography and graphics, to the extent that, in October 1973, it noted the extent to which they were the subject of plagiarism by other Canadian campus papers, as well as within Carleton University itself.
_	To the extent that persons in the invited category are clearly identifiable - as, for example, registered voters of a particular political party, or residents of a certain area - only such persons have the right to make motions, to speak, and to vote at the meeting, and none others need be admitted if the sponsors so choose.
_	The role of the Fugu chef is not to eliminate the toxin altogether, but to reduce it, to the extent that the diner experiences effects of mild intoxication, including waves of euphoria and tingling sensations.
_	Kissinger cared for the Kurds only to the extent that they could be used in the pursuit of US interests, and he would surely have abandoned them sooner or later."
_	To the extent that the State owns listed buildings, they are owned and administrated by the Palaces and Properties Agency.
_	Before her time, bias cut was rare in women's clothing and decidedly outré in garments for men, to the extent that the specially-designed clothing of the dandy and celebrity chef Alexis Soyer were remarked on by George Augustus Sala, on his meeting Soyer in the Hungerford Market:
_	Alongside his commitment to the club, the goal drought has contributed to his cult hero status among Everton fans, to the extent that a banner reading "If Hibbert Scores, We Riot" was displayed at the 2009 FA Cup semi-final.
_	Paul Krugman, a Nobel Prize–winning economist, is skeptical as to whether pollution havens have empirical support in economic theory, as he writes, "At this point it's hard to come up with major examples of industries in which the pollution haven phenomenon, to the extent that it occurs, leads to international negative externalities.
_	At age 36, Jeter appeared to be in decline; Joe Sheehan of "Baseball Prospectus" suggested that Jeter, once a "good, not great" shortstop, had declined to become "below average" defensively, to the extent that he would likely need to change positions; Cashman later acknowledged that Jeter might need to shift to the outfield.
_	(c) To the extent that provisions of the laws of this State, whether derived from statutes, administrative rules or regulations, court rules, governmental policies, common law, court decisions, or any other provisions or sources of law, including in equity, adopt, refer to, or rely upon in any manner, provisions of United States federal law that would have the effect of treating differently same-gender married spouses or their children as compared to different-gender married spouses or their children, same-gender married spouses and their children shall be treated in all respects by the laws of this State as if United States federal law recognizes a marriage between persons of the same gender in the same manner as the laws of this State.
_	To the extent that taxing something results in less of it (whether income or consumption), taxing consumption instead of income should encourage both work and capital formation, which will increase economic growth, while discouraging consumption.
_	By 11 April German combat strength had weakened to the extent that they were only defending roadblocks and built-up areas along main roads, supported by a few tanks and assault guns or 2 cm flak guns.
_	When cold water hits a heat exchange coil at , flash steam is generated, along with mechanical shocks to the system and considerable scaling inside the coil to the extent that the water contains dissolved solids.
_	Jennifer (Nancy Allen) is a woman who is suffering from amnesia to the extent that she does not even recognize her husband and daughter.
_	Pretending to be a spy for them allowed Armistead to gain Arnold's confidence to the extent that Arnold used him to guide British troops through local roads.
_	The cannery and hosiery mill have both been modified to the extent that they are not considered contributing properties to the historic district, although their respective water towers are considered contributing structures.
_	Spouge's popularity spread throughout the Caribbean to the extent that the Spouge beat became even more popular than Ska or Calypso.
_	To the extent that it can be said to have "characters," they are the cameramen of the title, the film editor, and the modern Soviet Union they discover and present in the film.
_	State insurance regulation may be saved only to the extent that it regulates genuine insurance companies or insurance contracts.
_	This advertisement was shown repeatedly on broadcast media to the extent that it became a hallmark for the organization.
_	His health had deteriorated to the extent that he canceled the remainder of his tour and flew with Taylor and her husband to London.
_	The seminary has grown to the extent that the first year students, the largest group, have to use the dining hall and recreation room for their studies.
_	While some treaties still expressly forbid any reservations, they are now generally permitted to the extent that they are not inconsistent with the goals and purposes of the treaty.
_	In the inaugural Match of IBC, Bhooloham hits Arumugam to the extent that he goes into a coma.
_	Historian Peter Green comments that giving such a responsibility to a non-Spartan was a telling indication of the extent that Sparta had lost her Lycurgian traditions.
_	Later in his career he advanced a seminal theory of the "politics of getting" in which he asserted: "American politicians will get as much as they can for their constituents, with only casual attention to the merits of the case and to the extent that they are not likely to be held directly accountable for costs".
_	"The term," writes Butler, "will be revised, dispelled, rendered obsolete to the extent that it yields to the demands which resist the term precisely because of the exclusions by which it is mobilized."
_	For Langs, the latter may be significant in any given clinical situation but precisely to the extent that they raise issues associated with emotional adaptation.
_	Authorities in Jamaica were alarmed to the extent that Governor Thomas Modyford authorized Captain Morgan to defend Port Royal against Pardal; however, Morgan instead used this an excuse to assemble a fleet to launch the now famous raid on Panama, in spite of the peace agreement between England and Spain following the signing of the Treaty of Madrid.
_	According to William A. Niskanen, one of the architects of Reaganomics, "Reagan delivered on each of his four major policy objectives, although not to the extent that he and his supporters had hoped", and notes that the most substantial change was in the tax code, where the top marginal individual income tax rate fell from 70.1% to 28.4%, and there was a "major reversal in the tax treatment of business income", with effect of "reducing the tax bias among types of investment but increasing the average effective tax rate on new investment".
_	Dan Arnold writes that apoha is: "the idea that concepts are more precise or determinate (more contentful) just to the extent that they exclude more from their purview; the scope of cat is narrower than that of mammal just insofar as the former additionally excludes from its range all mammals in the world that are not cats."
_	Such causation, to the extent that it is "outside" the mind, would count as an external, knowledge-yielding condition.
_	Under the Leninist precepts of the East German Constitution, the leading role of the ruling SED in the national power structure was expressly stipulated, and except when a party conference was in session, power within the party resided with the Central Committee; although the stark nature of the power relationships between the government ministries, the National legislature (""Volkskammer""), the party central committee and other government institutions was in reality blurred to the extent that the same individuals frequently served in more than one of these institutions.
_	His consciousness merged with the swarm to the extent that they become one being, calling himself/their-self "Swarm".
_	If formation of the RAFT adduct radical is sufficiently thermodynamically favorable, the concentration of active species, P•, will be reduced to the extent that a reduction in the rate of conversion of monomer into polymer is also observed, as compared to an equivalent polymerization without RAFT agent.
_	An alternative view is that Ecuador and Venezuela separated from the Gran Colombia Federation and inherited all of the treaty obligations that Gran Colombia had assumed, at least to the extent that they apply to their respective territories.
_	In accordance with the party's motto, the foundation of this platform holds that an individual owns his or her own life, is responsible for his or her decisions and prosperity, and that each has the inherent right to autonomously pursue his or her private interests to the extent that those pursuits do not violate the rights of another.
_	He betrayed his patients' trust in a way and to the extent that I believe is unparalleled in history."
_	Despite the role of the military in the rise to power of the Qarase government, relations between them noticeably deteriorated subsequently, to the extent that by July 2004, the Military was threatening to overthrow the government.
_	A great number of words of French origin have entered the English language to the extent that many Latin words have come to the English language.
_	During that period, the small number of other countries with similar practices all repealed such laws and moved to taxing based on residence, to the extent that residence-based taxation might now be regarded as a norm of customary international law; Allison Christians has stated that the U.S. might be regarded as a persistent objector to the emergence of this new norm, though she notes that the U.S.' sporadic efforts to enforce its system over the years in which this norm formed might not rise to the level of "persistent".
_	Another remix, "Richard's Hairpiece", was done courtesy of Aphex Twin, in which the riff is removed, and Beck's vocals are sped up to the extent that his voice is extremely high-pitched.
_	The Class MC1 were duplicates of the Class MC in most respects, to the extent that the majority of spare parts for the two classes were interchangeable.
_	The old man became passionately in love with this stone to the extent that when people asked his wife his whereabouts, she would answer that he has gone to his first wife (Mikayi) hence the stone of the first wife (Kit Mikayi).
_	Augustan representations in statue form are highly controlled to the extent that there are only three or four different subgroups; based on features such as the detail of the hairstyle this may be classified as one of the "Prima Porta type".
_	He was reportedly disproportionately tall, to the extent that his hands reached his knees while standing.
_	Specific diseases have reduced the populations of these emblematic species to the extent that they are mostly lost in the wild.
_	Ray Illingworth, again from Yorkshire, instilled self-belief to the extent that the county took its first ever trophy in 1972, the Benson & Hedges Cup with Chris Balderstone man of the match.
_	The Roman Catholic Church was the other great influence on the PC and the party sought to represent Catholicism in its most traditional form, to the extent that more radical elements broke away to form the Social Christian Party under Ponce Enríquez.
_	Since those original observations, many refinements have increased the versatility and sensitivity of the procedure to the extent that in situ hybridization is now considered an essential tool in cytogenetics.
_	Many of these barrios are in fact located in very steep grounds to the extent that not even a regular bus system could be either useful or commercially profitable.
_	The music, costumes, colorful fabrics and choreography have mesmerized her to the extent that she would listen to radio stations broadcasting Indian music during school classes.
_	Pressing a key harder allows the head to come into contact under greater pressure, to the extent that the Mellotron responds to aftertouch.
_	It should be noted that political infighting eroded discipline and cohesion within the army, to the extent that there was armed fighting between contending military units during the early 1960s.
_	During the occupation by the US, there were regular fights between Australian and US servicemen, to the extent that in 1943 the Australian Army banned its soldiers from the Wentworth.
_	During the early 1980s, these committees had considerable power and became a growing source of tension within the Jamihiriya, to the extent that Gaddafi sometimes criticized their effectiveness and excessive repression, until the power of the Revolutionary Committees was eventually restricted in the late 1980s.
_	Opponents of the three major newspapers credit them with a disproportionate degree of influence and power, to the extent that they believe that simply abolishing them would unleash major positive changes (one of the most prominent anti-newspaper organizations is called "Beautiful World Without Chojoongdong").
_	By the early 15th century, Mary had grown in importance within the Christian doctrine to the extent that she was commonly seen as the most accessible intercessor with God.
_	However, the Terminator's knowledge about Skynet and its technology in addition to the training and emotional support it provides are invaluable to Sarah, and its decade of raising her provides it with an unprecedented level of emotional development, to the extent that it keeps her childhood drawings and photographs in its base.
_	Hepburn was noted for her fashion choices and distinctive look, to the extent that journalist Mark Tungate has described her as a recognisable brand.
_	Cochiti Dam is operated to bypass all inflow to the lake to the extent that downstream channel conditions are capable of safely bypassing the flow.
_	This was thought to be due to the rumble strip "scaring" sleeping drivers to the extent that they overreacted.
_	The beam projector no longer is used to the extent that it once was, as newer fixtures and PAR lamps have created easier ways to produce the effect.
_	By 1797, his relationship with his uncle, who was living a retired life, and who wanted to seek refuge in China on the pretext of meeting the new emperor, had deteriorated to the extent that he ordered his imprisonment on 19 February 1797 and his subsequent murder on 23 June 1797.
_	Protestants too see the authority given to the apostles as unique, proper to the apostles alone, to the extent that they generally reject the idea of a succession of bishops to the apostles in governing the Church.
_	The region around the town and especially the pass were the scene of frequent and bloody clashes, to the extent that the Arabs reportedly renamed it "darb al-salāma" ("pass of peace") in an attempt, as the "Encyclopedia of Islam" comments, "to exorcise the evil fate which seemed to be attached to it".
_	Both men become fixated on the leg to the extent that it interferes with their personal lives.
_	The court held, "Thus, to the extent that this Court's decisions have indicated that the Clause requires a physical presence in a State, they are overruled."
_	The plays were not licensed by the BBC, but the duo were clearly intended to be the same characters, to the extent that the BBC intervened, causing BBV to change the character names to "The Dominie" and "Alice".
_	By 1931, Rovering had established itself internationally to the extent that the first World Rover Moot was organised in 1931 at Kandersteg, Switzerland.
_	Lucy was a very pious child, to the extent that she made a commitment to chastity at 12 years of age.
_	This is acknowledged in democratic theory to the extent that democracy is normally thought to involve the civil right of dissent from majority opinion, and consequently also the civil right of a minority viewpoint to exist.
_	To the extent that they were publicly visible, the Auxiliary Units were disguised as Home Guard units, under GHQ Home Forces.
_	To the extent that a popular vote was held, it was primarily directed to filling the office of Vice President.
_	Contrary to the 'Ndrangheta code, it allowed bosses to establish close connections with state representatives, even to the extent that some were affiliated with the "Santa".
_	Cosimo III was succeeded by his son, Gian Gastone, who, for most of his life, kept to his bed and acted in an unregal manner, rarely appearing to his subjects, to the extent that, at times, he had been thought dead.
_	The team was generally regarded as being slow but since his involvement there has been a marked improvement in speed to the extent that they were then considered one of the quickest teams in the NRL competition, he has since been appointed to a similar role at the Canterbury-Bankstown Bulldogs and has achieved similar results.
_	Although it was popular and critically acclaimed, according to Ellis himself the leaking of the pilot annoyed Warner Brothers to the extent that they killed the project.
_	The "Statement of Faith" of the Nordic Catholic Church states that it adheres to its Lutheran heritage to the extent that it has embraced and transmitted the orthodox and catholic faith of the undivided church, therefore also embracing the Catholic faith as taught by the Polish National Catholic Church.
_	In the course of the 18th century, the French school became the western European standard to the extent that Angelo, an Italian-born master teaching in England, published his "L'Ecole des Armes" in French in 1763.
_	Many may have suspected that something was in the offing when they received orders to mobilize with full-gear and rations for three-days of maneuvers and drills, but very few would have known the extent that these "maneuvers" would take.
_	In these cases, the impact of symptoms on the individual may be mild, to the extent that casual observers might not know of their condition.
_	His concept of setting the action in the corner of a huge studio soundstage created problems with the set and limited the staging to the extent that it was seen as static and boring.
_	France notes that Matthew seems to only be interested in the geographic names of the verse, to the extent that the grammatical links that makes Isaiah 9:1 comprehensible are left out of Matthew 4:15 turning it into little more than a list.
_	He has expanded SOL Music Center continuously to the extent that today it is known as one of the best-established music centers in Iran dedicated to classical music.
_	As a matter of fact, he acknowledged the primacy and supreme power of the Roman Pontiff, but, in common with many other theologians of his time, maintained the superiority of general Councils, at least to the extent that they could compel the pope's resignation.
_	By 2002, applications had grown to the extent that the "Organic Reactions" chapter published that year, limited to intramolecular Heck reactions, covered 377 pages.
_	The procreation theme is repeated, though for the first time a personal relationship between the poet and the youth is stated, even to the extent that the youth is asked to have a child to please the poet.
_	Police searched the hotel to the extent that they legally could.
_	Their mode of operation was exclusively manual, to the extent that winding of film is separated from shutter cocking.
_	A belief that the eye "recorded" the last image seen before death was widespread in the late 19th and early 20th centuries, and was a frequent plot device in fiction of the time, to the extent that police photographed the victims' eyes in several real-life murder investigations, in case the theory was true.
_	No other provision of law, enacted before, on, or after April 20, 1983, may be construed to limit, supersede, or otherwise modify the provisions of this section except to the extent that it does so by express reference to this section.
_	In November, after the failed British attack at Gallabat, Gazelle Force operated from the Gash river delta against Italian advanced posts around Kassala on the Ethiopian plateau, to the extent that Aosta ordered Frusci, the commander of the Northern Sector to challenge the British raiders.
_	The Reol have also decided not to embrace technology to the extent that no other species have.
_	Wildlife in the region is vulnerable to introduced predators such as the Polynesian rat, ferrets and stoats to the extent that the strongest remaining populations of many plants, birds and reptiles are on offshore islands rather than North Island itself.
_	He may only deduct his contribution to the extent that it does not exceed 50% of his adjusted gross income.
_	To the extent that "John Adams" is a period piece, it isn't quite as lush as, say, some BBC productions.
_	In his works of the Paris years Lourié's early radicalism turns to an astringent form of neoclassicism and Russophile nostalgia; a dialogue with Stravinsky's works of the same period is evident, even to the extent that Stravinsky may have taken ideas from the younger composer: Lourié's "A Little Chamber Music" (1924) seems to prophesy Stravinsky's "Apollon musagète" (1927), his "Concerto spirituale" for chorus, piano and orchestra (1929) the latter's "Symphony of Psalms" (1930).
_	He supported the moderate coinage of silver and favored revision of the high protective tariff, but not to the extent that would make him support either the Morrison tariff bill of 1886 or the Mills tariff bill of 1888.
_	Many convents and monasteries helped—but not to the extent that Pius's close associate Robert Leiber claimed."
_	To the extent that a conventional political position can be inferred from Green’s writings it would appear to be one of extreme libertarianism, and in fact a pamphlet of Green's on education was published in the 1990s by the Libertarian Alliance.
_	With a contemporary four-pole motor, this would vary the pole gap at the upper and lower poles, probably to the extent that the armature hit the pole pieces (suspension travel being far larger than typical pole gaps).
_	Most noticeably, LaFaro's bass is promoted from a mere accompanying instrument to one of almost equal status to the piano (though not to the extent that it would be on later albums such as "Sunday at the Village Vanguard").
_	Damage to the wind chests, some of the wooden pipes and to the electro-mechanical working of the organ affected the instrument to the extent that several ranks of pipes no longer functioned.
_	As Kodhai grew into a beautiful maiden, her fervor for the Lord Perumal grew to the extent that she decided to marry only the Lord himself.
_	Instead, English translations of manhwa have achieved success by targeting the manga and anime community, to the extent that manhwa are often marketed as "manga."
_	The ravines are today popular with hikers and bicyclists, to the extent that erosion and wildlife disruption are becoming a problem in certain areas.
_	Makuva has been heavily influenced by neighboring East Timorese Papuan languages, to the extent that it was long thought to be a Papuan language.
_	Lindbergh's speeches and writings in later life emphasized technology and nature, and his lifelong belief that "... all the achievements of mankind have value only to the extent that they preserve and improve the quality of life."
_	The series, however, ultimately proved duly unsuccessful (to the extent that there was no Transformers animated series broadcast in Japan in 2001) and following both the conclusion of it and the second season of "Beast Machines", Takara and Hasbro opted to co-produce the next series for the first time.
_	This led to the rapid abandonment of the title "parson" in favour of "vicar", to the extent that now, as previously for parson, the term "vicar" is often used for any cleric of the Church of England.
_	Moreover, in scans that were held while Armagan drew, his visual cortex signals seemed as he was seeing to the extent that a naive viewer of his scan might assume Armagan really could see.
_	She is also a world-class method actress, literally becoming the object of her impersonation, to the extent that she not only thinks but reacts as they would.
_	However, to the extent that piriformis syndrome is actually related to sciatic nerve pain based in the spine, physically "warming up" the hip muscles will have no effect in preventing disc herniation and subsequent experience of pain along the sciatic pathway.
_	The Mennonite Brethren Church formally broke with the main church on January 6, 1860 when this growing group of dissenters presented a document to the elders of the Molotschna Mennonite Churches which indicated "that the total Mennonite brotherhood has decayed to the extent that we can no more be part of it" and fear the "approach of an unavoidable judgment of God."
_	Before the US Commission on New Technological Uses of Copyrighted Works (CONTU) decided in 1974 that "computer programs, to the extent that they embody an author's original creation, are proper subject matter of copyright", software was not considered copyrightable.
_	During a radio interview in San Francisco, Eminem reportedly angered local DJ Sista Tamu due to a freestyle about "slapping a pregnant bitch" to the extent that on air she broke a copy of "The Slim Shady LP".
_	Surface supply ensures that the gas supply will not run out suddenly due to an unexpected high demand, which can deplete scuba supply to the extent that there may not be enough left to surface according to plan.
_	The trilogy of films called "Heimat" by the German director Edgar Reitz (1984, 1992, and 2004) has been described as "post-"Heimatfilm"" because the director neither sets out to challenge the genre on political or social grounds nor idealizes the past to the extent that earlier "Heimatfilme" did.
_	Evicted from Rayy, in order to gain allies for an attempt to recover Khurasan, Rafi reconciled himself with Muhammad ibn Zayd, to the extent that he had the Friday prayer read in the latter's name.
_	"We have been successful to the extent that we have diminished the element of fear in the minds of black people."
_	If perception is generated empirically, then "the extent that a stimulus is consistent with imperfect transmittance...will be incorporated into the perception of the target."
_	To the extent that technology is now a dominant aspect of modern global culture, most modern thrillers are "techno-thrillers", and the genre is somewhat diffuse.
_	We feel, as did the District Court of Appeal, that the evidence as to both of the events above adverted to, must have prejudiced the defendant in the minds of the jury to the extent that the testimony offered in her defense could not have received the deliberate consideration that the law accords to all persons charged with crime.
_	When at the next council of war the plans for the next battle are being discussed, and duties are being handed out, the Prince is thrown into confusion by the appearance of Princess Natalie, who reveals herself as the owner of the glove, and he is distracted to the extent that he fails to take on board his orders, which are not to engage the enemy without a direct order to do so.
_	The coup succeeded to the extent that a second provisional government of Greece was formed by the group in Thessaloniki.
_	Coe found that it, "while hardly a ground-breaking piece of experimentalism, succeeds to the extent that it is both intelligent and reasonably accessible.
_	Following the extension of the railway network, Allahabad has grown to the extent that it has been found necessary to provide for the addition to the transept and choir of a nave accommodating a much larger congregation that was originally expected
_	To the extent that they neglect their own training in the faith, or teach erroneous doctrine, or are deficient in their religious, moral, or social life, they must be said to conceal rather than reveal the authentic face of God and religion."
_	In addition, in the last three years the government has increasingly allocated additional funds to land transport, to the extent that today the total expenditure by the NZ Transport Agency on land transport projects exceeds road tax revenue collected.
_	But to the extent that the market rewards "looking the other way" in developing nations, whether through local corruption (bribed inspectors or regulators) or plausible deniability, such protections are circumvented.
_	This may be tolerated, to the extent that the selfish purpose of the opportunist is compatible with, or does not conflict with, the goals and intentions of the group.
_	Pro-choice organizations, such as the Guttmacher Institute, posit that some of these state laws are unconstitutional, based on these and other Supreme Court rulings, at least to the extent that these state laws require approval of a second or third physician.
_	Australia was another important market for the Elf and N series – to the extent that it was manufactured there from the 1970s using many local components.
_	The traumas of the past are only important to the extent that the individual lets them influence his or her thoughts in the present.
_	In his opinion, Judge Walker further ruled that "Miller's opinions on gay and lesbian political power are entitled to little weight and only to the extent that they are amply supported by reliable evidence."
_	The attack was moderately successful to the extent that many Portuguese ships were destroyed.
_	Katherine's knowledge of analytic geometry helped make quick allies of male bosses and colleagues to the extent that, "they forgot to return me to the pool".
_	Medical bills ate away at his money to the extent that later in life he was left virtually penniless.
_	Some others were once normal French but have become very old-fashioned, or have acquired different meanings and connotations in the original language, to the extent that they would not be understood (either at all, or in the intended sense) by a native French speaker.
_	To the extent that ancestral men were capable of pursuing short-term mating strategies with multiple women, the evolutionary benefits are relatively straightforward.
_	In September 2009, Netflix awarded 1 million US dollars to the winner of Netflix prize—the team who by 10% improved the accuracy of predictions about the extent that people enjoy a movie based on their past movie preferences.
_	Virtually all the oldest honoraries were once clearly secret societies, and to the extent that they are distinct now is at least ambiguous.
_	Under Morgagni's direction, the agency underwent important development, to the extent that in 1939 there were 32 Italian bureaus and 16 others abroad, with 261 correspondents in Italy and 65 abroad, who every day processed an average of 1270 incoming dispatches and 1215 outgoing.
_	The competition between NER, H&BR, and Hull Dock Company on dock and railway rates weakened the latter two financially to the extent that both began seeking amalgamations with the NER or other companies.
_	The polyamorous nature of many sexual relationships further impacts the health situation, to the extent that it has given rise to a love vocabulary that is unique to the region.
_	County hurling teams at various levels in Ulster look and travel southwards with apprehension and even trepidation, but the standard bearers in Ulster Colleges have progressed in skill and attitude to the extent that they now expect to beat their opponents from the other provinces.
_	To the extent that the model expresses such semantics internally, it is not a pure model.
_	After being hired, Heggie began composing again, and the focal dystonia in his hand lessened to the extent that he could begin rehabilitating his piano playing.
_	He suggests that Caligula viewed anything Gemellus did in his name with paranoia, although Gemellus' only named supporter (to the extent that he should co-rule with Caligula) was Aulus Avilius Flaccus, the prefect of Egypt.
_	Reduplication is a very common practice in Persian, to the extent that there are jokes about it.
_	However, the mechanical hackamore is also unrelated to a true hackamore except to the extent that both are headgear that control a horse with some form of noseband rather than a bit in the horse's mouth.
_	As stated in the Explanatory Statement of the BEPS multilateral instrument this reflects the ordinary rule of treaty interpretation, as reflected in Article 30(3) of the Vienna Convention on the Law of Treaties, under which an earlier treaty between parties that are also parties to a later treaty will apply only to the extent that its provisions are compatible with those of the later treaty.
_	The "cardo" was also a principle in the layout of the Roman army's marching camp, the gates of which were aligned with the cardinal points to the extent that the terrain permitted.
_	Even to the extent that the downstream mills stayed economically viable, log drives disappeared.
_	Lithuania became the heartland of the traditionalist opposition to Hasidism, to the extent that in popular perception "Lithuanian" and "misnaged" became virtually interchangeable terms.
_	"Epitaph One", the final episode of season one, which was not aired as part of the show's original run on US television, depicts a post-apocalyptic future where the mind-wiping technology of the Dollhouse has developed to the extent that vast numbers of people can be remotely wiped and have new personalities implanted, which has brought about the end of civilization.
_	The prosecution's presentation of the case has been criticized, to the extent that in some jurisdictions it might have resulted in a mistrial.
_	To the extent that it had any real meaning, "Cool Britannia" referred to the transient fashionable London house scene: clubs included the Ministry of Sound and the underground Megatripolis at Heaven, 1990s bands such as Blur and Oasis, fashion designers, the Young British Artists and magazines.
_	Fetus' lower extremities were deformed to the extent that the gender couldn't be determined.
_	LLinux is a variant of the Linux kernel that is being altered to the extent that it can run virtualized on the L4.
_	Revenue for rendering of services is accounted for to the extent that the stage of completion of the transaction can be measured reliably (IAS18.20).
_	Whatever the nature of the project, Chuck's high retention rate of subliminal data made him an ideal choice by Fleming for the project to the extent that Chuck would not be given the option of refusal (basically a drafting as opposed to a recruitment.)
_	The latter may be indistinguishable from simple acquiescence to the other party, to the extent that the person avoiding the conflict subordinates their own wishes to the party with whom they have the conflict.
_	Towards the late 1980s and onward, differences in opinions between Procidis and Villien, grew to the extent that the dispute went to court.
_	A business is generally able to recover input VAT to the extent that the input VAT is attributable to (that is, used to make) its taxable outputs.
_	Evans states that some people had been desensitized to the extent that they see breeding of deformed and diseased animals as normal.
_	The artist is supplanted by the viewer as the purveyor of meaning, even to the extent that an interpretation is still valid regardless of whether the creator had intended it.
_	A mental breakdown (also known as a nervous breakdown) is an acute, time-limited, mental disorder that manifests primarily as severe, stress-induced depression, anxiety, paranoia, or dissociation in a previously functional individual, to the extent that they are no longer able to function on a day-to-day basis until the disorder is resolved.
_	The common brushtail possum was introduced to New Zealand in 1837 to establish a fur industry, but in the mild subtropical climate of New Zealand, and with few to no natural predators, it thrived to the extent that it became a major agricultural and conservation pest.
_	In rural Paraguay, for example, it is not uncommon for adults to fervently believe in this myth, to the extent that they leave gifts of rum and cigars for the Pombero nightly.
_	In contrast, to the extent that vital needs find selfish and competitive fulfillment, a person acquires hostile emotions and limited external relationships—his awareness remains internal and limited.
_	Hilbert called Kronecker a ""dogmatist", to the extent that he accepts the integer with its essential properties as a dogma and does not look back" and equated his extreme constructivist stance with that of Brouwer's intuitionism, accusing both of "subjectivism":
_	As a result, many Balinese Protestants left Bali, where they were largely excluded from everyday Balinese life, to the extent that there are more GKPB members outside of Bali than within Bali.
_	"It's a shame that the Thousand Oaks personality is overpowering to the extent that Newbury Park is losing its large ranches and freedom."
_	To the extent that researchers have attempted to determine why genes and environments are correlated, most evidence has pointed to the intervening effects of personality and behavioral characteristics.
_	In the process of development of English, numerous sound changes and analogical developments have fragmented the classes to the extent that most of them no longer have any coherence: only classes 1, 3 and 4 still have significant subclasses that follow uniform patterns.
_	After Zogu's rise in power Alizoti took part in various negotiations between Albania and Italy, always siding with Italy to the detriment of Albanian interests, to the extent that he was called the "kavass of the Italians".
_	While Chiang Ching-kuo began slowly relaxing restraints on political opposition, “Tang-wai” was already earning large support from local elections in the end of the 1970s; much to the extent that after Kaohsiung Incident in 1979, the KMT initiated stricter surveillance, and capture, of opposition members.
_	SEG and Union had become closely affiliated with each other shortly after the routes of the two firms began to intersect in Jacksonville, Lake City, and Dothan – to the extent that the UBC coaches began to appear in the SEG livery, including the dogs, with the names of both the Southeastern Greyhound Lines (in large lettering) and the Union Bus Company (in small sublettering) – and to the extent that the UBC began to operate coaches which SEG provided to the UBC (even new ACF coaches which SEG had bought specifically for the UBC).
_	But as the strength of their minds grew, the Hive's bodies withered away and became useless, to the extent that some members of the group apparently no longer even possess organic forms, only robotic shells which house their brains.
_	Despite the warnings of Commissioner Gordon, Alberto is released from Arkham with the help of Janice Porter, Dent's replacement as Gotham's district attorney; Porter argues that Alberto has been deemed 'cured' and that he was the victim of various civil rights violations during his arrest due to the brutal beating he received from Batman, to the extent that his right arm is still disfigured and apparently useless.
_	By this stage, relations with the other villages had also deteriorated to the extent that even Sinkan, previously thought to be tightly bound to the Dutch, was plotting rebellion.
_	S is a derivative of the Lotus Elise and Exige to the extent that the cars have variations of the same bonded aluminium chassis but the Europa bears a separate Lotus model designation (Type 121) due, in part, to its longer chassis and completely new design.
_	"To the extent that the depreciation or increase in value of this paper is independent of the movement of value of the actual capital that it represents, the wealth of the nation is just as great before as after its depreciation or increase in value.
_	Additionally, the hand would scratch at the patient's leg to the extent that an orthotic device was required to prevent injury.
_	Gould participated in many interviews, and had a predilection for scripting them to the extent that they may be seen as much as "works" as off-the-cuff discussions.
_	One year Bill was asked to lead the annual rodeo parade, which is by far the biggest event in Bismarck-Mandan, to the extent that one year they had a Hollywood movie cowboy lead it.
_	Refused to cooperate with Trenčín košútovskými Guard to the extent that the suzerain Trencin county wanted to close the prison veľkostankovského mayor.
_	That is, to the extent that they are perceived at all, because to a great degree they remain invisible in a cultural context that gives little recognition to female sexuality in the first place.
_	Abbot Gregor Lechner (1543–1558), towards the middle of the 16th century, made the monastic school, previously private, into a public school, and did much to preserve Catholicism in the district, where the Protestant doctrines had become widely prevalent - to the extent that his successor, Abbot Weiner (1558–1565) favoured them and thus introduced dissension into the abbey, dissension which risked developing into serious disruption.
_	As a result, it was downgraded to a tropical depression, and Nora weakened to the extent that it barely met the criteria for being a tropical cyclone.
_	Having complained about the food and quarreled with his colleagues to the extent that he would not dine with them; Dr. Trevor now discovered Blackwell eating as heartily as any other prisoner.
_	To the extent that option 2 can be eliminated, one can deduce that "if X is not detected then X is not present" and therefore the null result is evidence of absence.
_	Another suit found that the Fourteenth Amendment gave the Congress the power to abrogate state immunity from suit to the extent that this was necessary to protect Constitutional rights.
_	In addition, usage of station ticket offices has dropped, to the extent that in June 2007, TfL announced that a number of their ticket offices would close, with some others reducing their opening hours.
_	The Bible is cited frequently, at length, and to the exclusion of all other authorities, to the extent that over half of the book consists of Biblical quotations.
_	The sawdust accumulated to the extent that it had to be 'dug out' and removed in a bucket.
_	Basically I turn up with songs that are finished to the extent that they have verses, choruses, middle eights, chord progressions and vocals.
_	Witnessing the World Trade Center towers fall influenced Way's life to the extent that he decided to start a band.
_	In keeping with Beery's by-now-established trademark broad acting style, a greater emphasis was placed on humor, to the extent that the 1941 version is frequently categorized as a comedy.
_	He performed the job with distinction until 1985, to the extent that Hull City's youth development department later established an annual Mike Rawding Memorial Trophy.
_	Harrison musical biographer Simon Leng notes also Harrison's dismay at how the 1960s countercultural revolution had failed to influence the motivations of the music business – to the extent that the altruism behind the Concert for Bangladesh "was almost torpedoed by boardroom balance sheets".
_	Dworkin argues that moral principles that people hold dear are often wrong, even to the extent that certain crimes are acceptable if one's principles are skewed enough.
_	In the United States, the phrase was popularised by Philbin during his tenure as the host of that country's version, to the extent that TV Land listed it in its special "100 Greatest TV Quotes and Catchphrases", which aired in 2006.
_	By then British–Cossack relationships were friendly to the extent that many on both sides had developed feelings for the other.
_	Access to Ward Island (and presumably to South Ward Island) is reported as being ‘complicated by the swell and the rocky coast’ to the extent that in one instance, ‘no safe boat landing sites could be found’.
_	Characters may be transported to these different worlds, but the magic contained within those worlds is only feasible to the extent that it coincides with the technology of the day (e.g., the combustion engine).
_	The transparent faceplates of most helmets in current use are highly impact resistant and not easily damaged to the extent that they leak dangerously.
_	Subjects of the country festivals ("Kermesse") that were popularized by David Teniers, father and son to the extent that paintings and tapestries showing such rustic themes were called "Ténières".
_	The AOC was essentially High Anglican and it was Orthodox only to the extent that its leader had the title of Patriarch, that the original form of the Nicene Creed had been adopted, and that its episcopal source was in an Oriental Orthodox Church.
_	Furthermore, the Netherlands had not held a referendum on the euro, and amidst concern that its adoption had led to an increase in the cost of living (combined with Dutch citizens' status as the largest net per capita contributors to the EU), around 30% of the voters took the opportunity to "take revenge" on the political establishment for seeking to advance European integration in a manner that did not engage the public to the extent that it could have done.
_	Large hunts following termination quickly depleted game reserves, and wetlands were drained to the extent that only 10% of the original marshes still existed by 1992.
_	In 1850, Russenorsk became more limited to Norwegian fishermen, whereas Norwegian traders spent more time in Russia, often formally studying the language to the extent that they could communicate in rudimentary Russian.
_	Gummow, Hayne and Kirby JJ held the impugned section of the VA to be valid, concluded that it would infringe the second limb of the Lange v Australian Broadcasting Corporation test to the extent that it applied to political communication and read it down so that it did not.
_	Richard Lloyd apparently disagreed with the selection of this song, preferring "O Mi Amore" for their debut, to the extent that he seriously considered leaving the band.
_	By the early 18th century, the contrast between the two main Protestant variants had mitigated to the extent that this building policy was now acceptable for the Calvinist majority of the population.
_	The behaviour of the host is manipulated to the extent that it no longer grows, moults or regenerates any limbs that are lost, and when the parasite eggs are ready for release, it will climb onto a rock, bob about to release them and waft them on their way.
_	CONTU decided that "computer programs, to the extent that they embody an author's original creation, are proper subject matter of copyright."
_	Kohlberg's research can be classed as descriptive ethics to the extent that he describes human beings' actual moral development.
_	To the extent that these theories place themselves in the tradition of "psychological" social psychology, they focus on explaining an individual's actions within a group in terms of mental events and states.
_	War to the extent that it had been decided to recall and replace all hammered silver coinage in circulation.
_	Thus, she argues, "To the extent that the "Annales" today seem to the modern reader crucial to the epic tradition, they are the creation of Vergil and of the Vergiliocentric sources."
_	Zaki is the founder of Nazaki Services Pvt Ltd, which is a company in the Maldives to the extent that all local news media refer to him as Nazaki Zaki.
_	SSPX offered to hold a funeral and issued a statement on their website saying, "A Christian who was baptized and received the sacraments of confession and the Eucharist, no matter what his faults and sins were, to the extent that he dies reconciled with God and the church, has a right to the celebration of the holy Mass and a funeral."
_	(3) If the principal purpose of the firm is other than to carry on regulated activities, a person performs the small friendly society function only to the extent that he has responsibility for a regulated activity.
_	His reputation quickly spread, to the extent that when Joseph Swan was developing his incandescent light bulb, he consulted Crompton over its design.
_	This is no doubt because interstellar travel is cheap and extremely fast, to the extent that the newspaper is still an effective means of dissemination, and hence there are few isolated communities likely to undergo linguistic drift.
_	Efforts to reform in the wake of the Council of Basle, under Johannes Rode, the Carthusian prior appointed by the bishop, led to spiritual and economic renewal, to the extent that St. Matthias' became an example for other monasteries.
_	He was a close friend of the eldest son of the last Crown Prince of Prussia, Prince Wilhelm of Prussia, to the extent that people said they behaved like twins.
_	Thus, to the extent that corporate directors acted so as to increase shareholder wealth, tax incentives would not influence corporate behaviour.
_	The statistics show that "no other athlete dominates an international sport to the extent that Bradman does cricket".
_	Director Peter Weir thought Pirkis "stood out very early on, but not to the extent that you see in the film.
_	According to the court, to the extent that the Constitution provides the framework for the governance of South Africa, it is territorially bound and has no application beyond the borders of the Republic.
_	The "single-handed" attack by Wittmann early on, has excited imaginations to the extent that some historians and writers conclude that it has dominated the historical record to an unwarranted degree and that while "remarkable", the role of Wittmann in the battle has been exaggerated.
_	Some differ to the extent that, at first, they were considered separate species.
_	Caldwell argued that Shanars could be considered Hindus only to the extent that "Hindu" was a geographical category that included "any class in India."
_	"Sciringes heal" has been held to represent Skiringssal (Old Norse: "Skíringssalr") in almost all relevant historical writing since the early 19th century, mainly by reason of the superficial similarity of the names, to the extent that some modern translations of Ohthere's account feature the name "Skiringssal" in place of "Sciringes heal".
_	For some Northern Paiutes, "Cyperus" tubers were a mainstay food, to the extent that they were known as "tövusi-dökadö" ("nutsedge tuber eaters").
_	By 1922, the popularity of tennis had grown to the extent that the club's small ground could no longer cope with the numbers of spectators and the renamed All England Lawn Tennis and Croquet Club moved to new grounds close to Wimbledon Park.
_	He said the government also wanted the media not to undermine racial and religious harmony to the extent that it could threaten national security and public order.
_	The speech of the new, Bremen-engineered Ambassador intoxicates the Hosts and results in the entire Ariekei population becoming addicted to the Ambassador's speech regardless of content, to the extent that they cannot live without it.
_	By December 1972, the term was in circulation to the extent that "The New Yorker"s Ellen Willis, contrasting her own tastes with those of "Flash" and fellow critic Nick Tosches, wrote, ""Punk-rock" has become the favored term of endearment."
_	The State collects and deposits into the Air Pollution Control Fund $6.00 (as of January, 2010) of the motor vehicle smog check fee to implement the Carl Moyer Program “to the extent that…
_	Historians disagree as to the extent that United States officials were motivated to intervene for humanitarian reasons but agree that yellow journalism exaggerated atrocities attributed to Spanish forces against Cuban civilians.
_	The ACC teaches that Lutheranism in general is a form of non-Roman Catholicism, and considers the other Lutheran churches to be "Protestant" only to the extent that they have accepted insights from the Calvinist and Zwinglian phases of the Reformation.
_	A contemporary of other Norwich Hall of Fame players Reg Foulkes, Ron Ashman and Roy Hollis, Pickwick was a loyal Norwich servant, to the extent that he appeared in a match versus Colchester United F.C. on his wedding day in 1951.
_	The government allowed two thermal plants in Osh and Bishkek to deteriorate to the extent that now produces power shortages in winter.
_	This allowed NSF to support NSFNET and related networking initiatives, but only to the extent that that support was ""primarily for research and education in the sciences and engineering"."
_	Justice Samuel Alito, joined by Justice Anthony Kennedy, wrote a concurrence indicating that he agreed with the majority opinion to the extent that:
_	Throughout the early-twentieth century, traffic on the line grew to the extent that there was a daily goods train to and from Hamilton.
_	Eventually though, declines in both passenger and freight traffic following the Second World War, to the extent that the line was eventually closed completely on 12 September 1977 along with a number of other lines in the south west of Victoria.
_	Returning Confederate soldiers were given free rides home, to the extent that the company's limited rail network would allow.
_	In the end, the station's analog signal remained on the air even after that date (a result of the transition being delayed to June 12); however, due to the continued failure of the transmission line (to the extent that the station estimated its analog signal was only reaching 3% of its former coverage reach, with no signal at all at the station's Dedham studios), WFXT shut down its analog signal, over UHF channel 25, on February 27, 2009, becoming the second English-language major network station in Boston to exclusively transmit a digital signal (WZMY terminated its analog signal in December 2008) and the only Fox-owned station to shut down its analog signal prior to the new June 12 transition date.
_	Polluting water may be the biggest single misuse of water; to the extent that a pollutant limits other uses of the water, it becomes a waste of the resource, regardless of benefits to the polluter.
_	On the other hand, to the extent that expression becomes increasingly reliant upon private corporations more committed to the realities of the bottom line than to abstract principles of civil liberties, the technology that facilitates the ability to challenge entrenched power could evolve into a breathtakingly efficient tool for monitoring, tracking, and filtering dissident expression."
_	A source of ridicule is his vegetarianism and his phobia of sheep, to the extent that Carolyn flies to Ireland to purchase a stuffed sheep for his birthday present.
_	With a sound and content influenced by Curtis Mayfield (and often erroneously attributed to him), its simple and encouraging lyrics hit home, to the extent that it became featured on gospel radio stations.
_	Xi Jinping expressed in a high-level meeting that promotional campaigns for 'Core Socialist Values' should be thorough, to the extent that public support for Chinese-style socialism will be "as ubiquitous as the air".
_	"Texas Penal Code §§ 43.23, to the extent that it applies to "obscene devices" as defined in Texas Penal Code § 43.21(a)(7), is declared to be facially unconstitutional and unenforceable throughout the State of Texas".
_	To the extent that Bowie during this period appeared to assume the persona of "Ziggy Stardust", the Ziggy cut can be regarded, at least partially, as an eponymous style.
_	Socially significant closeness to one racial group is taken in account more in the basis of appearance (phenotypes) rather than ancestry, to the extent that full siblings can pertain to different "racial" groups.
_	To the extent that the species can be reliably differentiated, "C. terminalis" has thinner leaves larger buds and fruit and thicker pedicels than "C. opaca".
_	Mandalay painters were very proud of these skills to the extent that Amar, a Mandalay writer, claimed that Ba Nyan, who painted watercolor in gouache, was not recognized as a true watercolor painter.
_	On the other hand, the use of the enormous amount of vegetal species for the obtaining of medicinal products has an enormous potentiality, that will only be widened to the extent that is better known.
_	To the extent that a covered financial company has a negative net worth and its liquidation creates an obligation to the FDIC as its liquidator, the FDIC shall charge one or more risk-based assessment such that the obligation will be paid off within 60 months (5 years) of the issuance of the obligation.
_	Hydrogen bonding causes pure ethanol to be hygroscopic to the extent that it readily absorbs water from the air.
_	While Antonioni's earlier film "L'Avventura" had been derided upon its 1960 premiere, it was quickly reevaluated to the extent that "L'Eclisse" became "the most eagerly awaited film of the 1962 Cannes Film Festival"; critics had begun to believe that Antonioni's approach "was perhaps one way forward for an artform that was in danger of endlessly repeating itself."
_	Durden wrote that "The Prostrate State" makes sense only in this context, and to the extent that Pike's racial views were representative, "the Civil War and Reconstruction take on a new dimension of tragedy."
_	Although the first 3 scales were predicted upon a biologically based theory of personality, the fourth scale has not been theoretically specified to the same extent, but it was considered to be conceptually strong to the extent that it would demonstrate the same degree of measurement similarity across cultures.
_	After he died, in 696, his grave became a very popular pilgrimage centre, to the extent that by the thirteenth century, the name "Saint-Claude" had become more used than that of "Saint-Oyand", which it superseded.
_	Thus follows that the French government cannot arbitrarily regulate and prohibit religious activity; it is strictly constrained to regulate it only to the extent that there is a need to safeguard public order and prohibit actions harmful to society (such as, for instance, human sacrifices).
_	Although the protest was unsuccessful, the statues remained, and are now regarded as part of South Australia's political and cultural history, to the extent that they were nominated for heritage status by David Winderlich in 2009.
_	Some coleus cultivars over-produce anthocyanins and under-produce chlorophyll to the extent that optimal growth is prevented.
_	As Eugene M. Waith argues of the highly formal nature of the opening scene, "the ceremonies of triumph, sacrifice, burial and election immediately establish the solemnity of public occasions on which an ideal political order is affirmed and individuals are valued to the extent that they support it.
_	After carefully deducing on his answer, to the extent that he mentioned where the dance group Jabbawockeez got their name, he ultimately went on to win the ₱2 million peso top-prize.
_	A virus is an obligate parasite, acting as a living thing only to the extent that when it is in a host cell, the machinery of that cell makes copies of the virus.
_	As the majority wrote, "To the extent that "Société des Acadiens du Nouveau-Brunswick"... stands for a restrictive interpretation of language rights, it is to be rejected."
_	Subsequently, however, the pathomorphological studies of Károly Schaffer made these authors change their minds to the extent that they reclassified their respective observations as variants of Tay-Sachs disease, which caused confusion lasting about 50 years.
_	In the eighteenth and nineteenth century, the interior was transformed to the extent that only small Romanesque details remain visible.
_	Today, this omission has been rectified, at least to the extent that one such course is required.
_	The city is known for its areca palms, to the extent that a Burmese proverb for unexpected good fortune is equated to a "betel lover winning a trip to Taungoo".
_	Members of the general public clearly have an interest to the extent that the legislation makes it a criminal offence to infringe the restrictions placed upon the freedom of individuals (including qualified architects), and of firms and partnerships, and companies and corporations of all kinds, to use the word "architect".
_	According to medieval Irish chronicles, the statue performed many healing miracles around the fifteenth century to the extent that a few have referred to Trim as the "Lourdes of Ireland".
_	Cobham resumes: "the index corrupts perceptions to the extent that it's hard to see a justification for its continuing publication".
_	Giertz, too, fell under his posthumous sway, to the extent that the Latin phrase "Verbum crucis Dei virtus"
_	Historically, Bumthang and its speakers have had close contact with speakers of the Kurtöp, Nupbi and Kheng languages, nearby East Bodish languages of central and eastern Bhutan, to the extent that they may be considered part of a wider collection of "Bumthang languages."
_	Football continued to be played at the stadium, but a German bombing raid on Trafford Park on 22 December 1940 damaged the stadium to the extent that a Christmas day fixture against Stockport County had to be switched to Stockport's ground.
_	Once costs of the activities have been identified, the cost of each activity is attributed to each product to the extent that the product uses the activity.
_	Although he started his reign as vassal to Louis the German, king of East Francia, he consolidated his rule to the extent that after 855 he was able to repel a series of Frankish attacks.
_	The song became an instant hit and is one of Bollywood's most popular songs ever, to the extent that Rani Mukherjee became known as "Khandala Girl".
_	Historically, epic literature has been considered an exclusively male domain, to the extent that "epic and masculinity appear to be almost coterminous."
_	The gardens have matured since their opening, to the extent that some areas have had to be replanted after maturing trees and plants came to the end of their life cycles.
_	To the extent that increasingly the economic surplus is convertible into money and expressed in money, the amassment of wealth is possible on a larger and larger scale (see capital accumulation and surplus product).
_	Each household had its own ved who was very devoted to it, often to the extent that he did harm to other households and their vedi.
_	To the extent that sexual stratification is related to but not isomorphic with the structure of alternative fields, so the study of sexual fields cannot be subsumed to the study of an economic or political field, for example.
_	Nevertheless, to the extent that race, class, gender, ethnicity, age and ability, among others, are organizing features of sexual status within a given sexual field, so the relationship of sexual fields to broader historical systems of stratification requires consideration (Green 2005, 2008, 2011. 2014).
_	However, the analogy with capital is misleading to the extent that, unlike traditional forms of capital, social capital is not depleted by use; in fact it is depleted by non-use ("use it or lose it").
_	Fetishism to the extent that it becomes a disorder appears to be rare, with less than 1% of general psychiatric patients presenting fetishism as their primary problem.
_	The L&SWR constructed an additional pair of non-electrified tracks between Turnham Green and its junction with the District at Hammersmith and opened these on 3 December 1911 although their use was short-lived as the District's trains out-competed the L&SWR's to the extent that the L&SWR withdrew its service between Richmond and Addison Road on 3 June 1916, leaving the District as the sole operator.
_	Because of his strong political sentiments he eventually became the enemy of Catholics as well as those in favor of reform - to the extent that some people wished him harm.
_	During that time, his roommates became frustrated with Atta, who seldom cleaned, and kept to himself to the extent that he would walk in and out of a room without acknowledging others.
_	As a result of this introduction the machine shop also "has been modernized to the extent that robotics and electronic controls have been introduced into the operation and control of machines.
_	The government of Suffolk County was substantially integrated with the city government of Boston more than one hundred years ago, to the extent that the members of the Boston city council are "ex officio" the Suffolk County Commissioners, and Boston's treasurer and auditor fulfill the same offices for the county.
_	Randolph Churchill claimed that George was a strict father, to the extent that his children were terrified of him, and that George had remarked to the Earl of Derby: "My father was frightened of his mother, I was frightened of my father, and I am damned well going to see to it that my children are frightened of me."
_	Deng sustained Mao's legacy to the extent that he stressed the primacy of agricultural output and encouraged a significant decentralization of decision-making in the rural economy teams and individual peasant households.
_	The lack of bridge wings on the "Independence" class had been noted as the top problem in the entire LCS program to the extent that these will need to be retrofitted onto existing ships.
_	The distinction between race/ethnicity and SES is important to the extent that these considerations contribute to the provision of services to children in need.
_	To the extent that they represent a predisposed bias on the part of a heterosexual majority against a homosexual minority, these negative attitudes cannot, of themselves, be considered by the Court to amount to sufficient justification for the interferences with the applicants’ rights outlined above any more than similar negative attitudes towards those of a different race, origin or colour.
_	Schlatter also conveyed a sense of the ‘authority’ of Scripture which diverged significantly from the prevailing liberal-Protestant view of the Bible as a ‘source-book for religious ideas’ to be found not in but behind the text ... one must recognise it also in Bonhoeffer’s later life, where it appears at the heart of his faith that results from having been captivated and convinced by the word of Jesus ... it was the Reformed professor of New Testament who implanted it in the young student to the extent that it became an essential part of Bonhoeffer’s epistemology and, finally, of his whole theological existence.
_	To the extent that such works are "transformative" of original content, in the United States they may find protection from copyright claims under the "fair use" doctrine of copyright law.
_	Instead, information is perceived as valid to the extent that it is perceived to be a normative belief of the ingroup.
_	it is acaulescent, as the specific epithet ""acaulis"" implies, – that is, the stem is short to the extent that it is difficult to see at all, and mostly subterranean.
_	To the extent that it has been permitted to operate, this is what a "free" market has done, argued Rand.
_	The album was a continuation in musical terms to the extent that Lewis and Hariharan had done what they do best individually, and fused it into a format that enriches and complements each other.
_	The movement has evoked comparisons with the Hitler Youth, in the mainstream media, to the extent that "Nashi", together with other pro-Putin youth organizations, were derogatively nicknamed "Putinjugend".
_	Under Rosselot, research had been increasingly concentrated on a few researchers; Cudd reversed this trend to the extent that EES's 1952–53 Annual Report stated that 66 faculty in 15 schools performed research at the station that year.
_	In spite of the years he had passed in the service of the family that had fought them for the control of Florence, he succeeded in ingratiating himself with the Medici to the extent that they required no adjustments to be made to the size of the territory falling under his control.
_	Many Appalachianites sold their rights to land and minerals to such corporations, to the extent that 99 percent of the residents control less than half of the land.
_	As the authors define it, an entitlement is inalienable to the extent that its transfer is not permitted between a willing buyer and a willing seller.
_	As the Eighth Army pushed forward over the next few days, 65th Infantry Division crumbled (to the extent that German 10th Army were later to order a court-martial into its conduct).
_	James' work is littered with anecdote, humour and delightful garrulousness, to the extent that he makes an ideal companion in the world of UK poetry.
_	"In each diocese, to the extent that pastoral circumstances recommend it, a pastoral council is to be established whose responsibility it is to investigate under the authority of the bishop all those things which pertain to pastoral works, to ponder them and to propose practical conclusions about them."
_	Inspector Clouseau is a patriotic Frenchman whose country is professedly his highest priority, has been prone to infatuation (often reciprocated) after being cuckolded by Sir Charles Litton, and is repeatedly perplexed by transvestites, to the extent that he addresses them as "Sir or Madame."
_	The port of Amsterdam benefited greatly from the blockade of the port of Antwerp, to the extent that merchants in the North began to question the desirability of reconquering the South.
_	The weather deteriorated to the extent that everyone was obliged to remain at the lighthouse for three days before returning to shore.
_	The minder would make minor adjustments to his mules to the extent that each mule worked differently.
_	This lowered the level of Caddo Lake and Big Cypress to the extent that riverboat traffic to Jefferson was no longer commercially feasible.
_	They are a court of schemers and prefer to stab each other in the back in exquisitely detailed plots to impress the others in the Court, to the extent that direct confrontation is looked down upon as socially damaging.
_	Prior to taking over as co-host of the Fantasy Focus Baseball Podcast from Matthew Berry and Nate Ravitz Cockcroft was a frequent contributor, to the extent that he earned the nickname "Cousin of the Podcast."
_	The face of the network's political coverage, he frequently hosted or appeared on its Sunday morning news interview program, "Issues and Answers" and was continually visible during primaries, conventions and elections to the extent that his coverage of the 1964 Presidential election won him the Peabody Award for "Outstanding Reportorial Work".
_	This resulted in an in-flight fire and damage to adjacent areas of the right wing and flaps to the extent that flight could not be sustained.
_	By the 1880s, however, the power and range of rifles had advanced to the extent that shooting in an increasingly populated area was no longer considered safe.
_	He has mastered the bureaucratic language ("bureaucratese") and has internalized it to the extent that he describes and treats the non-civil servants ("only two 'civilians,' the landlady and tailor, play more than incidental roles") as if they are part of the same world—the tailor is described as sitting "like a Turkish Pasha", that is, a government official, and Akaky "treats the self-effacing old landlady just like his bosses treat him at the office ('somehow coldly and despotically')".
_	His friends said that after only a few years, he was absorbed in these party lines to the extent that he would spend days on the phone at a time.
_	Abul Hasan Ali Hasani Nadwi narrates that he attended Abdul Hayy's Majalis (lectures) several times and found him to be an extremely intelligent, erudite, an ocean of knowledge, well acquainted with the intricacies of Shariah, to the extent that he became an internationally recognised scholar.
_	Otherwise I had sympathy for Baader to the extent that he was one of the many who were ready to die for their cause.
_	Officially, members of the Regiment are prohibited from discriminating against or harassing LGBT soldiers; such activities, however, are tolerated by officers, to the extent that one conscript described the Regiment as "the most homophobic environment that exists".
_	In the United Kingdom, condensation problems are particularly common between October and March – to the extent that this period is often referred to as the "condensation season."
_	The dog "It/Kopec" was sacred to the Cuman–Kipchaks, to the extent that an individual, tribe, or clan would be named after the dog or type of dog.
_	Until these drainage works Loch Winnoch and Kilbirnie Loch nearly met and often did during flooding, to the extent that, as stated, early writers such as Boece, Hollings and Petruccio Ubaldini regarded the lochs as one, using the name "Garnoth" or "Garnott".
_	Almost since the team launch in 2011, there was unease between BMW and Prodrive concerning the financing of the programme, to the extent that Mini WRC Team had to shelve plans to run two official drivers in 2012.
_	To the extent that monetary policy would no longer be constrained by the zero lower bound, the Basel III impact on economic output could be offset by a reduction (or delayed increase) in monetary policy rates by about 30 to 80 basis points.
_	While many serials made changes as part of their adaptation, to the extent that they were "often 'improved' almost out of recognition", Batman "fared better than most and changes were minor".
_	Mustafa Kemal Ataturk valued him as an ally and a friend, to the extent that he placed a statue of Frunze as a part of the Republic Monument at the Taksim Square, in Istanbul.
_	He recalls that he attempted to get himself removed from his editorial position by "asking for bigger and bigger raises," but instead found his demands met - even to the extent that he was given "generous stock options" and "made a vice president of public relations for the company."
_	The fame of their wine expanded over the years, to the extent that in 1506 they could afford to pay 4,000 florins for the Palazzo Antinori, built for the Boni family in the 1460s.
_	An uncle of his led his life to the extent that Shantoja wanted to become a priest.
_	In this case, the public and critics felt that the plot was sordid to the extent that it overwhelmed the credibility of the characters; it did not do well.
_	The court denied the request, rejecting the notion that the other actions had any bearing on the inducement case, except to the extent that already-recovered damage amounts might be taken into account when calculating the inducement damages, and further holding that "Bouchat" doesn't apply; 17 USC 504 doesn't preclude finding inducement of infringement separately from finding direct infringement of the same works.
_	Both the chariot race and an implied cauldron of initiation (to the extent that the latter might be relevant to the October Horse through the comparanda of the Troy Game and Mars' assimilation to the child-god Maris) are generally regarded as the elements of the Roman festival most likely to be Etruscan, and thus of uncertain value as to an Indo-European origin.
_	Similarly, provisions such as creditors' arrangements and recognition of foreign insolvency representatives are circumscribed to the extent that they interfere with the rights of secured creditors.
_	Thus, to the extent that internal cues are weak, ambiguous, or uninterpretable, the individual is functionally in the same position as an outside observer, an observer who must necessarily rely upon those same external cues to infer the individual's inner states."
_	His name soon became a brand of mass mobilisation to the extent that under his leadership, his party, both before and after the split, has always attained majority seats in his province.
_	In rural and suburban communities, people often rely on the automobile as their sole means of transportation and even in areas with public transportation and safe places to walk and bicycle, they live in a state of automobile dependence wherein automobiles are the central focus of transportation, infrastructure and land use policies to the extent that other modes of transportation, such as walking, cycling and mass transit, have become impractical.
_	A. P. Kenshaw among others, has argued that Aboriginal burning may well have modified the vegetation to the extent that the food resources of the megafauna were diminished, and as a consequence the largely herbivorous megafauna became extinct.
_	In Jean-Jacques Rousseau's "The Social Contract", composed in the mid-18th century, Rousseau argues that society can function only to the extent that individuals have interests in common, and that the end goal of any state is the realization of the common good.
_	Henryk developed an interest in music from an early age, though he was discouraged by both his father and new stepmother to the extent that he was not allowed to play his mother's old piano.
_	It is especially abundant in cases of severe acid mine drainage, where other organisms such as "Acidithiobacillus" and "Leptospirillum" lower the pH of the environment to the extent that "F. acidophilum" is allowed to flourish.
_	He alleged his son was always adventurous, to the extent that family and friends called him "Arizona Jones".
_	Progressive Reconstructionists note that, in the developed world — especially in the United States, institutions and social practices are judged efficient, rational and productive to the extent that they maximize money and power.
_	Progressive Reconstructionists advocate a new "bottom line" that these things should be judged rational, efficient and productive not only to the extent that they maximize money and power, but also to the extent that they maximize caring, ethical and ecological sensitivity and behavior, kindness and generosity, non-violence and peace, and to the extent that they enhance human capacities to respond to other human beings in a way that honors them as embodiments of the sacred, and enhances their capacities to respond to the Earth and the whole universe with awe, wonder and radical amazement — and to the extent that they maximize love.
_	A great number of words of French origin have entered the English language to the extent that many Latin words have come to the English language.
_	In this model, monomers are rigid rods of a fixed length "l", and their orientation is completely independent of the orientations and positions of neighbouring monomers, to the extent that two monomers can co-exist at the same place.
_	Ewell, it is hinted, molested his daughter, and Mr. Radley imprisons his son in his house to the extent that Boo is remembered only as a phantom.
_	She trained to reproduce the artist's own technique—to the extent that when Warhol was repeatedly questioned on his technique, he once answered "I don't know.
_	So the basic principle of this monumental sculpture is that to the extent that they could be picked up and transported, these signals could be enlarged, translated into colors and shapes, and show the plant’s « decisions ».
_	However, changes made by the Labour Party after the 1987 general election to ensure that it was no longer associated in the public mind with the images of the "Loony Left" from 1986–1987 have since blunted its impact and reduced its power, to the extent that it had far less impact on the United Kingdom general election, 1992, less even (according to academic studies by Butler and Kavanaugh) than Labour Party officials themselves believed at the time post-election.
_	The Air Staff's duties included, among other things to assist the Chief of the Air Force with leadership of the Air Force's mobilization, training, tactics, organization, equipment and personnel to the extent that such activity was not directly related to operational activities, which was handled by the Defence Staff.<ref name="1977/78:63"></ref>
_	He was physically abused by his father as a child, although not to the extent that his older brothers Noel and Paul suffered.
_	On August 19, a Hurricane Hunters flight into the storm failed to locate a well-defined center, and the next day a flight found that the cyclone had degenerated to the extent that only a diffuse low-level circulation center remained; observations indicated the pressure rose to an unusually high 1015 mbar.
_	Relations remained very strong between with the Satake clan, almost to the extent that Kameda Domain became a semi-subsidiary domain of Kubota Domain.
_	As the economic downturn put pressure on the US auto market, combined with the high fuel prices of the mid-2008, vehicle sales tumbled in late 2008 to the extent that Toyota shut down production at TMMTX for a three-month period to reduce inventory of the Tundra pickup.
_	It also involves removing features specific to particular linguistic and cultural contexts, to the extent that such a project is possible.
_	During World War II, rangekeeper capabilities were expanded to the extent that the name "rangekeeper" was deemed to be inadequate.
_	The Quran asserts that if the use of force would not have been allowed in curbing the evils by nations, the disruption and disorder caused by insurgent nations could have reached the extent that the places of worship would have become deserted and forsaken.
_	Dunstan questions the extent that he can provide an accurate account of the events of his childhood or his participation in World War I campaigns, because what he recalls is surely distinct from the 'consensually accepted reality'.
_	For Jains, their scriptures represent the literal words of Mahāvīra and the other tirthankaras only to the extent that the agama is a series of beginning-less, endless and fixed truths, a tradition without any origin, human or divine, which in this world age has been channelled through Sudharmāsvāmī, the last of Mahavira's disciples to survive.
_	He became renowned as a tutor to the extent that Viceroy José Manuel de Ezpeleta hired him as a private tutor for his children.
_	The phylogenetic status of "Morotopithecus bishopi" is debated to the extent that it challenges established views on the connection between Miocene primates and extant hominids (i.e. great apes).
_	Although still ostensibly searching for his family, Fly develops something of a crush on Briar Rose during their centuries in Fabletown, to the extent that his kiss was enough to wake her from her curse.
_	Henry's sexuality is something of an open secret around campus, to the extent that the campus gay activist group has created a chart of his many sexual partners.
_	Expressing moral indignation when people break the rules of proper behaviour is only useful to the extent that it contributes to dissuading such behaviour.
_	If it is doubtful whether a person has received one of the three sacraments in question, the sacrament may be administered conditionally (using words such as "If thou art not baptized, I baptize thee in the name of the Father and of the Son and of the Holy Spirit"); but such an administration, being valid and effective only to the extent that no valid administration of the same sacrament has already occurred, does not in any event constitute an effective repetition of a valid previous administration of that sacrament.
_	Ideally he should be woken to the extent that he is dozing, but in extraneous circumstances where it impossible to arouse him, it is permitted to include the maximum of one sleeping person in the "minyan".
_	To the extent that modern scholars postulate the existence of such a trilogy by a single author, the consensus holds that it comprised "Prometheus Bound", "Prometheus Unbound", and "Prometheus the Fire-Bringer", in that order.
_	Abdominal obesity, also known as central obesity, occurs when excessive abdominal fat around the stomach and abdomen has built up to the extent that it is likely to have a negative impact on health.
_	McKay, known for accurate preseason predictions, stated that recent mediocrity in the NFC Central meant that recent high draft positions would raise the level of competition to the extent that eight or nine wins would no longer be enough to contend for a division title.
_	Turner's art raised his profile to the extent that other publishers started to send him assignments.
_	By September 1909 the equipment had been upgraded and / or refined to the extent that distances almost ten times that were being achieved: "Return of the Admiral, Island Cruise of the Powerful; HMS Powerful, with his Excellency Vice-Admiral Sir Richard Poore and staff on board, reached Sydney at midnight on Saturday from her cruise in the islands.
_	In certain parts of the world, notably the Mediterranean Sea and the Persian Gulf, tropospheric ducting conditions can become established for many months of the year to the extent that viewers regularly receive quality reception of signals over distances of .
_	There are numerous other occasions when Hetherington spoke at a meeting, but either he spoke only briefly or the reporter edited the speech to the extent that what remains is a short precis, and cannot provide any real information.
_	At the hands of people like Vasilii Poyarkov in 1645 and Yerofei Khabarov in 1650 some peoples like the Daur were slaughtered by the Russians to the extent that it is considered genocide.
_	To the extent that fanfiction uses source-identifying characters, settings and such, the marks are often well known are identical to the original, and are used in similar types of goods (i.e., written fiction).
_	Organized crime in the city had a lower profile once Prohibition was repealed, already wary of attention after seeing Capone's notoriety bring him down, to the extent that there is a lack of consensus among writers about who was actually in control and who was a figurehead "front boss".
_	This film has impressed itself on the heart and mind and soul of anyone who has seen it, to the extent that filmmakers of great originality and distinctiveness like Robert Altman and Sam Peckinpah can be said to have remade it again and again ... without compromising its uniqueness.
_	They were abstract to the extent that an animal was represented by a single defining element, for example a ram’s horns.
_	The impacts of human habitation, particularly the inadequate treatment of sewage effluent, and the growth of mining in the upper reaches and the processing of metals in the Sheffield area have resulted in serious pollution of the river, and the depletion of fish stocks, to the extent that large parts of the Don contained no fish until the mid-1980s.
_	Even the most successful and beautiful Australians are eager to proclaim how ordinary they are, to the extent that two-thirds of the highest earning households define themselves as middle class, lower middle class or even working class.
_	There is also evidence that the causes of social cleansing are linked to globalization and economic liberalization, "to the extent that it has stripped entire populations of their means of subsistence, torn communities apart, deepened economic inequalities and forced people to compete for diminishing resources."
_	To the extent that transmission biases are operative in culture, they mitigate the effect of Darwinian change, i.e. change in the distribution of variants over generations of exposure to selective pressures.
_	To the extent that nurses and police officers do indeed claim to observe patterns, this is most likely to be explained in terms of confirmation bias:
_	The exception to this was the passenger service to Cork, always the most profitable, and that declined to the extent that it, too, was ended in 1952.
_	Until 1869 most revenue came from second-class passengers but the volume of third-class passengers grew to the extent that second-class facilities were withdrawn in 1912.
_	Butler's "Gender Trouble" (1990) contained discussion of performativity versus performance, which second-wave feminists used to exclude trans women on account of their performativity through repetition of gender norms, which is "real only to the extent that it is performed", which was used as a separator from experience.
_	To the extent that a popular vote was held, it was primarily directed to filling the office of Vice President.
_	He also misled German intelligence for several years – to the extent that they overestimated Allied strength in North Africa by a quarter of a million men.
_	For the next 18 years, Kelly would be the dominant personality at Celtic Park; imposing his will in the running of the club at all levels and having direct involvement in team selection, to the extent that many queried how much say McGrory really had in team matters.
_	In 1818, the wall was extended up to the extent that it has gates that come in and out of the Birni wall.
_	Sophisticated instrumentation is used to measure the extent that Earth’s atmosphere distorts the laser light.
_	According to director Ken Loach, the film attempts to explore the extent that the Irish revolution was a social revolution as opposed to a nationalist revolution.
_	Almost immediately after he became a member of the Association of Pentecostal Churches of America (APCA) in 1898, Rev. Lyman C. Pettit, pastor of the Grace Pentecostal Church in Saratoga Springs, New York, began to articulate the need for a school for training preachers, missionaries and evangelists and other Christian workers for the APCA, to the extent that "Pettit was one of the main advocates for starting the Pentecostal Collegiate Institute."
_	The EPA is interested in soils to the extent that it seeks to protect the beneficial uses of the land resources.
_	Harrison's growing interest in politics has increasingly moved her to direct political action, to the extent that her practice is now often described as "shifting between the roles of artist, activist and administrator".
_	He married a woman twenty-five years his junior, by whom he had three daughters, but was widowed by 1910 By the end of his life, he was crippled to the extent that he had to walk with the use of two canes and died in the Bronx in May 1915.
_	Goryeo to the extent that thirty-six states, including Jin, would pay homage to it.
_	To the extent that colleges want to approach that culture, they display willful selfishness in confining their sights to the present."
_	Ten years after completion of the Southern and Western Railway, traffic on the line had increased to the extent that the station yard, track layout and buildings were considered cramped and additional room was required to pass trains, on the single line track.
_	If a model is machine-readable and formal to the extent that it has a well-defined behavioral interpretation, test cases can in principle be derived mechanically.
_	Based for many years at Muddy Lane, the club moved to the former ICL sports field in Whitethorn Lane in 1996, a move that has allowed it to expand its junior section significantly to the extent that the club now has one of the largest and most successful junior cricket sections in the county.
_	Within Australia there is a widespread obsession with Wongar's biographical credentials to the extent that it eclipses any review of the fictional texts as part of Australian writing.
_	That is to say, data exclusivity provides additional protection to the innovator when the remaining patent length is shorter than the data exclusivity period at the time of approval (which can occur due to lengthy pre-clinical and clinical research required to obtain FDA approval), or to the extent that the patent term is circumvented by a biosimilar prior to its expiry.
_	The first Congress of Female Metalworkers of São Paulo, held in 1978, was harassed and threatened by employers to the extent that only 300 of the 800 women who had signed up actually attended to conference.
_	Hale expanded and prospered over throughout the Middle Ages to the extent that by the middle of the 15th century a tithe barn had been established in Hale Barns – the value of the tithe taken from Hale was more than double that of any other township in the Bowdon parish.
_	if you dislike what you’re doing to the extent that I did, it gives you the impetus to get out."
_	Norns are very social animals, sometimes to the extent that they will prefer to play with other norns than to eat.
_	An amount paid to a dentist, dental hygienist, dental surgeon or dental mechanic for dental services provided to the patient (to the extent that the fees are for diagnostic, therapeutic or rehabilitative services) are eligible medical expenses.
_	The Tea Party can be considered grassroots to the extent that it comes from the people, but it is considered astroturfing to the extent that it is shaped by corporations and particularly wealthy individuals.
_	The Law Machines always enforce the letter of the written law, to the extent that several planets were forced to change governments when corrupt or neglectful officials were arrested en masse.
_	Trusts are widely used internationally, especially in countries within the English law sphere of influence, and whilst most civil law jurisdictions do not generally contain the concept of a trust within their legal systems, they do recognise the concept under the Hague Convention on the Law Applicable to Trusts and on their Recognition (partly only the extent that they are parties thereto).
_	This is due to several factors, including the fact that Jeolla province had a staggering 98% vote for a regional (left-wing) party candidate Kim Dae-jung, and their belief that the Gwangju Uprising has been placed on a pedestal by the locals, to the extent that all other moments in the history of Korean democratisation are overlooked, and that it was not a democratization uprising or movement, but simply a riot.
_	In his look back at the history of space games, Geryk said "Ascendancy had the misfortune of being released with just about the worst AI ever in a computer game--to the extent that playing against the computer was almost pointless."
_	She is antisocial and dislikes interacting with others, to the extent that at times she skips both school and Tōya's tutoring sessions.
_	Prior to large-scale levelling as part of the development of Telford New Town, the area was covered by clay mounds and large clay pits that dominated the landscape, to the extent that they formed points of reference for the locals.
_	The purpose of Project PM is to implement these solutions to the extent that participants are collectively able to do so, as well as to demonstrate the beneficial effects of these solutions to others that they might be spurred to recreate or even build upon them independently of our own efforts.
_	However, after prices were lowered the ship's popularity increased, to the extent that in 2006 Viking Line decided to order a new fast ferry for the Helsinki-Tallinn route, the .
_	One will accept that second statement to the extent that one thinks the world was set up in that way.
_	According to one report, their utilisation as mainline engines rapidly resulted in the development of excessive side-play to the extent that the tyres eventually cut into the spring hangers.
_	These truncated versions later became staples of U.S. television and even later videotape and DVA printings, to the extent that the original editions may be considered lost, at least to the general public.
_	However, the first phase was a failure and, the people of England were relieved to the extent that they feared a foreign ruler coming into their country.
_	Following the capture of the Spaniard, Lefèvre finally realises that The Man in Grey is very astute, and from then on give him his complete allegiance – to the extent that when M. Leblanc, sous-préfet of Bourg-le-Roi, has serious concerns about the behaviour of his children's governess, it is the commissary who advises him to ask for assistance from the mysterious personage who enjoys the special confidence and favour of M. le Due d'Otrante himself.
_	To the extent that Wittfogel limits himself to this contention, I have no quarrel with him whatever.
_	Also, many drivers are often promoted to the extent that their road racing past is almost forgotten.
_	Whilst targeted hygiene was originally developed as an effective approach to hygiene practice, it also seeks, as far as possible, to sustain "normal" levels of exposure to the microbial flora of our environment to the extent that is important to build a balanced immune system.
_	By 1819, Bowditch's international reputation had grown to the extent that he was elected as a member of the Royal Societies of Edinburgh and London and the Royal Irish Academy.
_	The Shunt equation quantifies the extent that venous blood bypasses oxygenation in the capillaries of the lung.
_	The island has a long history of producing a variety of noted cuisines and wines, to the extent that Sicily is sometimes nicknamed "God's Kitchen" because of this.
_	Some couplets were added and some corrected (rather changed to the extent that Yagana lost his cool and blew up)".
_	Sutcliffe developed severe arthritis in his old age, the disease crippling him to the extent that he needed a wheelchair.
_	After its first exhibition, at the 1782 Royal Academy of London, critics and patrons reacted with horrified fascination and the work became widely popular, to the extent that it was parodied in political satire and an engraved version was widely distributed.
_	Like any ideal law, the inverse-square law approximates a measured radiation intensity to the extent that the source approximates a geometric point.
_	The name Wogdon became synonymous with dueling, to the extent that duels in England were sometimes referred to as "a Wogdon affair".
_	So the basic principle of this monumental sculpture is that to the extent that they could be picked up and transported, these signals could be enlarged, translated into colors and shapes, and show the plant’s « decisions » suggesting a level of fundamental biological activity.
_	Pro-slavery literature dominated the Southern media to the extent that famous Southern writers and poets didn't emerge until after the war.
_	For most of Balaguer's first nine years in office the country experienced high growth rates (e.g., an average GDP growth rate of 9.4 percent between 1970 and 1975), to the extent that people talked about the "Dominican miracle".
_	In 1363-1364 the winter was so cold, especially in January, February and March, that the Rhone froze over to the extent that people and vehicles could travel across the ice.
_	With the continuing influx of Allied service personnel into Cairns and with many local Cairns families returning to their homes after evacuating, the security situation for the ZES deteriorated to the extent that a new training facility had to be found.
_	Virtually ignores the existence of cave painting manifestations, to the extent that the final publication on La Calzada, Nuevo León, the archaeologists do not even mention the existence of paintings and petroglyphs located at few meters from the excavation place.
_	"Jaws" set the template for many subsequent horror films, to the extent that the script for Ridley Scott's 1979 science fiction film "Alien" was pitched to studio executives as ""Jaws" in space".
_	Discarded electronics lie in pools of toxins that leach into the groundwater, making the water undrinkable to the extent that water must be trucked in from elsewhere.
_	The ancient treatise says it was not the king's spear but the sceptre that bound him to his people—and to the extent that he guarded them, his own good rule would guard him.
_	Allport noted that "traits become predictable to the extent that identities in stimulus situations are predictable."
_	He gathered in all sorts of treasure and finery at Cawood – to the extent that the next archbishop under Queen Elizabeth tried to sue him for damages.
_	Lebanese cuisine is well regarded in the suburb, to the extent that culinary walking tours of Punchbowl sell out months ahead.
_	She asserts that ideologies like Marxism–Leninism “were instrumental: useful to the extent that they were idealistic and universalistic, offering rhetoric and idioms for popular mobilization, and justifying ruthless means in the pursuit of higher ends.”
_	Tank described how "Last Night I Heard Everything In Slow Motion" was a university assignment and that the song is about "being unsure about something to the extent that it plagues and consumes you."
_	The St. Louis teams relied on the sponsorship of local businesses to the extent that they changed names to match their sponsors.
_	Stephen Thomas Erlewine from Allmusic rated it 3 stars (out of 5) and said that: "Theoretically, this loosening of expectations would give him some freedom to roam on Música + Alma + Sexo, and it does to the extent that he does not feel compelled to devote the record to the English language".
_	Michael Rice wrote in his "Egypt's Legacy", "Whether or not the ancients knew of the mechanics of the Precession before its definition by Hipparchos the Bithynian in the second century BC is uncertain, but as dedicated watchers of the night sky they could not fail to be aware of its effects." (p. 128) Rice believes that "the Precession is fundamental to an understanding of what powered the development of Egypt" (p. 10), to the extent that "in a sense Egypt as a nation-state and the king of Egypt as a living god are the products of the realisation by the Egyptians of the astronomical changes effected by the immense apparent movement of the heavenly bodies which the Precession implies." (p. 56).
_	Over time, the majority of conservatives in the Western world came to adopt free market economic ideas as the Industrial Revolution progressed and the aristocracy lost its power, to the extent that such ideas are now generally considered as part of conservatism.
_	Sir Earle Christmas Grafton Page, Member for the Federal seat of Cowper, and Drummond were able to improve infrastructure in the region and decentralise services to the extent that a new state was no longer seen as a major objective.
_	A compass made for the northern parts of the northern hemisphere will tilt badly in the southern hemisphere, in some cases to the extent that it will jam if held horizontal.
_	He also managed to rejuvenate players such as Marcus Stewart and, particularly, the previously inconsistent Paul Dalton to the extent that the club finished a respectable 16th in the final table.
_	These causeways may have interfered with the water flow to the extent that silt deposits built up and eventually by 1896 the upstream section of the island became physically land linked to the southern bank.
_	The story has become canonic — to the extent that no commentator can fail to repeat it, and few listeners can hear the theme without thinking of Alma's report.
_	Brazil won easily but Pretinha excelled to the extent that she was added to the national team panel for the World Cup.
_	The rules of the particular organization would provide details on who can perform these disciplinary procedures and the extent that they can be done.
_	On the contrary, "in the East Roman or Byzantine view, when the Roman Empire became Christian, the perfect world order willed by God had been achieved: one universal empire was sovereign, and coterminous with it was the one universal church"; and the state church came, by the time of the demise of the Byzantine Empire in 1453, to merge psychologically with it to the extent that its bishops had difficulty in thinking of Christianity without an emperor.
_	It’s unlikely Paul Verhoeven will ever get to make his historical Christ movie, but to the extent that "Son Of God" has a measure of dramatic impact, it’s how it illustrates the radicalism of Jesus’ message and the threat it posed to the establishment.
_	Every word has a variety of senses and connotations, which can be added, removed, or altered over time, often to the extent that cognates across space and time have very different meanings.
_	The "Bliss" ruling, to the extent that it dealt with concealed weapons, was overturned by constitutional amendment with Section 26 in Kentucky's Third Constitution (1850) banning the future carrying of concealed weapons, while still asserting that the bearing of arms in defense of themselves and the state was an individual and collective right in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
_	This single item question was designed to measure the extent that individuals include nature as part of their identity.
_	There are seven pairs of circles that differ on the extent that they overlap.
_	Lojban is analytic to the extent that every "gismu" (basic word, not counting particles) involves pre-determined syntactical roles for every "gismu" coming after it in a clause, though it does involve agglutination of roots when forming calques.
_	Food is another literary theme in the novel, to the extent that Flagg included the recipes served by the cafe at the end of the book.
_	Like Billy and Mother's Milk, the Frenchman possesses military experience, particularly holding knowledge in ballistics, to the extent that Butcher defers to him on that matter.
_	No, proposition by proposition, conclusion by conclusion, to the extent that I did to this book; yet quite without ill-humour or impatience."
_	However there is a debate to the extent that Dogme is actually anti-textbook or anti-technology.
_	Time and space are only relevant to this initial inquiry to the extent that they inform us whether an individual would reasonably expect to be stopped and searched at a geographic point beyond the international border.
_	The program has been criticized for its format and production values, including in an August 2009 episode of the UK topical show "You Have Been Watching", with panelist David Mitchell saying "The thing that struck me most about it is quite how badly it is made, to the extent that you must think it's been made by "anti"-Christian people to make Christianity look as naff and discouraging and artless as possible."
_	To the extent that a base unit of society — usually conceived as an individual citizen — vests authority in a larger unit, such as the state or the local community, authority is centralized.
_	Message-signalled interrupt vectors can be shared, to the extent that the underlying communication medium can be shared.
_	The influx of direct, capital-intensive and labor-intensive foreign investment has accelerated the push to migrate out of the region, to the extent that these investments overwhelmed small-scale agriculture and manufacturing and displace workers who sought jobs elsewhere.
_	Tristan da Cunha has some legislation of its own, but the law of Saint Helena applies generally to the extent that it is not inconsistent with local law, insofar as it is suitable for local circumstances and subject to such modifications as local circumstances make necessary.
_	In 1974, the US Commission on New Technological Uses of Copyrighted Works (CONTU) decided that "computer programs, to the extent that they embody an author's original creation, are proper subject matter of copyright".
_	The U.S. Federal Reserve System under Paul Volcker had halted the stagflation crisis of the 1970s by raising interest rates, but this resulted in the dollar becoming overvalued to the extent that it made industry in the U.S. (particularly the automobile industry) less competitive in the global market.
_	The federal government played little role in air-pollution control, and to the extent that it did, its actions supported the efforts of states and local governments.
_	The monstrous Two-Face is left in permanent control—to the extent that one of his henchmen now refers to him only as "Face".
_	Ford continued merging departments and reorganizing the executive branch throughout 1973 to the extent that, by the end of the year, there were only three program cabinets (Development, Education and the Arts, and Consumer Protection and Regulation) and four additional departments (Human Resources, Justice, Natural Resources and Environmental Protection, and Transportation).
_	To the extent that the manufacturer has not complied with his duty outside the EAEU, this obligation is transferred to the authorized representative in the EAEU, ultimately on the importer.
_	Jean Baudrillard has also been described as a critical theorist to the extent that he was an unconventional and critical sociologist; this appropriation is similarly casual, holding little or no relation to the Frankfurt School.
_	To the extent that these signs can be used to influence or change our physical or social environment they are tools.
_	His reputation at the time, and still today (to the extent that he is known at all), rests on his ethereal figure paintings, the most famous of which is "Unicorns: Legend, Sea Calm" (1906) in the collection of the Metropolitan Museum of Art.
_	The temple complex was again completely devastated in earthquake of 26 January 2001; however, it has now been completely rebuilt to as many of the old shrines were destroyed to the extent that it could not be rehabilitated.
_	His health further deteriorated in December to the extent that he was scarcely able to paint.
_	Roe can now be found in most of rural England except for south east Kent and the greater part of Staffordshire and Cheshire, although the expansion is continuing to the extent that before the end of the 21st century, anywhere in the UK mainland suitable for roe may have a population.
_	His 'retirement', to the extent that he ever worked, was spent in Italy and the Riviera.
_	Bedlingtons also have a tendency to accumulate iron in the liver, but not nearly to the extent that they accumulate copper.
_	Although Buol and the Austrians initially seemed unperturbed, to the extent that Cavour and his ally, Emperor Napoleon III of France, feared they would not be able to have their war, Buol soon gave them what they wanted by a clumsy ultimatum demanding Piedmontese demobilization.
_	While a few characters are most prominent, notably Yossarian and the Chaplain, the majority of named characters are described in detail with fleshed out or multidimensional personas to the extent that there are few if any "minor characters."
_	Meier believes she fails to take the African-American experiences into account, to the extent that she "fails to answer the question raised in this book's subtitle".
_	(The axial movement of cones is not mandatory, however; a split bushing squeezed radially with a linear force—e.g., set screw, solenoid, spring clamp, pneumatic or hydraulic cylinder—achieves the same principle without the cones; but concentricity can only be had to the extent that the bushing's diameters are perfect for the particular object being held.
_	The team suffered at the hands of ownership problems during the latter part of the 1980s to the extent that a mass exodus of players at the end of 1987 contributed to a winless season in 1988.
_	To the extent that melanotan II produces melanogenesis, this is thought to be caused by activation of the MC receptor, whereas its clinically documented sexual effects are thought to be related to its ability to activate the MC receptor (though the MC is thought to possibly also be involved).
_	Following the acquisition of Austral by the Argentine government in 1980, both Aerolíneas Argentinas and Austral became government-owned, to the extent that some routes were simultaneously operated, even using similar equipment.
_	On land, it results in a cold mist that covers coastal Peru to the extent that the desert plants have adapted to obtain water from the air instead of from the infrequent rainfall.
_	Like the other parts of the paragraph 2, computer programs are open to patenting to the extent that they provide a technical contribution to the prior art.
_	Perera conducted a survey and her view mirrors that of Kroll to the extent that she used Kroll's four phases.
_	This success was despite the first manager having no banking experience and being "slow to learn" to the extent that he was removed in little more than a year.
_	As Adam Smith noted, having money gives one the ability to "command" others' labor, so purchasing power to some extent is power over other people, to the extent that they are willing to trade their labor or goods for money or currency.
_	To the extent that they lacked orientation, regular scales, and the Euclidean geometry of modern maps, or were drawn on unfamiliar media, little effort was made to crack their codes of representation.
_	During the following seven-match ODI series, Strauss's contributions led England's batting to the extent that, following the series, Andrew Miller commented on "England's guileless middle-order who, for the umpteenth time this summer, treated the loss of Andrew Strauss's wicket with the same grief and disorientation that a clutch of baby chicks might greet the devouring of their mother by a fox."
_	The experiment has been sufficiently successful to the extent that the Sunday service in June 2006 was included in both the Network Rail printed timetables and Internet site, and now runs on a permanent basis.
_	The new proportions and modern styling were a hit with customers to the extent that the Ford outsold Chevrolet in 1957 for the first time since 1935.
_	"I-mutation" is the most prominent of the processes, to the extent that it is often referred to simply as "umlaut".
_	During the term of office of Colonel F.R. Collins DSO as Chief Mechanical Engineer of the South African Railways (SAR) from 1922 to 1929, articulated locomotives were in great favour in South Africa, to the extent that the Railway Board of the day instructed that non-articulated engines should only be ordered in exceptional circumstances.
_	Soon after he joined the APCA in 1899, Pettit began to articulate the need for a school for training preachers, missionaries and evangelists and other Christian workers for the APCA, to the extent that "Pettit was one of the main advocates for starting the Pentecostal Collegiate Institute."
_	"I have spoken at times of a light in the soul, a light that is uncreated and uncreatable... to the extent that we can deny ourselves and turn away from created things, we shall find our unity and blessing in that little spark in the soul, which neither space nor time touches."
_	Nicanor elated himself to the extent that he incurred the suspicion that he was aiming to take power for himself.
_	Between 1945 and 1991, a regiment of New Zealanders was based in Singapore, and during those years they dominated the game to the extent that when they left, the Singaporean rugby scene almost fell apart.
_	In the United Arab Emirates (UAE), it is illegal to provide or use unauthorized VoIP services, to the extent that web sites of unlicensed VoIP providers have been blocked.
_	In season 5, she works for Hadrian's Wall along with Eve and Meisner, but was still considered to be primarily an ally to Nick's team rather than a member of Hadrian's Wall, to the extent that Nick told her about the mystery healing stick while keeping it secret from the organization as a whole.
_	Split-screen can also be used to the extent that it becomes part of the narrative structure of a film, as in "The Boston Strangler".
_	Green regarded the national state as legitimate only to the extent that it upholds a system of rights and obligations that is most likely to foster individual self-realisation.
_	Others argue that affirmative action is no longer necessary and that the United States has become a melting pot of minorities to the extent that whites will eventually become the minority.
_	He cooperated with the Committee to the extent that he responded to their questions, and reiterated names of Communist Party members who had been previously cited by his friend and former Group colleague, Elia Kazan.
_	In contrast, his forehand is relatively less powerful and consistent, particularly when played on the defense, to the extent that he's been known to hit backhands inside-out.
_	The maxim translates to: "The unborn is deemed to have been born to the extent that his own benefits are concerned".
_	Keane claims that to date he has not looked at the medal, feeling that his absence had tainted the accomplishment to the extent that he "didn't deserve the medal".
_	The first two of these were generally accepted, but the third was hotly contested, particularly by conservatives, to the extent that it was withdrawn in 1908.
_	In the years before his death, the fiancee of Lin's son reported that Lin became extremely distant and socially and politically detached, even to the extent that he never read books or newspapers.
_	To the extent that Bayesian calculations include prior information, it is therefore essentially inevitable that their results will not be "unbiased" in sampling theory terms.
_	In the series, he is described as a Splenden Beast, a race of fish-like demons who possess extremely powerful telepathic powers, to the extent that they can even read the minds of vampires, who are typically immune to telepathy.
_	Eight years after the school had moved from Oil Mill street, the number of students had increased to the extent that the two small halls at Ricca could not contain them.
_	Specifically, he painted scenes of Baghdad, its streets, its markets and its people; to the extent that he became known as the "City Painter".
_	However the author of the article, Donald Boström, spoke to Israel Radio on 19 August 2009 and said he was worried by the allegations he reported: "It concerns me, to the extent that I want it to be investigated, that's true.
_	He also improved the state's finances to the extent that the railway was finally extended as the British resident had suggested in 1907.
_	Thus the law is clear that a derivative work is protectable only to the extent that it embodies original expression.
_	Nevertheless, rumours spread that he had survived the execution, and became popular to the extent that a man who purported to be Theodosius was entertained by the Persians as a pretext for launching a war against Byzantium.
_	Much software originally written for other computer systems which use the 65816 or 6502 instruction sets (such as the Nintendo Entertainment System, Super Nintendo, or Apple IIgs, among others) can be run on the Mensch Computer (either directly as binary object code or through reassembling the software source code), to the extent that such software does not rely on hardware configurations which differ from the Mensch Computer.
_	Both during and after his time in Congress, Shiras participated in biological research and photography, to the extent that "National Geographic" has described him as "the father of wildlife photography" for his early use of camera traps and flash photography.
_	Silent filmmakers pioneered the art form to the extent that virtually every style and genre of film-making of the 20th and 21st centuries has its artistic roots in the silent era.
_	To the extent that a language is vocabulary cast into the mould of a particular syntax and that the basic structure of the sentence is held together by functional items, with the lexical items filling in the blanks, syntactic change is no doubt what modifies most deeply the physiognomy of a particular language.
_	Even before the 2006 Act, however, declawing was extremely uncommon, to the extent that most people had never seen a declawed cat.
_	However, to the extent that future generations are likely to be richer than those in the present, a positive discount rate should be applied reflecting the diminishing marginal utility of consumption.
_	During his tenure as the Executive Director of the Philadelphia City Planning Commission from 1949 to 1970, his visions shaped today's Philadelphia, the city in which he was born, to the extent that he is sometimes described as "The Father of Modern Philadelphia".
_	McKinnon & Pill (1996), Krugman (1998), Corsetti, Pesenti, & Roubini (1998) suggested that "over borrowing" by banks to fund moral hazard lending was a form of hidden government debts (to the extent that governments would bail out failing banks).
_	As before, Brompton Road was little used, to the extent that two of its lifts were removed and relocated elsewhere and the ticket office was closed.
_	To prevent individuals from creating trusts to defeat their own creditors, the laws of most states provide that a spendthrift clause in a trust document does not protect the beneficiary to the extent that the beneficiary is also the person who created the trust.
_	To the extent that inequalities can be passed from one generation to another through tangible gifts and wealth inheritance, some claim that equality of opportunity for children cannot be achieved without equality of outcome for parents.
_	And four, the jury was not instructed that Nanavati's defence had to be proved, to the extent that there is no reasonable doubt in the mind of a reasonable person.
_	By 1950 it had expanded to the extent that a second division was added.
_	Federer in particular had not played a tournament since the 2016 Wimbledon semi-final, having aggravated his surgically repaired knee to the extent that he called off the rest of his 2016 season, including missing out the 2016 Summer Olympics in Rio that he was keen to compete in for the men's singles Olympic Gold Medal that eluded him and also playing the highly anticipated mixed doubles pairing with compatriot and fellow tennis great, Martina Hingis.
_	However, to the animosity of Nash, Decimus disregarded Nash's advice and developed the Terraces according to his own style, to the extent that Nash, sought, unsuccessfully, the demolition and complete reconstruction of Chester Terrace.
_	While Jacobs has appeared in several "Casualty@Holby City" episodes, she had never before appeared in "Casualty" itself, and deemed the two shows very different, to the extent that it felt like "doing a completely different job".
_	Eventually, the "rapid" firing mechanism was perfected and miniaturized to the extent that either the recoil of the firearm or the gas pressure from firing could be used to operate it, thus the operator needed only to pull a trigger (which made the firing mechanisms truly "automatic").
_	In 2057 Goodman became Chief Judge of Mega-City One and immediately created the Council of Five to assist him and began to arm up the Judges to the extent that they could challenge the military.
_	The lives of social web users are increasingly interconnected with their online profiles and accounts, such to the extent that many social networking and social media sites now offer support for mobile devices and internet phone connectivity.
_	The public interface may also be subject to copyright to the extent that it contains expression (for example, the appearance of an icon).
_	It was a very lengthy article, to the extent that it had to be spread across two issues of the Supplement in March and April 1914.
_	As the 2000s progressed, Geffen's absorption of the MCA and DreamWorks labels, along with its continuing to sign new acts such as Ashlee Simpson, Angels & Airwaves, Snoop Dogg and The Game, had boosted the company to the extent that it began gaining equal footing with the main Interscope label, leading some industry insiders to speculate that it could revert to operating as an independently managed imprint at UMG again.
_	As such, she tried to surround herself with a princely court, to the extent that her principality provided sufficient means to do so.
_	The FRCP govern in "habeas corpus" proceedings to the extent that those rules are not inconsistent with federal statutes or the Habeas Rules.
_	The show did not go over well with his fans: the popularity of Crawford's portrayal of Frank Spencer, and the similar Billy Fisher character, had left him somewhat typecast, to the extent that they could not accept his very different role as Dave Finn.
_	He is also unable to deal with pure souls, such as those of Captain Marvel or Superman, and when he tries to take the love that Flash III and Linda Park have for each other, he discovers, in shock, that the purity of it begins to "corrupt" him to the extent that he begins to feel pity and compassion for the damned souls in his realm for the first time in his existence without understanding why, which forces him in desperation to frantically offer the couple another deal to take their love back.
_	Though not designated as the official means of promulgating laws of the Holy See, this was on 23 May 1904 declared an organ of the Holy See to the extent that all documents printed in it were considered "authentic and official".
_	Although the LNC was never able to gain the domination of London's funeral industry for which its founders had hoped, it was very successful at targeting specialist groups of artisans and trades, to the extent that it became nicknamed "the Westminster Abbey of the middle classes".
_	Its use spread to the students and faculty, to the extent that several courses came to use it heavily.
_	Eastwood's acting performance was noted by critics to the extent that Clint himself believed it was Oscar worthy.
_	The items on the balance sheet are the result of various transactions, recorded using double entry at a particular point in time, to the extent that they do not form part of the profit and loss account to that point in time.
_	The nine judges hearing the case agreed unanimously that same-sex couples were entitled to marry, accordingly declared the common-law definition of marriage to be inconsistent with the Constitution and invalid to the extent that it did not permit same-sex couples to enjoy the status and the benefits coupled with responsibilities it accorded to heterosexual couples.
_	As an example, to the extent that women, on average, value financial resources (i.e., economic capital) in their male partners more than sexual capital, and men value sexual capital more than economic capital in their female partners, so one may conclude that heterosexual women and men seek out distinctive capital portfolios that include a different, gendered balance of capitals.
_	The consonants were originally of foreign origin, but have pervaded the language to the extent that native speakers do not perceive or even realize their non-native origin.
_	Although the base polymers may be considered benignly soft, the composition with other materials greatly enhances their abrasive powers; to the extent that a heavy-duty Scotch-Brite pad (which contains both Aluminum oxide and Titanium oxide) will actually scratch glass.
_	Nottingham Forest retained the League Cup shortly afterwards (though Francis was ineligible), and made progress in the European Cup to the extent that they reached the semi-finals, at which point Francis was permitted by registration rules to take part.
_	Sorabji himself developed a largely unfavourable view of his early works, to the extent that late in his life he even considered destroying many of their manuscripts.
_	Thus, to the extent that the ratio "V"/"V" becomes very low, the theory predicts that "K" goes to 5/3 and is the Thomas–Fermi limit.
_	After further review, Health Canada has concluded that there are currently no regulatory impediments to moving ahead with electronically generated and transmitted prescriptions and that these are permissible to the extent that they achieve the same objectives as written prescriptions.
_	Many Kabbalists view the "Ravad" as one of the fathers of their system, and this is true to the extent that he was inclined to mysticism, which led him to follow an ascetic mode of life and gained for him the title of "the pious."
_	The creeper purple coral-pea (Hardenbergia violacea) which was once prevalent throughout the surrounding hills, to the extent that they were known as the purple hills, can also be found around the park.
_	Sugrañes became very close with Gaudí, to the extent that the latter established him as his testamentary executor.
_	Dreams likewise have a very important place, as they do in tribal tradition to the extent that Kivuli states: "I am convinced that the only way in which God speaks to his children is through dreams.
_	By 1895, Townsville had grown to the extent that Tattersall's was considered to be "one of the few connecting links between old and new Townsville".
_	Table tennis was growing in popularity by 1901 to the extent that tournaments were being organized, books being written on the subject, and an unofficial world championship was held in 1902.
_	Dick Richardson's career recovered, to the extent that he made significantly over 1,500 runs for Worcestershire in each of the four seasons from 1959 to 1962, and from 1961 he was among the top fieldsmen in England.
_	Roddenberry approached them, and later stated he had influenced them to the extent that they only robbed the dead and spared the survivors.
_	On returning to England in 1872 his health again deteriorated with heart and lung problems, to the extent that his doctor, Sir Morell Mackenzie, believed he would only survive six months.
_	The A&B's trains at Quainton Road would miss connections with the Tramway, causing milk shipped to Quainton to become unsellable, to the extent that Jones began unloading milk at Waddesdon and shipping it to Aylesbury by road.
_	A bond between her and Jean soon develops, to the extent that she gives Pellegrini the right to make gogols of her (i.e. clone her, thus sacrificing her uniqueness) in exchange for permission to rescue Jean le Flambeur and the Oubliette from certain doom.
_	The boy's lively expression and alert gaze make him an attractive subject in his own right, to the extent that he was several times copied by later artists visiting Malta.
_	Relations with the caliphal governors in the lowlands improved thereafter, but the Qarinvand and Bavandid princes remained united in their opposition to Muslim penetration of the highlands, to the extent that they prohibited even the burial of Muslims there.
_	Further, most approaches to marketing-mix models try to include all marketing activities in aggregate at the national or regional level, but to the extent that various tactics are targeted to different demographic consumer groups, their impact may be lost.
_	Through this catalog of corruption, the Commission concluded that there was systematic and widespread abuse of public trust by public officials, to the extent that many officials failed to see anything morally wrong with their allocating land illegally.
_	Vonnegut often discussed the dangers of egalitarianism, but not to the extent that one single system forms and controls all the people in the world.
_	In popular culture, formula fiction is literature in which the storylines and plots have been reused to the extent that the narratives are predictable.
_	The question distracted him to the extent that he lost interest in his studies and failed to maintain good grades.
_	Oviedo's hatred of Garfias was to the extent that he swore to kill the lawman on sight.
_	In contrast, if there is a high number of cars, the system will become jammed to the extent that no single car will move.
_	Resultant embitterment lingered to the extent that throughout the first decades of colonialism there were periodic campaigns to control the supposedly excessive fundamental urges of African men.
_	The Society, which in fact supports deregulation of the labour market to the extent that employers and employees simply form contracts with each other and then deal with any disputes via the courts, admonished the WorkChoices model particularly for its length and the amount of red tape, claiming it was "all about regulation" and comparing it to the "old Soviet system of command and control", as well as on federalist grounds saying "This attempt on his part to diminish the role of the states, to concentrate all power in Canberra, is very much to Australia's detriment".
_	"Sify" described it "Emotional roller coaster" and wrote "...the story has been narrated in a highly conventional manner to the extent that things get a bit predictable at times.
_	His book about the sciences of hadith is the best known of his works without comparison, to the extent that it is sufficient to say, "the Book of Ibn al-Ṣalāḥ", the intent being understood due to its popularity and stature.
_	Results under Kuchuk improved considerably, to the extent that Lokomotiv lead the table for periods as well.
_	She went ahead and developed her late husband's business to the extent that in 2017 it is one of the leading business conglomerates of Pakistan in the fields of textiles, power generation, oil and gas exploration and telecommunications industries.
_	The Court held that to the extent that his claims were based on Schrum's unjustifiable use of deadly force, the claims were not barred under "Heck" because the evidence did not support the use of deadly force against Yount.
_	found that "although participants often experience a heightened sense of well-being as a consequence of the training, the phenomenon is essentially pathological", meaning that, in the program studied, "the training systematically undermines ego functioning and promotes regression to the extent that reality testing is significantly impaired".
_	It has been constantly redeveloped ever since its construction, to the extent that by the 19th century it had become unrecognisable as part of the Taj Mahal and no longer featured on contemporary plans and its architecture was largely obliterated.
_	Anthony defines captivity as the violent restraint of a man under the power of another to the extent that he must do what the other commands, and is not at liberty to go where he wishes.
_	Additionally, ICANN was not in correct standing with the law to the extent that it was committing other violations and irregularities when it was signing a contract that can also be construed as irregular.
_	He believes that new technology has fragmented American culture to the extent that no cinematic or musical success can unify it, as with past rock bands such as The Beatles.
_	The older Gaudí ate frugally, dressed in old, worn-out suits, and neglected his appearance to the extent that sometimes he was taken for a beggar, such as after the accident that caused his death.
_	Outrage is healthy to the extent that it causes us to act against injustice.
_	Each region has its own distinctive style of dance, to the extent that a knowledgeable observer can often tell which region a group of Bulgarians comes from by how they perform a popular dance like the pravo.
_	He said that "to the extent that the Commonwealth prevented the rescuees landing on Australian soil it closed a possible avenue out of a situation in which they had been placed by other factors."
_	Chapman identified with the novel's narrator to the extent that he wanted to change his name to Holden Caulfield.
_	During his time in command of "Nereide", Corbet had already developed a reputation as a strict disciplinarian, regularly beating his men for the slightest infractions, to the extent that he had provoked a brief mutiny on "Nereide" in 1808.
_	This will be a new experience for the 99p Stores outlet in Eastleigh, as, when they first opened, they succeeded in undercutting the two existing discount stores, "The Stockmarket" and "T.M Stores", to the extent that both shops closed down within months.
_	Once consciously acquired and sufficiently exercised, these programs can become automated to the extent that their execution happens beyond the realms of our awareness.
_	While the medieval structure of Stockholm remained mostly unaltered during the 16th century, the city's social and economic importance grew to the extent that no king could permit the city to determine its own faith – the most important export item being bar iron and the most important destination Lübeck.
_	When Bowman was first introduced into service, the system was said to contain many faults to the extent that troops dubbed Bowman "Better Off With Map And Nokia".
_	"Round the Twist" is notable for having pushed the boundaries of what is acceptable for children's television, to the extent that the Australian Children's Television Foundation had difficulty finding a distributor for it: according to the ACTF's marketing Manager Jenny Buckland, "the scripts were declared 'too rude', 'not for television' and 'outrageous'".
_	The thumbs of "Ardipithecus ramidus", an early hominin, are almost as robust as in humans, so this may be a primitive trait, while the palms of other extant higher primates are elongated to the extent that some of the thumb's original function has been lost (most notably in highly arboreal primates such as the spider monkey).
_	These episodes of uplift raised the Aquarius Plateau to the extent that there were strong erosional forces acting on the Escalante River Basin.
_	The system, however fell into disuse in the early 1970s and the building gradually deteriorated to the extent that rain water was penetrating the structure, leading to rot of the upper landing and structure timbers.
_	This led to a great deal of deforestation on the peninsula in the 1980s, to the extent that only one third of the peninsula's pocosin marshlands continue to exist in their unaltered form.
_	In response, Balatarin published a post in the official blog and explained that "Balatarin is democratic to the extent that links go to the first page by your votes.
_	Oxenstierna often got distracted from his work, his mind wandering to more interesting matters, to the extent that he sometimes wrote public documents in verse.
_	He concludes by describing a "post-modern" view, in which cultures within an immigrant nation have blended and inter-married to the extent that toleration becomes an intra-familial affair.
_	The city also developed its skiing facilities, to the extent that Andorra la Vella was Andorra's applicant city for the XXI Olympic Winter Games, the 2010 Winter Olympics.
_	The two languages are very closely related, to the extent that some linguists refer to Mingrelian and Laz as dialects or regional variants of a single "Zan language", a view held officially in the Soviet era and still so in Georgia today.
_	It has widened to the extent that now very few aspects of an individual’s life remain unaffected by public administration.
_	Tresckow and the inner circle of plotters had no intention of removing Hitler just to see him replaced by the dreaded and ruthless SS chief, and the plan was to kill them both if possible – to the extent that Stauffenberg's first attempt on 11 July was aborted because Himmler was not present.
_	The Zhou court had weakened to the extent that it required a coalition to produce the required army, gathering several other Central Plains feudal states against their common enemy.
_	To the extent that Belford University is in Texas, it is operating in violation of the Texas Education Code."
_	In March 2011, viaForensics was profitable to the extent that it could pay for employee benefits, so Kim left her job and went to work at viaForensics full-time.
_	In a 1982 published conversation about black feminism and lesbian activism with her sister, Beverly Smith, Barbara Smith, co-author of the Combahee River Collective Statement expresses concerns that, "to the extent that lesbians of color must struggle simultaneously against the racism of white women (as against sexism), separatism impedes the building of alliances with men of color".
_	During the Age of Enlightenment, the emphasis on scientific progress and rationalism put Catholic theology and Mariology often on the defensive in the later parts of the 18th century, to the extent that books such as "The Glories of Mary" (by Alphonsus Liguori) were written in defense of Mariology.
_	As a composer, George O'Kelly always stood in the shadow of his brother Joseph, to the extent that some of his works were perceived as works by the latter.
_	Local genealogy groups often support these library facilities to the extent that the centers see non-LDS patron usage higher than local LDS usage.
_	They are similar to the extent that expert knowledge is required to differentiate between specimens of the different species.
_	In addition, to the extent that tides produce heat along fractures, libration may affect the magnitude and distribution of such tidal shear heating.
_	Bettison denied the claim, and other allegations about his conduct, saying: "Fans' behaviour, to the extent that it was relevant at all, made the job of the police, in the crush outside Leppings Lane turnstiles, harder than it needed to be.
_	He occasionally used negative tactics when he was unhappy with the approach of the opposition—in one game where the opposition had not declared, he slowed down play to the extent that one over took 12 minutes to bowl.
_	Thus to the extent that traditional abdominal exercises (e.g. crunches) or more advanced abdominal exercises tend to "flatten" the belly, this is owed to the tangential training of the TVA inherent in such exercises.
_	For example, subsection 1(1) of the "Alberta Human Rights Act" reads "Unless it is expressly declared by an Act of the Legislature that it operates notwithstanding this Act, every law of Alberta is inoperative to the extent that it authorizes or requires the doing of anything prohibited by this Act."
_	Siyanon was very impressed by it, especially by the verse "Unavoidable is death, but unceasable is our bravery" ("เกิดมาแล้วต้องตาย ชาติชายเอาไว้ลายตำรวจไทย"), to the extent that he awarded bundles of monies to them together with complimentary letters and his namecards on which he signed and wrote "For you.
_	Jews faced anti-Semitism and stereotypes in Britain, and anti-Semitism "in most cases went along with Germanophobia" to the extent that Jews were equated with Germans in the early 20th century, despite the English themselves being a Germanic ethnic group.
_	Despite Colombia having the dubious distinction of being the world leading producer of coca for many years those plans, slowly but surely, diminished the drug produced, to the extent that in 2010 the country reduced cocaine production by 60%, relative to the peak in 2000.
_	In the book "European Nightmares: Horror Cinema in Europe Since the 1945" (2012), the film is noted for being an "exemplar of Eurohorror...it is excessive but here the excess seems to entail a more forceful retardation of a narrative drive, to the extent that the narrative periodically ceases to exist."
_	The family enjoyed hunting, to the extent that his uncle was killed in a riding accident, his brother was crippled in another, and he himself managed ten broken bones at various times.
_	The negative right to food was recognised as early as in England’s 1215 Magna Carta which reads that: "no one shall be ‘amerced’ (fined) to the extent that they are deprived of their means of living."
_	(2) The atrial systole contractions are incomplete and thus do not contract to the extent that would block flow from the veins through the atria into the ventricles.
_	"23 skidoo" has been described as "perhaps the first truly national fad expression and one of the most popular fad expressions to appear in the U.S," to the extent that "Pennants and arm-bands at shore resorts, parks, and county fairs bore either [23] or the word 'Skiddoo'."
_	The affairs of the Federated Commonwealth subsequently degraded to the extent that Yvonne practically begged Katherine to take over.
_	Webb expressed that at the time he wrote the article he did not anticipate its effects, "and to the extent that my writing subjected women at the Academy or the active Armed Forces to undue hardship, I remain profoundly sorry."
_	This tradition was also linked by the maritime trade routes with Indian Vajrayana, Tantric Buddhism in Sinhala, Cham and Khmer lands and in China and Japan, to the extent that it is hard to separate them completely and it is better to speak of a complex of "Esoteric Buddhism of Mediaeval Maritime Asia."
_	You did nothing and, as a result, the board's reputation has taken a hit to the extent that the people have lost faith in this board."
_	The relationship between Colazo and Cóccaro soon deteriorated, to the extent that Colazo even accused his deputy of involvement in plans to assassinate him.
_	Tax deductions can be classified into those above the line, which are beneficial to the taxpayer regardless of income, and below the line, which are only valuable to the extent that they exceed the standard deduction amount of the taxpayer, which in 2014 in the U.S., for example, was $6,200 for a single taxpayer.
_	At Sainte-Maure, Levegh collided with a gutter, which damaged his car to the extent that he could not continue the race, leaving Girardot as the sole remaining Gordon Bennett competitor.
_	Strangle arrives and tells Timmy that he must reprise the role of Santa, since it is in the rules that a godchild must take over the role of a holiday icon if the godchild has harmed them to the extent that they cannot do their job.
_	According to "The New York Times", "It was overproduced and overpopulated to the extent that the tiny resolute figure of Nora became lost in the combined mechanics of Broadway and the Industrial Revolution."
_	Analyzing Hegel's conception of God, Bubbio thinks that content can be restored to religion, only to the extent that God is understood in God’s relation to human beings, and human beings are understood in their relation to God.
_	Reportedly, after explaining the role of reproductive organs in plants, his female students were distressed to the extent that the affronted mothers withdrew their daughters from the course.
_	Hsiao Kang did not give up and tried his best to support Tianbian out of his love to her to the extent that he mortgaged his house to finance the album promotion.
_	Rathnure is famous for the Rathnure St. Annes Gaelic Athletic Association Club, which was once a proud dual club (Nicky Rackard having represented Wexford in both codes) but this legacy has been somewhat diminished over the last twenty years to the extent that Rathnure now fails to field a team in football.
_	It intersects with other fields of research and practice on collaborative governance that describe collaborative processes for making and implementing public policy and urban or regional planning Inclusive management also aligns with recent writings on network governance to the extent that they focus upon cross-boundary collaborations within networks.
_	Three weeks earlier, Malloy's patrol partner and friend had been killed apprehending an armed robbery suspect; Malloy is deeply saddened, to the extent that he plans to resign from the force.
_	Hedge funds are structured to avoid most direct regulation (although their managers may be regulated) and are not required to publicly disclose their investment activities, except to the extent that investors generally are subject to disclosure requirements.
_	These contacts with outsiders has resulted in cultural exchange to the extent that many
_	The grounds of the old church were reused to the extent that they coincided with the new building (the transept did not exist previously, for example).
_	The overseas was another important market for the Mighty II - to the extent that it was manufactured there from the 1990s using many local components.
_	His life shows the extent that the religious schism in Roman North Africa could become violent.
_	Second, we are applying open-source principles to research to the extent that they apply...
_	To the extent that monarchs are limited in their power, the limitation comes mainly from hereditary aristocracies which still maintain many privileges of feudal times.
_	To the extent that electors used only one of their votes the estimated turnout figure is an underestimate.
_	By 1990, the hooliganism problem in English football had reduced to the extent that UEFA lifted its ban on English clubs in European competitions.
_	Modern historians have sometimes called these lands fiefs; however, to the extent that they were church property and not property of the lord or king—although that was a flexible distinction in the ninth and tenth centuries—they were not fiefs.
_	So, to the extent that these policies help – and they are helping on that front – then certainly an accommodative monetary policy is better in the present situation than a restrictive monetary policy.
_	It decreased in popularity in Gothic art, but revived in the larger works of the Renaissance, when artists took inspiration for their "Massacres" from Roman reliefs of the battle of the Lapiths and Centaurs to the extent that they showed the figures heroically nude.
_	To the extent that this is considered unjust, it may be remedied in a variety of ways, e.g. excluding investment income from taxable income, making investments deductible and therefore only taxing them when gains are realized, or replacing the income tax by other forms of tax, such as a sales tax.
_	By his victory, Datu Ali became the most powerful leader in the region between Koronadal in the South and Maganoy in the North and could capable of bringing all Magindanaw Moros under his sovereignty to the extent that he expanded his domain in Cotabato and extending from the neighborhood of Malabang to Sarangani Point.
_	Hurricane Diane caused tremendous damage to Tamaqua's railroad yards to the extent that they never fully recovered.
_	With Zamet Komucki demolished his former club, won the city rivalry to the extent that Kvarner admitted defeat in writing.
_	1/24's concept of victory in Iraq involved building the local police and military forces to the extent that they would be able to counter the insurgency.
_	Graham's tactical victory proved to have little strategic effect on the continuing war, to the extent that Victor was able to claim the battle as a French victory since the siege remained in force until finally being lifted on 24 August 1812.
_	The uprisings in 1821 were supported by students in Turin to the extent that the Collegio delle Province had to be closed and the University itself operated only to a limited degree.
_	If I love my country because it is mine, I must be loyal to it, even when I disagree with its policies, but I do not necessarily regard it as superior to everyone else’s country, and I may have no inclination to say that all other countries, to the extent that they are legitimate and worthy of respect, must approximate my own.
_	To the extent that hidden unemployment exists, it implies that official unemployment statistics provide a poor guide to what unemployment rate coincides with "full employment".
_	Sontag asserts that the modern style is quite harmful; to art and to audiences alike, enforcing hermeneutics- fallacious, complicated “readings” that seem to engulf an artwork, to the extent that analysis of content begins to degrade, to destroy.
_	In this view, Eustacia dies because she has internalised the community's values to the extent that, unable to escape Egdon without confirming her status as a fallen woman, she chooses suicide.
_	However, Peal reported that logging was limited, and that farming and hunting pressures were minimised, by population displacement — including the exodus of people out of over two dozen villages surrounding the park — and the prevailing climate of insecurity, to the extent that species populations actually increased during the war years.
_	According to Game Nation TV, after playing for a while, every character and place looked similar to the extent that the game makes ""Star Trek" look like a xenomorphic zoo".
_	It opposed "Nercha"s and Uroos festivals amongst the Muslim community, thereby attracting opposition from the orthodox ulema to the extent that they issued a fatwa declaring the reading of it as sacrilege.
_	Likewise, executive producers of news shows tend to hire staff that share their ideology and viewpoint, to the extent that FIFO is ruthlessly applied.
_	During the confrontation, Ava begins taunting Christian sexually, to the extent that Christian snaps and begins to have forceful sex with Ava.
_	On 14 August 1974, the Turkish armed forces in northern Cyprus had been sufficiently reinforced to the extent that they were able to launch a second major offensive, "Attila-2", which expanded the area under its control to approximately 38% of the land mass by 18 August 1974 and the end of hostilities by cease fire.
_	Manor stated in their application: ""It has been vacant for a number of years and has, notwithstanding various security measures, been the subject of numerous break-ins, fires and trespass in recent years to the extent that it is now considered dangerous to public health and safety.
_	The cheetah population in Afghanistan decreased to the extent that it has been considered extinct since the 1950s.
_	To the extent that dysregulation across several physiologic systems underlie the pathogenesis of the frailty, specific disease states are likely concurrent manifestations of the underlying impaired physiologic function and regulation.
_	Vincent Patilio, although proud of his son, is also very worried about him risking his life, to the extent that at one point he publicly humiliates
_	Having sculpted a bust of Napoleon Bonaparte (Museum at Nantes), he became disillusioned after the "coup d'état" of 18 Brumaire to the extent that he was embroiled in the paranoid and furious reaction of Napoleon to the plot of the Rue Saint-Nicaise, an attempt against Napoleon's life in which a device dubbed the "machine infernal" was exploded, with loss of innocent life.
_	In a 2006 newspaper article, Richard Dawkins said that discussion regarding eugenics was inhibited by the shadow of Nazi misuse, to the extent that some scientists would not admit that breeding humans for certain abilities is at all possible.
_	Recently, it has become the archetypal ballpoint pen and is now considered ubiquitous, to the extent that the Museum of Modern Art has made it a permanent part of its collection.
_	By population, Foucault means its fluidness and malleability, Foucault refers to ‘a multiplicity of men, not to the extent that they are nothing more than individual bodies, but to the extent that they form, on the contrary, a global mass that is affected by overall processes of birth, death, production, taxation, illness and so forth, one should also take note that Foucault does not just mean population as singular event but a means of circulation tied to factors of security.
_	The Soviets during the Cold War liked to give the impression that all of their intelligence came from "humint" (human intelligence) rather than "sigint" (signals intelligence) as to fool Western nations about the extent that they collected information via sigint.
_	Commissioners were also regularly threatened by former DDS personnel, scaring some of them away from doing their job, to the extent that three quarters of them had to be replaced after six months.
_	The historian Jacques Roger has written "Lamarck was a materialist to the extent that he did not consider it necessary to have recourse to any spiritual principle... his deism remained vague, and his idea of creation did not prevent him from believing everything in nature, including the highest forms of life, was but the result of natural processes."
_	Although not to the extent that Rockefeller planned, the DM&N did start construction in early 1896 on new branches to the Victoria, Adams and Franklin mines.
_	In his later career, Kumar was also heavily influenced by playback singer Ahmed Rushdi and his liking towards Rushdi was to the extent that he paid him a tribute at Royal Albert Hall London by singing Rushdi's some of the songs.
_	But the ruckus brought more attention to the Apathy Party, to the extent that Mr. Jovell was shockingly elected President of the Union.
_	Alaska's resources were depleted to the extent that it came to be considered a "colonial economy".
_	The Beatrice Islets which originally supported bushes of African boxthorn which, when cleared in either the 1960s or the 1970s, resulted in erosion and destabilisation of both islets to the extent that both were described as being 'a mudflat/cocklebed' which is submerged at high water.
_	By now their physical resemblance to lovable teddy bears may well have affected the Angels' self image, but not, I hope, to the extent that they continue to submit to such degrading elevation in American folk-demonology.
_	At present, international law, as practiced by states does not make any distinction and does not even grant a right of organized resistance even against the most serious violations, which is unsatisfactory at least to the extent that a right to forcibly resist against genocide, crimes against humanity and war crimes on a massive scale should be recognized.
_	The California Supreme Court held that the civil claims were barred to the extent that they alleged that Schrum was not entitled to use any force during the incident, as the use of resistance justified the use of reasonable force in response to his actions.
_	The pageant was organized episodically and invited audience involvement to the extent that some critics have referred to the pageant as a public ritual.
_	GOSH maintained its position throughout that Charlie's condition had deteriorated by January to the extent that the proposed experimental treatment was futile.
_	Y is a generalization of Hex to the extent that any position on a Hex board can be represented as an equivalent position on a larger Y board.
_	Another crucial fact about calculating prokaryotic RNA integrity numbers is that RIN has not been validated to the extent that it has for eukaryotic RNA.
_	The battle for control of the Reform Party between many of the founding members and Buchanan's weakened the Reform Party to the extent that it has diminished as a factor in U.S. politics in the years since the 2000 election.
_	Mark became a fireman and a local hero, idolising Superman to the extent that he had a large 'S-shield' tattoo across his back (This shield was the one worn by Superman in Kingdom Come foreshadowing the dark turn Mark would take).
_	Bull said, "One of the most important features of the piety of eleventh-century arms-bearers was that it was associative, passive to the extent that it was inspired and sustained by the spiritual resources of a monastic or clerical élite."
_	In 1950, in order to limit the extent that the Arabs and the Israelis could engage in an arms race, the three nations which dominated the arms trade in the non-Communist world, namely the United States, the United Kingdom and France had signed the Tripartite Declaration, where they had committed themselves to limiting how many arms they could sell in the Near East, and also to ensuring that any arms sales to one side was matched by arms sales of equal quantity and quality to the other.
_	As with other Balkan dances, each country and even local region has its own variation of the dance, often interspersing other steps with the basic "pravo" step, to the extent that these different versions amount to distinct dances.
_	Until these drainage works Loch Winnoch and Kilbirnie Loch nearly met and often did during flooding, to the extent that, as stated, early writers such as Boece, Hollings and Petruccio Ubaldini regarded the lochs as one, using the name 'Garnoth' or 'Garnott'.
_	It is a methodical collection to the extent that the matters treated are placed in their respective chapters, but there is much confusion in the distribution of the latter.
_	Also, the radio stations in Liberia are abundant to the extent that there are over 70 radio stations in the entire country (Liberia).
_	On the other hand, bodies doing redistricting must be conscious of race to the extent that they must ensure compliance with the Voting Rights Act of 1965.
_	Some read the phrase "Render unto Caesar that which is Caesar's" as unambiguous at least to the extent that it commands people to respect state authority and to pay the taxes it demands of them.
_	Additionally, proponents have argued that the fat tax is less regressive to the extent that it lowers medical expenditures and expenditures on the targeted foods among the poor.
_	One of the earliest conceptualisations of the term is by Ladrech (1994, 69) who defines Europeanisation simply as ‘an incremental process of re-orienting the direction and shape of politics to the extent that EC political and economic dynamics become part of the organisational logic of national politics and policy making.
_	Vidal was blacklisted after releasing "The City and the Pillar" to the extent that no major newspaper or magazine would review any of his novels for six years.
_	Residents in Kent complained that the handling of the project by the Department of Transport had caused the value of their properties to depreciate to the extent that they could not sell them.
_	The student body grew over the next two decades to the extent that a new 3-story brick building was built to the rear of the existing building in 1928.
_	The Catholic "Reconquista" of Spain progressed to the extent that by 1462 only the Emirate of Granada - including the Alpujarra - was left in Moorish hands; and in 1492 the city of Granada fell to the "Catholic Monarchs".
_	It was said to the public: "Ever since abolishment of child- labor became a reality in agricultural concerns, Noboa Corporation took corrective measures to the extent that child- labor has been non-existent for many years not even for minors 15-18 years old which is permissible by law, due to consistent political attacks which distort the truth of the matter" .
_	During the Second World War, the squadron was notable for (firstly) having a large number of pilots who were either RCAF personnel or Canadians serving in the RAF – to the extent that it was sometimes known, unofficially, as "242 Canadian Squadron", and (secondly) for being as the first squadron to be commanded by Douglas Bader.
_	Additionally, shopkeepers can strengthen window glass, to the extent that it can withstand, without breaking, being hit by the implements that smash and grab raiders are likely to use, such as hammers, bricks, and scaffolding poles.
_	Nearly every business in the city was damaged to the extent that none were able to open when the storm cleared.
_	The reality, when it concerns subjects not capable of being experienced, is in fact only a perception formed in people's consciousness, and can be manipulated to the extent that the question of "true" version of events becomes meaningless.
_	One reason why we require the partial derivatives of the perturbation to decay so quickly is that these conditions turn out to imply that the "gravitational field energy density" (to the extent that this somewhat nebulous notion makes sense in a metric theory of gravitation) decays like formula_16, which would be physically sensible.
_	Cahn, seeing a new potential market in hire purchase sales, expanded the company to the extent that his Jays and Campbells stores were to be found in most major towns across Britain.
_	"Unfortunately, some Muslims have become consumers of the western culture to the extent that many Muslims celebrate and wrongly take the day of Friday as a weekly holiday in contrast to Saturday of the Jews and Sunday of the Christians.
_	With the suspension of gold coin payouts on the outbreak of the First World War, the binding factor was removed and paper money in the respective territories became unanchored and hence free to float, to the extent that the common coinage would permit.
_	This space is commonly used in descriptive set theory, to the extent that its elements are often called “reals.”
_	It is gradually sloping to the extent that, during low tide, the water level is low enough to allow one to walk as far as five hundred meters from the shore.
_	It does however allow for a reduction in damages recoverable to the extent that the court sees fit.
_	The family were prominent Unitarians, to the extent that a room in London's Essex Hall, the headquarters building of the British Unitarians, was named after them.
_	To the extent that sexual orientation is a concealed identity (at least to others), sexual orientation may not be within the scope of expectations states theory.
_	The governors of its sub-provinces ("nuwabb"), including Homs, Hama, Tripoli, Aleppo and Safad, were officially under his authority, to the extent that any letter the lower-level governors sent to the sultan would have to be inspected first by Tankiz himself; if he disagreed with a letter's content, he would have it returned to its sender.
_	Although barred from the prize ceremony, they have succeeded in infiltrating it psychologically to the extent that twice they have been mentioned by the guest of honour on live TV, just before the announcement of the winner.
_	So long as their invention controls the market for button-fastening appliances, and to the extent that their machines shall supersede other modes of clinching staples, just so long will they be enabled to control the market for staples.
_	The functions of the Inspector‑General do not include inquiring into the matters to which a complaint made to the Inspector‑General by an employee of an agency relates to the extent that those matters are directly related to the promotion, termination of appointment, discipline or remuneration of the complainant or to other matters relating to the complainant’s employment.
_	Although the average weekly wage during the war was increased by between 8–12 per cent, it was not enough to keep up with inflation and as a result there was considerable discontent amongst workers, to the extent that industrial action followed.
_	Factories, houses, bridges, roads, and railways were destroyed in heavy US Air Force bombing raids; Pyongyang's tram system had been completely destroyed, to the extent that salvaging it was deemed uneconomical and was abandoned.
_	This was subsequently altered to the extent that it now conforms with the Arts and Crafts style while retaining many earlier features.
_	In ungulates the forelimbs are optimised to maximize speed and stamina to the extent that the limbs serve almost no other purpose.
_	For example, he spoke highly of Mao Zedong's calligraphy, to the extent that he justified what the Party Leader had written mistakenly.
_	To the extent that we do "not" have to go outside human physiology in order to trace the causal antecedents of any bodily movement, intentional action can be fully causally explained by the existence of these physiological antecedents "alone".
_	Andaluz is of medium size, measuring between at the withers, with an appearance very similar to that of the Jack Russell Terrier, to the extent that it has on occasion been called the Spanish Jack Russell.
